Authors
The Phantom
Number of Reviews
24

Title
Review for Buffy the Vampire Slayer (1992)
     It's nice when a film lives up to its title, as far too many these
days do not.  In part this is due to the endless tide of sequels
Hollywood's long-suffering audiences have been subjected to; after all,
what is it about pedestrian titles like BATMAN RETURNS that might raise
our spirits?  How do LETHAL WEAPON 3 and DIE HARD 2 tickle our fancies?
The answer is that they don't, for although everyone loves a clever
title (and an even more clever film to back it up), they are sadly few
and far between.  (With DIE HARD 2, people took matters into their own
hands and redubbed it DIE HARDER, which is both more appropriate and
rather more clever than the film itself.)
     BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER, however, has little to worry about in
this department.  Though we'll be treated to one or two other
well-thought-out titles (WHITE MEN CAN'T JUMP and DePalma's upcoming
RAISING CAIN come to mind) before year's end, BUFFY -- more than any
other film in recent months -- works hard to capture our interest even
before the theater lights dim.  Its title conjures up all sorts of
intriguing possibilities, and it's impossible to think of it without
becoming at least moderately interested in seeing the film.
     The question, of course, is what happens *after* the theater lights
dim.  In the case of BUFFY, we are again pleasantly surprised to find
that unlike many films this year, BUFFY is truly a smile.  By this, the
Phantom means that at any point during the film, you'll likely find
yourself smiling at something, if not outright laughing out loud at some
bit of cleverness, a throwaway line, a delightfully incongruous scene.
And you won't be alone -- look around you and you'll see that most of
the rest of the audience is smiling as well.  There aren't many films
that can produce this reaction -- this involuntary smiling -- but BUFFY
does, and does quite often.  And that's worth a lot in this season of
expensive frowns, this dismal summer season of more-of-the-same action
films and tame high-concept comedies that are worrying studios and video
dealers alike.  For after all, although people are still going to the
movies, they are with few exceptions going with little enthusiasm and
low expectations.  How else to explain the generally positive response
to the anachronistic LETHAL WEAPON 3?  The overwhelmingly positive
notices that BATMAN RETURNS has garnered, even though that film suffers
from one of the worst cases of sequelitis in recent memory?  (BATMAN
RETURNS comes to vibrant life just once when Michelle Pfeiffer
transforms herself for the first time into Catwoman.  The rest of the
time we get an awful lot of high-budget wheel-spinning in traditional,
grand, LETHAL WEAPON style.)
     In the Phantom's opinion, the problem with this summer's crop of
films is that there are too many dollars chasing too few smiles (if the
Phantom may be permitted to appropriate a term traditionally used in
economics, a subject that is itself the root cause of much moviegoer
misery these past few months).  Extraordinary amounts of money have been
spent on exceedingly tired comedies like MO' MONEY, comedies that are at
best sporadically funny but much more frequently horrifyingly bad,
filled with unnecessary violence and misogyny and bereft of any ability
to make their audiences feel good for 90 minutes (which is, after all,
all a Hollywood film has to do to be considered successful; these films
are for the most part not being made for the ages, unless Hollywood has
redefined "the ages" to mean six months down the road when the film hits
Blockbusters).
     BUFFY, though, looks like it's had someone's time -- rather than
money -- lavished on it, and as a result we find few expensive special
effects, no high-rent actors, and -- surprise of all surprises -- a
shockingly literate script.  As Joe Eszterhas so ably proved with his
overpriced and very bad screenplay for BASIC INSTINCT, more money
doesn't always buy better dialogue or non-intelligence-insulting
situations; instead, BUFFY's screenplay delights and amuses us at every
turn, whether it's presenting Buffy to us for the first time, giving us
a glimpse of an exceedingly dysfunctional basketball coach's
motivational techniques, or letting us enjoy Paul Reuben's antics as the
least likely vampire to grace the silver screen in years.  Best of all,
just when we begin to feel that the film has left us stranded in smile
heaven in order to set up a superfluous action or love scene, BUFFY's
screenplay comes to our rescue once again; and as we leave the theater,
what crosses all of our minds, what surprises us and encourages us, what
makes us shake our heads in disbelief is this: BUFFY never lets us down.
It is a film that is consistently entertaining, one that never tries to
flimflam us with gore or special effects, and one that moves confidently
at its own pace, secure in the knowledge that its audience will be right
behind it, smiling all the time and hoping for more.
     Its story couldn't be more simple: Buffy, you see, is our
generation's Official Vampire Slayer, and as such it falls to her to
take care of the growing vampire menace in her sunny, Southern
Californian home town (to demonstrate this, the film gives us a glimpse
of Buffy in a prior life, back before there were malls).  Donald
Sutherland is reborn each generation as the vampire slayer's tutor,
sidekick and kick-boxing coach (Buffy may be able to lead a cheer, but
as an Official Vampire Slayer, she requires a fair amount of
assertiveness training); his job is to convince her that her destiny
lies not in cheering the basketball team on to victory but in pounding
wooden stakes through people's hearts -- a tough job, but someone's got
to do it.
     On hand as well are Paul Reubens and Rutger Hauer, who handles his
light comic role as well has he's handled the large-caliber automatic
weapons he's co-starred with in the past (the Phantom will even go so
far as to forgive him for SPLIT SECOND, the only Rutger
Hauer-with-a-shotgun film that was almost perfectly unentertaining).
Hauer plays Lothos, the head of Vampires Local 54, who directs Paul
Reuben's actions and spends most of the film waiting for his climactic
confrontation with Buffy.  He looks suitably creepy most of the time,
though he stops well short of causing the audience's skin to crawl (as
he did in incomparable horror film THE HITCHER); this is just as well,
since BUFFY is a comedy first and foremost and a horror spoof only as an
afterthought.  In this, it's a bit different than FRIGHT NIGHT, RETURN
OF THE LIVING DEAD, EVIL DEAD 2, NIGHT OF THE CREEPS, AN AMERICAN
WEREWOLF IN LONDON and countless other (and lesser) horror spoofs, but
it's as fun and entertaining as the best of them (the Phantom was
particularly reminded of Tom Holland's wonderful FRIGHT NIGHT, which is
a must-see for phans of horror-comedies).
     Paul Reubens seems to be having a marvelously malevolent time as
Lothos' Renfield and executive assistant; he also mugs up a storm in a
death scene to end all death scenes, and frighteningly enough, in a few
scenes he actually comes to resemble his police mug shots -- surely a
sign that he's perfected the look of the living dead.  
     Kristy Swanson as Buffy takes command of the film early on and
doesn't relinquish it to Luke Perry's mugging, Paul Reuben's antics, or
any number of surprisingly funny actors in bit parts throughout the film
(including Mark DeCarlo as a coach who's spent too much time reading
self-help books and Candy Clark as Buffy's even-more-airheaded mother).
She remains the focus of attention, and her transformation from Valley
Girl to Vampire Slayer is carried off nearly without a hitch (though the
film almost loses its way once Buffy discovers her more serious and
responsible side, Swanson keeps the proceedings on track until the
screenplay can toss another throwaway line or two our way).
     Director Fran Rubel Kuzui (with a name like that, you know you're
in for a comic treat -- Ms.  Kuzui's name sounds like a clown sneezing)
keeps the film rolling along to its somewhat predictable conclusion, and
although it is not entirely funny nor even very original for every one
of its 98 minutes, it is funny and original enough for this summer.
BUFFY is well worth a look now while people are talking about it and
while its many throwaway comic lines are fresh in people's minds.  For
BUFFY passes the hardest test of a good comedy: it's still funny well
after you've left the theater, and any two people who've seen it can
amuse themselves for a good long while by recalling the best of the
film's dialogue, the funniest of its situations, and the overall good
feeling it left them with.  For even greater effect, see the
embarrassingly bad MO' MONEY first, if only so that you can fully
appreciate what it is that BUFFY's filmmakers have done -- and have not
done.  No gore, no violence, no car chases, no explosions, no misogyny,
no pumping soundtrack; instead, BUFFY lets us smile beatifically for 98
minutes.  And for the Phantom, that's worth $7.50 any day.

Title
Review for Reservoir Dogs (1992)
     It has been a superb year for films that are both low-budget but
very high-quality -- terms that for most Hollywood executives mix about
as well as oil and water.  Want high quality?  Then buy Ridley Scott all
the fog and period costumes he can use, hook it together with an epic
tale of conquest and discovery, spend spend spend spend spend -- and
wind up with the biggest international dud since HUDSON HAWK.  And who's
to blame?  Not Scott, who did the best he could do under the
circumstances.  Not Sigourney Weaver (she's never to blame).  Best blame
Michael Mann and Daniel Day-Lewis who together stole your thunder by
sneaking THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS out a month earlier -- and by making
it as entertaining as 1492: CONQUEST OF PARADISE was pretentious and
dull.
     Meanwhile, small independent filmmakers and distributors have
managed to save the year with such well-made and exciting films as BOB
ROBERTS, MISTRESS, LAWS OF GRAVITY, ONE FALSE MOVE, RAMPAGE, and now,
RESERVOIR DOGS.  The money spent on all of these films *together* likely
does not equal what was spent on 1492; fortunately (or unfortunately,
depending on which side of the ledger sheet you spend your time on),
money doesn't buy quality in Hollywood -- though since it buys spectacle
and advertising, it usually suffices.
     Beyond quality, there is another way in which most of these films
differ from the standard Hollywood fare: they are not utterly
predictable.  Even the best of the big Hollywood films this summer and
fall were at best about three steps behind the audience even before the
theater lights dimmed; one reason people so frequently feel let down by
Hollywood's supposed blockbusters is that the films themselves are
rarely creatures of great subtlety.  And when they are, we become so
familiar with them through the endless previews, advertising, and
reviews by critics somewhat less circumspect than the Phantom in their
reviewing style that little that develops on the screen comes as much of
a surprise to us.  Sometimes this is okay; after all, hearing "airplane"
and "terrorist" is pretty much all you need to know about PASSENGER 57.
But what of those previews for DRACULA?  While the tag line "Love Never
Dies" is intriguing, the preview that precedes it makes it plain that
the filmmakers don't think that intrigue is enough to draw people to the
film.  So instead of mystery we get quick-cut editing featuring fangs
galore, creepy demons descending from ceilings, close-ups of Winona
Ryder, and a pretty fair plot summary -- in short, a little something
for everyone, thrown together with no particular flair but on the
assumption that oblique references to the most famous character in
horror history, coupled with a mention of the cast and the director
would not be enough to draw crowds sufficient in size to pay for all the
blood, heaving breasts, and green fog.  Would that all films were good
enough to support BATMAN or TOYS-like advertising campaigns.  (A big
Halloween-season sigh for days gone by when horror films like HENRY:
PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER were allowed to creep up on us unnoticed,
the better to be scared witless by them as we and our fellow
unsuspecting audience members settled in for two hours of unpredictable,
white-knuckled fun.)
     But let's not sigh too loudly, for the subject of this review --
the outstanding new independent film RESERVOIR DOGS -- is very much in
the "so what is it about, again?" vein.  It's the kind of film that is
exceedingly hard to ruin by excessive description (even Vincent Canby
had trouble giving away the entire plot in his rather overly-descriptive
review); in fact, RESERVOIR DOGS is a lot like HENRY in the sense that
nothing you can say about it can in any way lessen the impact it will
have on someone who hasn't yet seen it.  (Actually, that's not true
strictly speaking, since there are a few key scenes which depend quite a
bit on their shock value for their effectiveness; but in general, just
knowing the film's plot or being familiar with director Tarantino's
style isn't enough to significantly lessen the film's impact.)
     In fact, the plot both barely exists and is incredibly complicated
-- take your pick.  On the surface, the film is about a group of bad
guys, the robbery they plan, and what happens afterward.  But that's
like saying that GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS is about a bunch of guys selling
real estate -- it's true enough, as far as it goes, but it doesn't even
get close to what makes the film so fascinating.  RESERVOIR DOGS plays
like a Sam Peckinpah film with dialogue by David Mamet, and the whole
production has a wonderful -- and quite intentional -- retrograde
seventies feel to it.  It is as stripped down and spare as Scorsese's
GOODFELLAS, but first-time director Quentin Tarantino is quite obviously
not hoping to be taken for a Scorsese clone -- his distinctive style is
very much his own, and his character-driven film recalls the best of the
straight-ahead, no-frills films of the late sixties and seventies.
     The action in RESERVOIR DOGS unfolds largely against the backdrop
of a single set (a warehouse used as a rendezvous point), though much of
the film's exposition is handled through flashback.  Tarantino jumps us
backward through time, then forward again to the present moment,
sometimes jumping to a parallel story line before returning to the
warehouse.  The result is one of startling effectiveness, as we are
moved -- ever so slowly, ever so subtly -- to the robbers' point of
view, always finding ourselves back in the warehouse after recalling
bits of (our) past, all the while growing impatient at the waiting and
fearful of what the future may bring.
     Even putting aside the compelling performances; the well-drawn and
quirky characters; the no-nonsense -- yet slightly tongue-in-cheek --
tone of the film; even putting aside all of that, this effect is above
all why RESERVOIR DOGS is so interesting -- and so compelling.  For
Tarantino allows us to feel something that is rarely felt in modern
American film: it's a feeling of uncertainty, of doubt, even of dread.
Throughout much of RESERVOIR DOGS, we just don't know what's going to
happen next; and even hearing a full description of the plot hardly
lessens the feeling, since so much of the film is presented to us out of
strict chronological order.  All we know is that nice things are
unlikely to occur, and that if we had to guess, it would be that events
in this single-minded gift to our mainstream-starved intelligences might
not end with a nice, tidy Hollywood bow on top.  But to be honest, we
just don't know.
     As a lover of horror and all things unknown, it may be that the
Phantom appreciates this more than most; after all, the memorable (but
outlandishly audience-insulting) BASIC INSTINCT was filled with what
passes for mystery and uncertainty in Hollywood these days, and just
look at how many copies are available for your rental pleasure at your
local Blockbusters.  Verhoeven knows what sells, if nothing else, and
he's blatantly uninterested in attempting anything beyond the
paint-by-numbers thrillers for which he's so justly famous.  But was
there anything about BASIC INSTINCT that wasn't telegraphed in
excruciating detail -- detail that would do Western Union proud --
before even the opening credits had rolled?  Perhaps only whether or not
the beautiful, rich, naked bisexual woman who does/does not kill people
with an ice pick actually did/did not kill people with an ice pick --
not exactly a question to keep us watching the film on anything other
than a purely voyeuristic level.
     While voyeurism plays a large part in our experience viewing
RESERVOIR DOGS, there is -- thankfully -- much more to Tarantino's
screenplay than blood and gunplay, and whether or not the bad guys are
going to get caught.  In fact, you'll very quickly find that these
rather prosaic considerations get left behind as you get caught up in
the characters themselves, each brought to unique and individual life by
a marriage of first-rate characterization and first-rate acting.  (And
the Phantom's Harvey Keitel rule is very much in effect here: as always,
it never ever hurts to have Harvey Keitel in a film.)
     The performances are uniformly impressive; RESERVOIR DOGS could
hardly be the outstanding ensemble film it is if they were not.  Keitel
and Steve Buscemi -- playing a man with well-considered and firmly held
opinions about Madonna and her music -- nearly steal the show from Tim
Roth, who plays the character with whom the audience is most likely to
identify.  To say more about what roles these characters play -- or even
to reveal their names -- would add little to this review, but would
definitely detract from the film's effect.
     RESERVOIR DOGS is best seen as Tarantino presents it to his
audience: cold and without any preconceived ideas.  It is a violent film
in which a strictly male-only world is portrayed; the characters
themselves are not wholly rounded, three-dimensional or self-conscious;
and no feelings are spared.  It is not a politically correct film (the
Phantom directs your attention to the rapidly -- and deservedly --
fading 1492 for politically correct narrative), and no one's feelings
are spared as we eavesdrop on this motley crew of characters as
realistic as they are compelling.  Tarantino doesn't pander even for a
moment; as a result, his film is as wholly successful as any you are
likely to see this year.
     Nearly everything about this film is little short of amazing;
although it is not a horror film per se, it is more likely to evoke that
which the best horror films evoke than any recent horror film or
thriller.  That alone should get phans desperate for good horror cinema
to the box office with $7.50 proffered eagerly in outstretched hands.
If they look around, they'll see people who came for the cinematography
(by relative unknown Andrzej Sekula); for the music; for the acting; for
the dialogue.  The Phantom rarely recommends a film as strongly as he
does this one; not since HENRY has he been as excited about a new
release in his favorite genre -- even if it isn't really in his favorite
genre.  Neither horror nor exploitation, RESERVOIR DOGS is just good in
every way; and needless to say, it's well worth seeing.

Title
Review for Raising Cain (1992)
     Although the Phantom attempts to get his reviews written as soon
after he sees a film as possible (for otherwise real life and the
Phantom's day job have an unfortunate habit of intruding), some films
require a little thought before the Phantom can dash off a 1500-word
opinion with any hope of accuracy.  (By way of contrast, the Phantom's
review of BASIC INSTINCT practically wrote itself on the subway ride
home; even so, the Phantom has a feeling that he put more time and
effort into his review than Joe Eszterhas put into his ludicrous
screenplay.)
     This is the case with RAISING CAIN, the latest film by Brian De
Palma and one of the best thrillers of the year.  Only, as the credits
rolled and the Phantom left the theater, he felt that RAISING CAIN
really wasn't all that good -- that perhaps it had been over hyped, or
that perhaps De Palma was starting to play it safe now that he's
"mainstream."  Certainly it reminded the Phantom more than a little of
De Palma's DRESSED TO KILL, and put side by side with that classic,
RAISING CAIN doesn't really measure up.
     But then it occurred to the Phantom that he was about to review the
wrong film (no, he hadn't accidentlly walked into the horrifying,
special effects-bloated DEATH BECOMES HER playing in the theater next
door; although some tedious Hollywood literal-mindedness occasionally
seeped through the wall, and although the sound of 200 frustrated and
patronized adults shifting irritably in their seats was occasionally
audible, this only served to keep the Phantom in his own seat for the
duration of the film, even though he was at times tempted to duck his
head in and discover just exactly how many expensive special effects a
comedy needs to be really, really funny).  For most of RAISING CAIN, the
Phantom had unconsciously kept a number De Palma's early works in mind,
and he'd made the mistake of seeing RAISING CAIN only by way of
comparison to them.
     Yet this is exactly the wrong way to see the film, precisely
because De Palma hasn't made DRESSED TO KILL II.  Once the Phantom
realized this, he also realized how much of RAISING CAIN he'd really
missed -- while searching for the parallels between De Palma's latest
work and some of the films that made his reputation as one of our finest
directors (and perhaps the best horror filmmaker working today), the
Phantom wasn't really attending to the film De Palma had actually made.
     Instead of a rehashed, more-of-the-same Hitchcock homage (a la
DRESSED TO KILL, BLOW OUT, or BODY DOUBLE), De Palma has, with RAISING
CAIN, pretty much said "To hell with it -- let's get rid of the story
and the characters altogether, and see what we have left to work with."
The result is a patently preposterous plot peopled with a parade of
poorly drawn, two-dimensional characters -- and pretty much nothing
else.  (Please, no letters.  The Phantom meant to do that, and he's
truly sorry.)
     Nothing else, that is, except the complete freedom to indulge in
the most lyrical, fluid, gorgeous filmmaking of the year.  Nothing
anyone in RAISING CAIN does makes much sense; there are plot holes at
every twist and turn of an outlandishly twisty and turny plot;
characterization is established solely through cliche and lazy, easy
tricks of the screenplay; and each individual scene in the film could
easily have been lifted from one of De Palma's prior efforts.
     But to focus on this is to miss the point -- something not a few
other reviewers seem to have done.  De Palma didn't set out to make yet
another "Brian De Palma Film (pat. pending)" -- if that's what you're
looking for, the Phantom suggests that you instead rent one of his
previous efforts; with the single exception of the bewilderingly bad
BONFIRE OF THE VANITIES, all are worth your time and your attention.
     As is the very different RAISING CAIN.  On the surface, CAIN is
about Dr.  Carter Nix who -- in the words of Janet Maslin -- has at
least three more personalities than he really needs.  While Carter is
the perfect husband and father, Cain -- one of his wicked alter egos --
occasionally makes an appearance and works enough evil to keep the plot
moving along.  As Carter/Cain, John Lithgow is perfectly cast and
remains completely in control of his role(s) and the near-constant
screen time he gets throughout the film.  He is literally at the center
of this very warped fantasy, and the Phantom strongly suspects that a
lesser actor might have taken the opportunity to put in a truly
over-the-top and egotistical performance that would ignore De Palma's
careful balancing act.  One of the things that so distinguishes CAIN
from a multitude of multiple personality films is that it is not at all
a Jekyll and Hyde film.  Instead, De Palma has crafted a much more
subtle vision of a man who is helplessly out of control -- of his
actions as well as his very being.
     In a perfectly turned parallel to this, Lolita Davidovich plays
Carter's wife Jenny, a woman who -- like many of the women in De Palma's
films -- seems more than a little unfocused.  She has the same
dream-like quality about her that Angie Dickinson had in DRESSED TO
KILL, and her quest for a better understanding of who she is and what
she really wants both drives the plot and underscores Carter's own
struggles to remain the thoughtful husband and devoted father.  In fact,
picture for a moment the opening scene in DRESSED TO KILL and you'll
have a pretty good idea how most of RAISING CAIN plays out: using Jenny
as the catalyst, De Palma brings us into a world where it's as difficult
for us to sort out what is real and what is dream as it is for Carter.
Are we seeing what's really happening?  What someone is dreaming or
remembering?  Or what someone is fantasizing about?  At no point in
RAISING CAIN does De Palma ever give us the sort of solid ground that
we've been so conditioned to expect from a Hollywood film -- and for
that the Phantom is profoundly grateful.  RAISING CAIN is a lot of
things, but literal-minded it is not, and that is all too rare in
American film these days -- even in horror films and thrillers, where
one might reasonably expect the line between reality and nightmare to
become blurred.
     But Hollywood (and therefore American audiences) are rarely
comfortable with anything other than obvious plot twists and predictable
conclusions; we like our fantasies nice and tidy by the time the credits
roll, and woe be it to the filmmaker who goes too far out on a limb.
Though De Palma has cautiously (and sometimes not so cautiously) tested
that limb before, this time he's way out on the end and ready to take
the whole tree down with him.  Thus, although we never have the
opportunity to identify with the story's protagonist (in fact, RAISING
CAIN doesn't really have one), De Palma allows us to do something even
better, something even more rare: for two hours he allows us to *become*
Carter.
     It's a scary ride, and one that frequently treats logic as if it
were a four-letter word.  On the surface we can't help but be aware of
De Palma's utter disregard for an original plot, or even an unoriginal
one that makes sense.  But down below, where De Palma is really working
this time, is also where all the fun is; the trick is to put aside your
prejudices and your preconditioned desires for a simple and
understandable plot, sit back, and enjoy the ride.  Once you stop
worrying about whether something in RAISING CAIN could "really" have
happened, you'll see a much different film emerge, one which is
comprised of a series of overlapping scenarios each of which is filmed
and acted to perfection; each of which makes sense on its own; but none
of which really fit together very well.  (It's as if De Palma has given
us an IQ test consisting of various shapes and a box with
similarly-shaped cutouts -- but the only way to pass the test is to use
a hammer and steer clear of the ever-seductive cookie-cutter correctness
that has made so many mainstream films so dreadfully dull.)
     Inside the box are scenes filmed so as to turn lesser directors
green with envy; with the possible exceptions of Stanley Kubrick, Ridley
Scott, Spike Lee and the Coen brothers, no one makes films that look
this good.  RAISING CAIN is exciting on a fundamental, visual level in a
way that very few other mainstream films are; regardless of what you
think about it, the Phantom is willing to bet that you'll remember
vividly many of the scenes in RAISING CAIN long after you've left the
theater.  
     Also inside the box is a sort of free-floating sense of dread that
-- like De Palma's startlingly photography -- is similarly absent from
most of the run-of-the-mill thrillers churned out by Hollywood hacks
each year.  It's a disquieting sense of menace that we've felt before in
bits of De Palma's other films (in the outdoor restaurant scene in THE
FURY; in the lead-up to the climactic scene in CARRIE; in Angie
Dickinson's silent tour of an art museum in DRESSED TO KILL), but here
it engulfs the film whole; without a well-drawn and logical plot to keep
it outside of our focus of attention, it creeps up on us just minutes
into the film and never really goes away.  We just don't know what's
going to happen next in RAISING CAIN, and De Palma ably capitalizes on
our sense of unease as he piles on scene after unlikely scene of terror
and suspense.  It's the end of CARRIE writ large[*]: there are so many
opportunities for a hand to spring out of a fresh grave that we find we
must either reject the film entirely or surrender ourselves to a two
hour-long nightmare.
     Having achieved his aim through guerrilla filmmaking, De Palma
leaves out the gore this time; he also leaves out the in-jokes (no
drills, phans) and the incessant references to Hitchcock.  Some
reviewers have remarked that CAIN is nothing but a reworking of PSYCHO,
but they're misguided.  De Palma did PSYCHO in DRESSED TO KILL, and
while he uses elements of it to establish the framework of RAISING CAIN,
he's obviously not out to do another Hitchcock homage.
     RAISING CAIN has more in common with the equally dreamlike JACOB'S
LADDER than it does with any of Hitchcock's films (with the possible
exception of THE BIRDS); the Phantom only hopes that CAIN does better at
the box office.  Despite a pedestrian ending that in ten minutes
attempts to wrap up the visual nightmare of the previous 120, audiences
found JACOB'S LADDER to be too joyously untethered from reality for
their made-in-Hollywood tastes.  It would be a real shame if RAISING
CAIN suffered a similar fate at the box office because too many people
dissuaded their friends from attending a film that "doesn't make sense"
or that doesn't have a neat and predictable ending.  Yet given the
immense popularity of films like BASIC INSTINCT -- films that are
unrelentingly stupid but that are literal-minded to the core -- the
Phantom fears that audiences will react to CAIN much the way they did to
De Palma's CASUALTIES OF WAR, itself a casualty of our need for films to
take us away from real life, yet allow us to keep our feet firmly
planted on the ground and our minds firmly reassured by pat endings and
ever-clear lines between reality and fantasy.
     People have said that Brian De Palma is not a "normal" director,
that his films are too dark and that he is too drawn to humanity's evil
side.  In the past he's attempted to dress up his dark visions with
Hitchcock's respectable clothing; now he's done away with the window
dressing and let us come along with him on a very naked and effective
exploration of evil, of the blurry line between reality and illusion,
and of his own singular vision of terror.  RAISING CAIN is without a
doubt one of De Palma's best films; if nothing else, it's the most
unrestrained and inventive film he's made in years.
     No thumbs up or down -- but if you're a horror phan, or if you're
in the mood for a thriller that thrills on so many different levels, you
owe it to yourself to see just what a master of the art can do in this
genre.  More than worth full price: it's worth seeing twice.
[*] N.B.: Please, no letters.  The Phantom promises not to use the
phrase "writ large" ever again; chalk it up to a Modern American Film
101 flashback and to the Phantom's desire to give his spell-checker a
workout.  Webster's New World notes that when used this way, "writ" is
"Rare or Archaic" -- either way, a perfect reflection of the Phantom's
own writing style.

Title
Review for Crow, The (1994)
     All the ingredients were there--that's for sure.  Friday night
in Times Square, sitting in a just-this-side-of-sleazy movie theater
among the kind of audience that can really make a picture like this.
We had KFC on the right, and--not to put too blunt a point on it--a
certain controlled substance on the left.  And the movie itself?  Well,
what more could one ask for than Brandon Lee coming back from the dead
to settle and old score in the most violent way possible?
     And yet it didn't take too long for the Phantom to realize that
things were not going as planned.  He should have been having a great
time watching THE CROW--reveling in the soundtrack, the slick
cinematography, the timeless theme of revenge, revenge, and more
revenge.  But instead he (and the rest of the audience) was growing
increasingly restless; it seemed for a while that the entire auditorium
was in perfect psychic sync: all of a sudden, 400 perfect strangers
found that their expectations were not being met.
     It took a while for the Phantom to figure out why he wasn't
enjoying THE CROW as much as he expected to, but somewhere between the
opening narration (always a worrisome sign in a genre picture; after
all, what could possibly be unclear about someone returning from the
grave to seek vengeance on those who put him there?); the fourth camera
swoop through the miniature Gotham that is its setting; and the tenth
bucketful of rain that comes close on the heels of at least a thousand
more, it became clear.  Too much style, and not nearly enough attention
to what makes a good genre picture good.
     People are often fooled into believing that action, horror, or
exploitation films are easy to make, but they're not.  Though they may
not require inspired writing, acting, or plotting, genre pictures do
require solid direction, if only to make up for the lack of nearly
everything but a straight-ahead story and good special effects.  Steven
Spielberg--who is responsible for four of the best genre pictures of
our time (DUEL, JAWS, POLTERGEIST, and most recently JURASSIC PARK) --
knows this, which is why his latest blockbuster opens not with
ponderous narration by a precocious, death-culture waif, but with
someone being eaten by a dinosaur run amok.  Consider what happens
during the first 10 minutes of DIE HARD or LETHAL WEAPON, and you'll
understand why John McTiernan and Richard Donner are among the best at
what they do.
     Straight-ahead action, horror, or revenge is best accomplished
without a lot of window dressing, but although THE CROW is a genre
picture to the core, so much time and energy are spent making it look
alternately like BATMAN, BLADE RUNNER and any of a number of "stylish"
videos on MTV that it's sometimes hard to tell. Although Miramax and
Dimension would very much like you to believe that THE CROW is a
mainstream film, it's not.  Not even close.  For underneath the by now
familiar urban dystopia setting; the death culture gloss; the trendy
soundtrack filled with retailer-friendly cuts by industrial/alternative
bands; Brandon Lee himself, who until his untimely death as a result of
a stunt mishap always seemed to be on the brink of major mainstream
success--underneath all of this lies the cold-blooded heart of a
sleazy revenge flick.  Take all the window dressing away (and there may
perhaps be more window dressing than window in THE CROW) and you're
left with THE EXTERMINATOR.  And much as the Phantom enjoys a good
revenge flick, he knows full well that very few other people do --
crows or no crows.
     Too, revenge flicks need to be carefully crafted.  THE
EXTERMINATOR, like DEATH WISH before it, succeeds where many pretenders
fail, by placing the audience in the position of an average man who
suffers a terrible wrong and does what he must to put things right
(which always means taking revenge; after all, no one in his right mind
is going to pony up $7.50 to see 90 minutes of personal injury
litigation).  James Glickenhaus has some feeling for this particular
cinematic niche, and his exceedingly seedy film works precisely because
it is so completely straightforward.  The "everyman" in his film could
be any man in the audience; when he goes about methodically taking his
revenge (and employing some particularly inventive ways of dispatching
the bad guys), we're with him precisely because he is so completely
two-dimensional.  To put it another way, THE EXTERMINATOR succeeds as a
revenge flick in large part because it is *not* stylishly filmed;
because it *isn't* raining all the time; and because no one crawls out
of a grave and dresses himself up as a mime with a very bad attitude.
     Well, maybe not a mime, but Lee does go to some lengths to look
like the lead singer of The Cure (or, come to think of it, of The Black
Crowes, which seems appropriate).  It's not every corpse that enjoys
access to water-proof theatrical makeup, but hey, that's this film's
schtick.  That and the crow who serves as Robin (so to speak) to Lee's
Batman--it is the source of his superhuman powers as well as an
early-warning system that lets Lee see things from a bird's eye view.
All of this is fine and well; perhaps a little much for a movie about a
guy who finds and kills the bad guys who seriously aggrieved him, but
it's workable.  What is less workable is all the window dressing that
the filmmakers obviously felt compelled to pile on top of such a slight
plot.  Had THE CROW stuck to basics, it might have worked better than
it does.  But then it wouldn't be THE CROW; nor would it any longer be
based on the successful comic book character of the same name.
     But style (and exposition) in a comic book don't obscure action,
whereas on the screen that's all they can do.  The Phantom presumes
that a lengthy preparation for The Crow's return from the grave works
reasonably well in a comic book; on the screen, however, it seems like
nothing more than the worst kind of wheel-spinning.  The idea that a
crow guides souls from the land of the living to the land of the dead
(and sometimes back again when they have some unfinished business to
take care of) is not one that requires a lot of explanation, and yet
explanation is all we get for the first 10 minutes of the film.  Even
after Lee crawls out of the grave, it seems like we endure another 10
minutes of pointless flashbacks before the film finally gets into
gear.  Perhaps only the Phantom believes that THE CROW might be a lot
more enjoyable had Lee simply climbed out of the grave and killed
someone in the first 10 minutes; instead we get an overwhelming amount
of exposition, narration, and ultimately frustration as the filmmakers
succumb to the worst case of Enterprise-itis since STAR TREK: THE
MOTION PICTURE.  Do the obvious miniatures that comprise THE CROW's
obvious tribute to BLADE RUNNER and BATMAN's Gotham look good?  Yes, at
first.  The very first time the camera swoops through the city streets,
over rooftops and down alleyways, it looks pretty good.  The second
time it looks a little less good.  The third time the Phantom started
worrying that the filmmakers might have even more miniatures in store
for him--perhaps the camera would swoop through miniature cow
pastures and past miniature 7-11's, around miniature farm animals and
miniature Big Gulps.  After the third time, the Phantom lost count, but
suffice it to say that the budget did not permit any more interesting
swoops--THE CROW sticks loyally to the three-square-block radius of
miniatures it can afford.  By the last swoop, it seemed to the Phantom
that the filmmakers needed only a jolly king, a trolley, and Mr. Rogers
dressed in black to complete the transformation from urban dystopia to
Evil Land of Make Believe.
     Putting aside a setting which even the characters themselves feel
compelled to comment on (says the annoying little girl who --
incredibly--serves as the only character with which we can identify:
"It can't rain all the time, can it?"  "Not all the time," answers
Lee.  "I'm sure it will," replied a waterlogged Phantom who at that
point in the film had thoughts of a warm and dry bed dancing in his
head), there's the cinematography, which is--without trying very
hard--the absolute worst of every music video cliche of the past few
years.  This is not entirely unexpected--after all, the director Alex
Proyas does quite well for himself directing commercials and music
videos in Australia--and yet it still took the Phantom aback.  What on
earth was all this fancy camera work doing in an action film?  Didn't
anyone associated with the production realize that action sequences
cannot be shot as if they were music videos or Diet Pepsi commercials?
Or that music videos can support the kind of jumpy, hyper-stylish
camera work that so plagues THE CROW precisely because they are not
required to maintain any sort of coherent narrative flow?  Strobe
lights, incessant rain, a camera that can't stop jumping around--this
is not the formula for a successful film of any kind, let alone an
action film.  After all, what good is a fight sequence if you can't
tell where anyone is, what they're doing, or who they're shooting at?
As coldly stylish as BLADE RUNNER was, at least Ridley Scott knew
enough to leave the camera in one place long enough for his audience to
get a feeling for where they were and what was going on.  Proyas lets
his cinematographer Dariusz Wolski (who is actually quite talented when
someone keeps him from going over the music video edge) run hog wild,
and the film suffers for it.
     The real problem with THE CROW, however, would exist even had the
entire picture been shot sans MTV fireworks.  The real problem is with
Lee's character, a small-time rock star who finds himself crawling out
of his own grave one evening because his great love for his fiancee has
prevented his soul from resting.  Assuming that the filmmakers wanted
to play this for straight horror, it would have worked almost as is.
But they don't--they want us to identify with Lee and so pile on
flashback after flashback showing Lee and his fiancee acting as if they
were in a extra-long Levis commercial: smiling, hugging each other,
having goofy stove-related accidents while making dinner ("We'll eat
out" declares Lee as his fiancee sets fire to a pot), lighting candles,
making love. This goes on and on, all throughout the film, and to what
purpose the Phantom cannot imagine. Because all the flashbacks do
nothing more than expose the paradox at the heart of THE CROW: if Lee
is such a wonderful, sweet-hearted guy, what on earth is he doing
dispatching the four people who killed him and raped and killed his
fiancee a year before?  And in ways gruesome enough to give even James
Glickenhaus pause?  If he's so nice, what is he doing stabbing a pawn
shop dealer in the hand and blowing up his store?  Is this guy THE CROW
or THE PUNISHER?
     Since a movie about an enraged mime with a bird on his shoulder
killing four neighborhood thugs wouldn't be long enough for theatrical
release, the plot is padded with a number of scenes involving Sarah,
the death-culture waif who hung around with Lee and his fiancee before
their untimely deaths.  Sarah exists as another mainstream sop--it
seems that in addition to making him a supernatural, revenge-crazed
killer, the screenplay has also tossed in a caring, tender side for Lee
to juggle.  One moment he's brutally killing a thug; the next he's
helping to reform Sarah's mother by leading her away from a life of
drug addiction and prostitution.  (By the way, the Phantom is fairly
sure that he was not alone in feeling puzzled by the earnest anti-drug
and anti-smoking messages in THE CROW.  Brutal vigilante revenge?
That's fine!  But just say no to anything you might want to inhale.)
     But although the scenes showing Lee's sensitive side do help pad
things out a bit (while making far worse the central paradox of the
film), the screenplay can't stop there.  Instead, in a futile attempt
at BATMAN-ization, the filmmakers throw in scene after scene of Top
Dollar (that's his name, believe it or not), who plays the Mr. Big of
THE CROW's Gotham, acting malevolently.  It seems that Top Dollar and
his henchmen are responsible for all the crime in the city, including
the "Devil's Night" fires that the camera swoops past once or twice
near the beginning of the film.  How is he tied to Lee?  Well, it seems
that he ordered some of his henchmen to clear out an apartment
building, and things got out of hand.  This (very) loose tie enables
the filmmakers to steer the CROW in a more BATMAN-like direction, but
it happens far too late in the proceedings to make much difference.
There's a lot of mumbo-jumbo by Top Dollar's Asian half-sister/lover;
people's eyeballs are bandied about; and meanwhile the audience is left
to wonder why, if Top Dollar is the King of all Bad Guys, he can't get
a decent hair cut.
     As Lee moves toward the final, inevitable confrontation with Top
Dollar, the last of THE CROW's major flaws is revealed to us.  Because
he's back from the dead and out for justice, it seems that Lee cannot
be permanently injured or killed.  If he's shot or stabbed, his wounds
disappear (courtesy of the hard-working folks at Dream Quest) T2-like,
which must have seemed very cool to the filmmakers.  But as it happens,
Lee's superhuman abilities do more to throw THE CROW off track than all
the rain and fancy camera work combined.  After all, if Lee is never in
any danger, what's the fun?  Do people really want to see a film in
which an invincible "good guy" finds and brutally kills four bad guys?
Even as one who loves the genre, the Phantom quickly realized that he,
for one, did not.
     It remains to be seen how well THE CROW will do.  Certainly the
film will benefit from Lee's untimely death and from the publicity
surrounding it and the digital tricks the filmmakers played to continue
shooting without him.  There was something undeniably spooky about
seeing Brandon Lee claw his way out of a grave; but one spooky scene
doesn't pay the rent.  As for the rest of the film, THE CROW is as good
an example as any of how good ideas can go wrong as they're
transplanted from one medium to another, and how--once
again--filmmakers can underestimate the effort and talent needed to
produce a quality genre picture.  THE CROW has all the right elements,
but the mix is all wrong.  And it is truly a shame that in real life
Lee won't be able to come back and do it again--but this time do it
right.

Title
Review for Body Parts (1991)
     BODY PARTS ends this summer's horror drought, but what we horror
phans get is less a downpour than a light summer drizzle.  Summertime is
traditionally a slow time for horror films -- the industry assumes that
folks would rather see people killed and dismembered by heroes than
serial killers and so serves up T2 and other such wholesome fare -- and
we phans don't usually get something to sink our fangs into until late
August or early September.  
     This year, however, we have an early entry that provides a
much-needed counterpoint to the seemingly endless stream of moralizing
that's being churned out of Hollywood this summer.  With all these films
about nasty and greedy eighties types getting rehabilitated into caring
and feeling Kevin Costner clones, the Phantom has been more than a
little worried that two of his favorite eighties holdovers -- Freddy and
Chucky, both due for a return appearance next month -- will similarly
renounce their selfish and destructive ways and learn to center
themselves in the universe and live in peace with those around them.
     So it was with high hopes that the Phantom bought his popcorn and
settled his Nikes into the newly resurfaced floor of the Embassy 2
theater in the heart of New York's own living reason to regret the
eighties, Times Square.  (The Great White Way was the centerpiece of
some misguided "urban renewal" that the plunging stock and real estate
markets soon put an end to.  In fact, the Embassy is situated right next
to an empty and unfinished 50-story skyscraper owned by a bankrupt
developer, repossessed by a bankrupt bank, and now serving as lighthouse
for those foolhardy enough to sail the troubled seas of New York's real
estate market.)  Alas, the floor of the Embassy commanded the Phantom's
attention far more than did the film; and there's no doubt that it will
stick with him far longer.
     BODY PARTS is a film that turns out to be all too true to its name.
Starting with the credits, which are each assembled from bits and pieces
of previous credits; to the plot, which appears to have been pasted
together from two or three different films; to the dialogue, which can
only be described as unspeakable; BODY PARTS feels a lot like there was
a mix-up of sorts at Paramount while they were working on FRIDAY THE
13TH PART 14: THE SORRY AFTERMATH.  Somehow or other, the editors
managed to splice a good bit of an exceedingly average Tales >From the
Darkside with some of Jason's outtakes.  Instead of wrapping the result
with twine and putting it out on the curb for that week's celluloid
recycling pickup, someone decided to make the most of it and make a
movie of it.  High on the Phantom's Christmas list for Paramount is two
or three extra balls of twine and a sharp pair of scissors so that this
sort of thing never happens again.  After all, one can never have too
much twine or too many pairs of scissors.
     The saddest part of all this is that there really haven't been many
(any?) good "medical-experiment-gone-awry" horror films.  Nor have
there been a surfeit of "limbs-with-minds-of-their-own" films, though at
least Oliver Stone gave it a go in 1981 with his rather loopy horror
film, THE HAND.  On the other hand (sorry, couldn't resist), there have
been many too many horror films that fail to deliver more than
bottom-of-the-barrel slash and trash thrills.  After all, such films
require more special effects and Spring-Loaded Cats than they do
directorial skill or originality, and we all know which is easier to
come by.  Yet the premise of BODY PARTS is so promising, and its
suspiciously early release date -- so ghoulishly close to the discovery
of some very nasty business in Milwaukee -- almost insures a certain
amount of prurient public interest in the subject.  So why does it seem
that the makers of BODY PARTS did all they could to keep their film from
the terrible taint of originality or interest?
     The bare bones of the story, after all, hold great promise.  Bill
Chrushank is a mild-mannered psychiatrist who spends his days trying to
understand the psychology of inmates on death row and his nights with
his beautiful wife, his beautiful kids, and his gorgeous house in the
idyllic suburbs (as Vincent Canby of the New York Times puts it, "the
Chrushanks, at least in movie terms, might as well have bull's-eyes on
their backs.").  Sure enough, one fine morning he makes the near-fatal
mistake of paying more attention to his work as he navigates a crowded
highway than he does to his seat-belt or the car in front of him and its
rather loose and unreliable-looking rear wheel.  Sure enough, tragedy
strikes, and his wife is informed at the hospital that although he will
live, his right arm could not be saved.  And sure enough, through a
miracle of modern science and movie coincidence, another right arm is
available and can be grafted onto Bill's body the moment his wife signs
at the dotted line (the contract she signs presumably indemnifies the
filmmakers should Bill's right arm decide to review the film).  There's
only one problem, however: Bill's right arm originally belonged to a
brutal murderer who was just put to death.
     Once Bill recovers the fun starts.  It seems that Bill suffers from
terrible nightmares and that his arm doesn't always do what he wants it
to do -- or does it?  One of the great tragedies of BODY PARTS is that
such an interesting question is quickly cast aside, the better to make
way for the unoriginal and uninteresting antics that comprise the film's
second half.  What a terrible waste, though, for by ignoring that simple
and subtle proposition -- that since the arm can't do anything that Bill
doesn't want it to, perhaps Bill the mild-mannered psychiatrist is in
fact Bill the homicidal killer -- the filmmakers also manage to ignore
the one aspect of their story that could lift BODY PARTS from the ranks
of the banal and the inept and place it among the true classics of the
genre.  (Phans who want a taste of what BODY PARTS might have been had
it been more ably handled should rent BRAIN DEAD, a classic
is-he-or-isn't-he tale of psychological horror.)
     Instead, it becomes apparent very early on that Bill's arm does, in
fact, act on its own -- that it is still, in some way, under the control
of its original owner.  To be honest, it doesn't even do all that much
-- after all, since it's still attached to Bill (unlike Michael Caine's
severed hand in THE HAND), the most it could legitimately do is cut Bill
while he shaves in the morning or strangle his wife while he sleeps at
night.  A film based on such restricted mayhem would be even less
interesting than is BODY PARTS, and in fact BODY PARTS ends up focusing
less on Bill and his arm and more on what happened to the rest of the
executed killer's various parts.  As it happens, his other arm and both
of his legs turn up, each attached to another lucky accident victim.
(There were more than a few snide remarks passed through the largely
uninvolved audience at the Embassy about certain other of the killer's
parts and what they might be up to, but we'll leave those speculations
for BODY PARTS 2, or perhaps PARTY BODS 2, a film that would at least be
able to generate more audience involvement than the one presently being
reviewed.)  It gives nothing away to say that these poor folks also
might just as well have had bull's-eyes on their backs, for they all but
wear red shirts (in the classic security-guard-marked-for-death Star
Trek tradition) in the film.  Fortunately, one of the lucky organ
recipients is Brad Dourif, who does what he can to enliven the otherwise
leaden proceedings around him.  Unfortunately, we are graced by his
lunatic presence for only about 20 minutes or so during the exceedingly
average Tales From the Darkside section of the film.  (The Phantom is,
however, heartened by the thought that Mr.  Dourif will be back next
month as the voice of Chucky in CHILD'S PLAY 3.)
     Of course, once the film acknowledges the fact that the strange
goings-on are neither in Bill's mind nor caused by either of his arms,
BODY PARTS gets seriously bogged down and the filmmakers, with a slight
air of desperation, resort to sweeping the cutting room floor for
inspiration.  So in short order we're treated to bits and pieces of THE
STEPFATHER, some operating room hacking and sawing, a couple of
Jasonized killings, and the aforementioned bit from an exceedingly
average Tales From the Darkside episode.  Alas, the whole in this case
doesn't equal the sum of its parts -- body or otherwise -- and as the
filmmakers finally settle on a truly loopy ending involving an evil
doctor and some serious malpractice, the audience comes to realize that
if anyone's arm was going to be cut off, it should have been the
writer's.
     Having said all this, the Phantom should add that BODY PARTS isn't
all bad, even if it is mostly dumb.  To its credit, it has been graced
with good direction and excellent editing, both of which insure that the
film can get down to its terminally silly plot with a minimum of wasted
time and effort.  The film's score, as well, is excellent, and it goes a
long way toward establishing an appropriately chilling mood throughout
the film and during its (very) few scary scenes.  Without the talented
direction, editing, and music, BODY PARTS would be all but unbearable.
As it is, it is merely inept and unoriginal, a film that wastes a
perfectly good story idea on a perfectly ordinary script.  
     Much of the Phantom's negative reaction to this film is his
knowledge that in surer and more able hands, BODY PARTS could have been
so much better than it is.  As it stands, the film needs both
intelligence and and originality transplants, and horror-starved phans
would do well to avoid this film until it reaches their local
Blockbusters this winter.  About the only reason to go see BODY PARTS
now is to be sure to see the latest preview for the upcoming ADDAMS
FAMILY film; sadly enough, the first 30 seconds of this preview are
scarier, more entertaining and more involving than the whole of the
feature film that follows.

Title
Review for Sleepwalkers (1992)
     The Phantom hardly knows where to start.  He supposes that he
should begin by pointing out that SLEEPWALKERS is not still another in a
long line of perfectly awful Stephen King adaptations, in part because
Stephen King apparently wrote the original screenplay himself.  And in
part because it is not, in fact, perfectly awful.  It's only imperfectly
awful, which is certainly a step in the right direction, coming as
SLEEPWALKERS does fast on the heels of THE LAWNMOWER MAN, yet another
spiritless, insipid, King-inspired horror film in the grand tradition of
CHILDREN OF THE CORN and MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE.
     In fact, in many ways, SLEEPWALKERS is really quite good, although
it hardly qualifies as a horror classic.  Or a good Stephen King tale.
Or even a film that's worth going too far out of your way to see.  By
now, many phans will have read the early reviews in the Usenet movies
newsgroups and concluded from the sheer uniformity of their
recommendations that SLEEPWALKERS isn't worth their time, and that they
would be better off spending their $7.50 on that new and rather
frighteningly politically correct animated film about rain forests.
After all, although SLEEPWALKERS features gore galore -- a surprising
amount of it, considering that it's a major studio release -- it does
not as well feature the twin bonuses of seeing Sharon Stone naked every
5 minutes and Michael Douglas walk around without any pants on.
Fiscally prudent filmgoers are always looking to get the most for their
money, and in this respect SLEEPWALKERS doesn't even come close to more
socially acceptable films like BASIC INSTINCT.
     However, this is not to say that SLEEPWALKERS is entirely without
merit (observant phans will note that saying that a film is not entirely
without merit is among the highest praise the Phantom has ever lavished
on a King adaptation, MISERY excepted).  It may in fact be most
enjoyable to those phans who can spot all the other films that get
ripped off (or are paid homage to, if you -- like Brian DePalma --
prefer to think of it in slightly more civil terms); certainly that was
one of the reasons the Phantom had a fairly good time throughout most of
the film.  And the ripoffs come fast and furious, starting with BLUE
VELVET and continuing with, among others, NEAR DARK, AN AMERICAN
WEREWOLF IN LONDON, THE SHINING, NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD and LIFEFORCE.
And those are just the ones that come to mind as the Phantom writes this
paragraph; chances are that another half dozen will occur to him before
he finishes this review.
     The story, such as it is, revolves a mother and son family of
"sleepwalkers," a race of beings the film helpfully defines for us as
perhaps the forerunners of those creatures we call vampires.  They, like
vampires, need human blood to remain forever young; however, unlike
vampires they don't mind daylight, don't have to sleep in coffins, and
tend to hang around cemeteries only if they're on a date or having a
picnic.  And they're deathly afraid of cats.  (That's with a lowercase
"c," rather than "Cats" the Broadway show; the Phantom can sympathize
with both fears, though only because he suffers from occasional cat
hair-induced allergies and is not otherwise predisposed to like animals
who deposit dead rodents on one's bed.  And Andrew Lloyd Weber's
perpetual-money-machine still gives him the chills whenever he passes it
on his way to some form of entertainment that doesn't require grown
adults to look like living outtakes from THE WIZARD OF OZ.)
     Why they should be so afraid of cats is -- like so many other
things -- never adequately explained by King's near-illiterate script.
Yet because Mick Garris (the director) keeps the film rolling along, we
don't generally have time to think about its seemingly endless supply of
absurdities.  In fact, Garris does about as well as can be expected from
any director given the material with which he had to work; the Phantom
was pleasantly surprised at the number of Raimi-esque touches throughout
the film, and he is heartened to think that directors other than Sam
Raimi, Brian DePalma, the Coen brothers and Stanley Kubrick may
occasionally try camera angles other than those approved by the
television networks for their ever-so-inventive movie-of-the-week
presentations.  (With luck, we'll see something else from Mr.  Garris
sometime soon; with hope, it will be something with a significantly
better screenplay.)
     We are also treated to "discount morphing" every 10 minutes or so,
presumably because the film's budget could not justify even more
morphing than that.  "Morphing," as those who follow the special effects
industry, watch Michael Jackson's videos, or have seen TERMINATOR 2 --
that is, presumably everyone in the world -- know, is the
less-impressive-with-every-viewing effect that shows one object smoothly
transforming into another.  For example, imagine the auditorium in a
theater showing SLEEPWALKERS on successive Friday nights: if seen in
fast motion, the appearance would be of a room growing steadily more and
more empty, as a packed house on opening night smoothly transforms into
a near-empty auditorium just two weeks later.  (In fact, the Phantom
suspects that the theater manager at the Loews Astor Plaza in New York
City -- one of the largest theaters on the east coast -- will have a
pretty good feel for the delightful "morphing" effect by the end of
April, as he counts the days until the May 15th release of LETHAL 3 will
again allow him to fill the 1000 seats in his theater.)
     As if that weren't enough, we also get a healthy dose of splatter
as people's hands are ripped off, fingers are chewed off, arms and necks
are lacerated by knives and glass, eardrums are pierced and bodies are
set on fire; apparently the MPAA has fled the country after having given
BASIC INSTINCT their seal of approval for our nation's
ever-impressionable youth and no one is minding the censorship store.
(Hint to George Romero: re-edit and -release your DEAD films ASAP and
see if the MPAA will give them a pass this time around if you throw in a
naked bisexual bleached blonde or two.  After all, cannibalism, ice-pick
murders -- what's the difference, really, as long as it's between
consenting adults?)  The Phantom is, of course, the last to mourn our
nation's moral disintegration, and far be it for him to complain that a
film has perhaps one too many scenes of someone losing a body part;
still, for a film that is advertised in such a wholesome way and has so
many attempts at levity scattered throughout it to descend to point
where it feels it must swing half-cats at the screen -- the Phantom
supposes he should consider himself fortunate that SLEEPWALKERS wasn't
filmed in headache-inducing "Freddy-Vision" -- well something seems just
a little amiss.
     What's amiss, as it turns out, is apparently a coherent story, or
at least one that's not filled with so many plot holes that the
filmmakers feel they must resort to every horror cliche in the book to
compensate.  The biggest problem, as the Phantom has already mentioned,
is the film's atrocious script, a problem that must be laid directly at
the feet of the master of horror himself, a man who with SLEEPWALKERS
can't seem to keep himself focused on a single, tellable tale.  Although
100-page-long digressions are always welcome in the context of King's
cinder-block-shaped novels, they simply do not belong in a film that is
only 90 minutes long.  And the answer is not to make the film even
longer; instead, the answer is to confine oneself as a writer or
director to a single story idea that can be told well on film.  This is
something that Kathryn Bigelow did to perfection with her excellent
first feature, NEAR DARK, a film which will likely remain the final word
on modern retellings of the vampire legend for quite some time; it's
also a film that is "paid homage to" throughout SLEEPWALKERS.
Unfortunately, the effect of this is to make us wish we'd taken our
$7.50 to Blockbusters and rented NEAR DARK instead of using it to
encourage Stephen King to write still more bad screenplays and
collaborate in yet another disappointing horror film.
     King's script veers all over the place, from allusions to BLUE
VELVET and NEAR DARK to wholesale ripoffs of AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN
LONDON (the Phantom counted 2 complete scenes that were lifted directly
from John Landis' far superior film, and he was hardly paying attention
most of the time), and along the way King has his characters behaving in
the most ridiculous and unlikely ways imaginable.  Going on a first date
with the mysterious but charming new boy in town?  Why not have a picnic
at Homestead Cemetery, apparently your staid Midwestern town's version
of lovers' lane?  Trapped in your home by hundreds of extremely
domesticated and unthreatening-looking house cats?  Why not avoid at all
costs the acquisition of 6 large Dobermans, each of whom could eat a
dozen of those cats for lunch without working up a sweat, in favor of a
single ineffectual bear trap?  And on and on; it's almost as if King
were saying to us, "I have no respect at all for your intelligence, so
I'll just have my characters do the most expedient thing possible to
move my screenplay forward."  The shame of it is that in his novels,
King takes the trouble to give his characters something at least
resembling motivation, and in general he doesn't have them behave like
complete idiots most of the time.  His screenplays, however, have been
uniformly contemptuous of the audience; either that, or he doesn't take
writing for the screen as seriously as he does writing for the New York
Times best seller list.
     SLEEPWALKERS also suffers from a bad case of Freddy-itis (the
tendency to crack wise when the film would do better maintaining a
serious tone) at times, and the film overall amounts to much less than
the sum of its parts, perhaps due to King's inability to focus, or
perhaps due to the extremely artificial look of the film itself, which
appears to have been shot entirely indoors on a back lot somewhere far
away from the Midwest.
     That said, the Phantom should note that SLEEPWALKERS is enjoyable
enough as these exercises in parting gullible filmgoers from their
entertainment dollars go (phans may remember that the Phantom enjoyed
William Friedkin's even more loopy 1990 film THE GUARDIAN; if the
Phantom can find evil trees and Druid nannies entertaining, he can
certainly be diverted by wholesale gore and discount morphing).  Garris
keeps the film moving, and many individual scenes are quite effective.
And if one can overlook the inevitable scenes of people in giant,
unlikely-looking bug suits (or perhaps they were giant cat suits -- the
light was bad and it was difficult to tell, though mercifully no one
started singing "Memories"), and the few brief scenes in which fat and
lazy-looking housecats bestir themselves and leap unlikely distances to
attack the sleepwalkers -- scenes that brought back fond memories of
MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL's killer rabbit -- then it is quite
possible to enjoy SLEEPWALKERS for what it is: a few good ideas,
well-handled by a talented director and special-effects crew but
ultimately sabotaged by a writer who should stick to paperbacks.
     (Goodness, even the Phantom's obligatory "that said" paragraph
ended on a critical note.  Perhaps SLEEPWALKERS doesn't even deserve a
"that said," though the Phantom did in fact enjoy parts of the film.
It's certainly a better film than THE LAWNMOWER MAN, and the Phantom can
without difficulty think of many worse horror films that have been
released in the past year or so -- CHILD'S PLAY 3 comes quickly to mind,
as does the final nail in the ELM STREET coffin, FREDDY'S DEAD.  It's
worth a rental, so be sure to visit your local Blockbusters in about 4
months.  In the meantime, phans would do well to rent any of the films
to which SLEEPWALKERS "pays homage," but especially Kathryn Bigelow's
horror classic, NEAR DARK, a film that proves -- once again, and most
theatrical horror releases to the contrary -- that low-budget horror can
be both literate and very entertaining.)
     (Second of three parenthetical paragraphs: phans should note that
the BASIC INSTINCT of horror is already available as Tobe Hooper's
extremely silly and quite frankly terrible LIFEFORCE.  Naked bleached
blonde space vampires abound, though sadly there are no messy ice-pick
murders.  At Blockbusters everywhere, under "B" for bad.)
     (Finally, a point in SLEEPWALKERS' favor: it has a surprisingly low
Spring-Loaded Cat quotient, given the considerable temptations the
filmmakers must have felt.  Kudos to Garris for keeping the cats-in-
the-closet, 120dB ringing telephones, and hands-on-the-shoulder to a
minimum.)

Title
Review for Return of the Living Dead 3 (1993)
     It's been a while since the Phantom has seen a good, solid horror
film, and to be honest he went into RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 with a
certain amount of trepidation.  After all, although the first
installment in this series was a top-notch horror/comedy, well directed
by Dan O'Bannon (of DARK STAR fame and one of the creative forces
behind ALIEN), its sequel was a complete botch--an utterly
forgettable, poorly-made rip-off of its popular and successful
predecessor.  Sadly, that's often the way with sequels; although on
occasion a TERMINATOR will pave the way for a T2, an ALIEN for an
ALIENS, more often than not we go from the pinnacle of happiness with
the witty and original ROBOCOP to the depths of despair with the stupid
and mean-spirited ROBOCOP 2.
     Bad sequels are even worse than bad original films, since not only
do they disappoint us while we're watching them--they also cheapen
their fine predecessors and perhaps even make us forget why we ever
liked them in the first place.  (Most of the recent NIGHTMARE ON ELM
STREET sequels are like this; ever since DREAM CHILD, it's been
difficult for the Phantom to remember what was so fresh and original
about Wes Craven's take on the sometimes porous barrier between our
nightmares and reality.)
     So RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 turned out to be a nice surprise
indeed, a well-made and literate film, balancing its obligatory zombie
effects and gore with interesting characters and a thoughtful
screenplay.  And enhancing the theater-going experience still further:
the Criterion theater, conveniently located in the heart of Times
Square and currently quite ably defending its reputation as the
premiere palace of sleazy cinema in midtown Manhattan.  Although United
Artists has spent a considerable sum of money on the Criterion over the
past few years (in order to differentiate it from the true slime-pits
on 42nd Street), the gentrification really hasn't taken hold--although
the basement theaters are somewhat nicer than they used to be (seeing a
film in one of the Criterion's fine basement theaters used to be a lot
like watching TV underneath a subway platform--rats, garbage and all),
most have almost entirely reverted to their former extremely sleazy
state: lots of people smoking (and not all King Tobacco); people
tending to amble in about 15 minutes into the film with their whole
families and a bucket of KFC; and of course, lots of unsolicited advice
from the audience to help the fictional characters on the screen guide
their next move.  No previews for the latest Merchant/Ivory snoozer,
THE REMAINS OF THE DAY; instead, we got MAN'S BEST FRIEND, the Robo-Dog
pic.  From the response in the theater, we're all looking forward to it
with great anticipation.  You just don't get this kind of experience
watching a video....
     So the environment was right for true horror film enjoyment.  Yet
the Phantom suspects that he would have enjoyed this film even had he
seen it in the worst possible environment for cinematic horror (any
theater on the Upper East Side, surrounded by Eurotrash who couldn't
get into whatever that week's hip Spanish sex farce happened to be);
perhaps it was just the chronic lack of good cinematic horror that did
it, but the Phantom found RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 to be standout
entertainment.
     The success of this film can be directly attributed to both its
screenplay and its director, Brian Yuzna, a veteran director of quality
horror films.  In fact Yuzna, who directed BRIDE OF REANIMATOR,
SOCIETY, and the best of the SILENT NIGHT, DEADLY NIGHT series (part
4), is one of our best horror film directors, right up there with Frank
Henenlotter, Sam Raimi and Stuart Gordon.  He has an eye for the
shocking, and there's nothing he loves more than gore.  Yet his films
don't shortchange the characters by relegating them to two-dimensional
bystander status; in particular, RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 is one of
the more literate and serious horror films in a while, reminiscent in
many ways of Romero's thoughtful DAY OF THE DEAD.  The point being that
while anyone with a sufficient budget can do gore, not everyone can
sustain an audience's interest with nothing more than good
characterization and dialogue (not to mention snappy editing, which is
very much in evidence here).  Yuzna is the director that Clive Barker
wishes he could be.
     But although he had to labor mightily against the constraints of a
very low budget, Brian Yuzna handles the well-written screenplay with
his usual flair and has produced a winner.  In fact, he shows real
courage by inviting comparisons to both Clive Barker and George
Romero's best films and succeeding in paying homage to them while still
delivering an original horror film of his own.
     The screenplay uses the original RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD as a
starting point and then expands on it in two different directions, both
of which come together by the end of the film.  The story focuses on
two teenagers (Curt and Julie, both ably portrayed here by talented
unknowns) who stumble upon strange goings-on in the military
installation supervised by Curt's father.  It seems the military is
interested in using the recently dead as weapons--not a completely
outlandish thought, considering what unstoppable killing machines they
were in the first two installments in the series.  Naturally a way to
control them is needed, and Curt's father believes he's found it; of
course, things don't work out quite as planned, and the recently
reanimated find themselves less interested in being all they can be,
and more interested in wreaking zombie havoc.
     Things with Curt and Julie don't go as planned, either; Curt finds
that a motorcycle accident has rendered Julie a prime candidate for
reanimation herself, and since this is a horror film, we all know that
no good opportunity for reanimation is ever wasted.  What happens after
Curt brings his girlfriend back to life comprises the bulk of the film,
though the screenplay does swing back around to the military angle in
time for a truly horrific denouement.
     Although much of this territory has been covered by Stuart
Gordon's classic over-the-top horror/comedy REANIMATOR, RETURN OF THE
LIVING DEAD 3 deals with it in a more serious fashion: Julie is brought
back to life, yes, but at what cost?  And if Curt really loves her, how
can he stand to see what she must go through to stay "alive"; yet how
can he let her die once again?  It would have been nice had Coppola
dealt with these issues in DRACULA with the same degree of subtlety,
rather than wasting his time and ours producing a dopey, special
effects-laden costume drama; in some ways, RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3
is a better DRACULA than DRACULA, and a REANIMATOR that takes itself
seriously.  It's that rare example of what can be done within a genre
that does not normally lend itself to thoughtfulness and insight, one
in which special effects often overwhelm whatever thin screenplay has
been used as an excuse for generic mayhem and gore.
     When RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 does falter, it's generally
because of the most important constraint under which it was made
(besides the R-rating it needed to get to get any sort of theatrical
release at all): its very limited budget.  With only so much money
available for creature effects, we miss out on the one or two more
"incidents" (shall we say) that probably should have been added to keep
the film well on the right side of becoming too talky.  It's a
difficult juggling act, of course, since Yuzna obviously intended to
make something more than just a zombie-fest.  Yet the film does drag at
times, and there's nothing wrong with keeping the living dead at the
forefront of the action--especially if the title of the film implies
that they're going to be returning from somewhere.  Yuzna redeems
himself by the time we reach the last act--all hell breaks loose,
just as we knew it would, and it's at this point that we get a feeling
for how all the money in this film was (well) spent.  Until then,
though, we can do little but sit tight and listen to the dialogue,
which is happily well above the Camp Crystal Lake level one expects
from horror films these days.  No one says "Darn!  The basement light
just blew--let me just pop down there and change it."  Or "I'm *sure*
he's dead--no need to check."  Or even "Hello?  Anyone here?
Hel--hey!  What's wrong with the lights!?"  Very satisfying to be able
to enjoy a solid screenplay backing solid special effects--it's just
too bad that this is the exception to the rule that all but requires
horror filmmakers to insult the intelligence of their audiences.
     All in all, a quite satisfying film, and another winner from
Trimark, the tiny independent distributor that's fast becoming the New
Line of the nineties.  RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 and the two WARLOCK
films are almost enough for the Phantom to forgive Trimark for the
unending pain of LEPRECHAUN, incredibly enough their most successful
film to date.  RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD 3 is currently enjoying
Trimark's investment of zero dollars in advertising, so it's not likely
to do better box office than LEPRECHAUN; let's just hope that phans
starved for good horror descend upon it in droves once it hits the
video stores in a couple of months.  For those who will have no chance
to see it in the superior ambience of the Criterion, it will be worth
the wait.

Title
Review for Basic Instinct (1992)
     (As we are currently suffering from a serious horror drought, the
Phantom thought he would take this opportunity to branch out into the
world of the exploitation film and make the big-budget soft-core BASIC
INSTINCT the subject of his first review.  The Phantom feels that
reviewing exploitation films is well within his artistic reach, even
though the two genres are so markedly different.  In a horror film, we
watch as first someone is murdered, then someone else disrobes, then
someone else is murdered, etc.  In an exploitation film, on the other
hand, we watch as first someone disrobes, then someone is murdered, then
someone else disrobes, etc.  The Phantom will, of course, endeavor to
keep that subtle distinction in mind as he writes his reviews, and if at
any time he feels himself not well enough qualified to critically
appraise the myriad nuances of the exploitation genre, he will return to
the familiar world of the horror film without hesitation.)
     The Phantom needed little more inducement to lay down his $7.50 for
Paul Verhoeven's latest film than that which was provided by the
high-concept plot summary: cynical, burnt-out cop becomes mysteriously
(and dangerously, if we may be so bold) attracted to beautiful, rich,
naked bisexual woman who does/does not kill people with an ice pick.
     Any six words in that sentence would be enough to part the Phantom
from his hard-earned money; but the tantalizing thought that a film
might contain all thirty was enough to transport him to exploitation
film heaven.  After all, even if only a handful of those words were
fully exploited by the film, BASIC INSTINCT would still be quite a
slam-bang, action-packed, sex- and violence-drenched exercise in
voyeurism with little or no obvious redeeming social value -- the very
definition of a successful and wildly entertaining exploitation film.
     Add to the mix Paul Verhoeven's reputation as a director for whom
the ordinary limits of taste and restraint have little or no meaning --
and Sharon Stone's reputation for being, well, rather easy on the eyes
without any clothes on -- and the Phantom's expectations were high
indeed as he ventured uptown to see BASIC INSTINCT in THX sound (the
idea being that THX sound would show off Jerry Goldsmith's score to best
advantage, or at least make it loud enough to drown out the sounds of
the Lexington Avenue line as it rumbled underneath the theater; when one
lives in New York, loudness and quality frequently go hand in hand).  
     But somewhere between the idea and the execution, something went a
little wrong.  Perhaps Joe Eszterhas delivered only a rough outline for
his $3 million story; perhaps coherent endings -- like batteries for
cheap toys -- are not included for such a paltry sum of money.  (Aside
to Tri-Star: assuming you're not yet in bankruptcy and you need an
ending for your next exploitation film, the Phantom is ready and willing
to provide one -- one that even makes sense -- for the low, low price of
only $9,999.95.  Have your people call my people and we'll do lunch.)
     Whatever the reason, though, BASIC INSTINCT's biggest problem is
its script.  Even before the film limps to its shockingly shoddy
conclusion, signs that trouble is on the way appear to us with the
passing of nearly every scene.  Eszterhas has the characters doing any
one of three things at each point in the film: getting into a car;
driving in a car; getting out of a car; walking up to a doorway;
knocking on a door; walking through a doorway; walking into a room;
walking out of a room.  And having sex, of course.  Sometimes characters
do more than one of these things in a single scene; sometimes characters
do more than one of these things at a time.  But quite a lot of BASIC
INSTINCT is given over to these nine activities, and after about a half
hour, the audience begins to realize that something is missing.  Real
life, for a start.  At no point in BASIC INSTINCT do we ever feel that
the characters exist in the real world; Eszterhas has effectively
created a very closed, claustrophobic and artificial world for a film
that can only be effective when we see the effects of the story line on
the characters' "external" lives.  One of the reasons FATAL ATTRACTION
was so successful is that we were able to see Michael Douglas' character
as a real person -- someone with whom we might possibly identify or at
least sympathize -- and not as just one more cardboard character being
stalked by a Jasonized killer.  Consider, too, Jimmy Stewart in VERTIGO,
a film that encompasses the very definition of an improbable and
artificial plot.  Yet watching it, we never get the sense that Stewart
is simply going through the motions; instead, we feel that he's a real
person who gets caught up in extraordinary events -- a hallmark of
Hitchcock's greatest work, and the bare minimum needed for successful
and effective suspense.
     After the script, BASIC INSTINCT suffers from another common
problem: that of a talented director of niche films directing something
well beyond his range as a director.  Verhoeven is one of the best when
it comes to violent, action-packed techno-thrillers like ROBOCOP and
TOTAL RECALL; however, putting aside the few killings that Eszterhas'
script calls for, the bulk of BASIC INSTINCT is given over to the
relationship between Douglas and Stone.  It is a plot tailor-made for
Brian DePalma (and in a better and more refined time, for Alfred
Hitchcock), who proved he could handle just this sort of story in BODY
DOUBLE.  Verhoeven even pulls a DePalma when he lifts the steamy kissing
sequence from NOTORIOUS; alas, it's one of the few scenes in which
Douglas and Stone generate any real heat.  Of course, they're seen naked
in and out of bed, together and apart so many times that it becomes
almost boring; yet this only proves that athletic sex is not an adequate
substitute for genuine interest, even though we as an audience have our
eyes glued to the screen all the while.  Verhoeven, whatever his
talents, has yet to learn that graphic violence is usually a poor
substitute for genuine horror; and that soft-core pornography is almost
always a poor substitute for genuine passion.  Apparently Verhoeven
operated on the principle that if it wasn't possible to show a car chase
or a murder, the story would be advanced best by having either Douglas
or Stone disrobe; while this seems like a reasonable idea at the
beginning of the film, by about mid-way through even the sight of
Douglas' naked rear-end -- featured prominently in a scene that was
apparently designed as a showcase for his derriere -- fails to lift our
spirits or hold our interest.
     It is because we never believe that Douglas is deeply and
emotionally involved with Stone that BASIC INSTINCT begins to fall
apart; without our emotional commitment, what difference does it make
whether or not Stone is the killer?  Thus all of the artificial plot
twists and turns come to naught, and by the time the credits roll we
feel that perhaps some vital part of the film had been cut.  Contrast
this with the denouement of VERTIGO: by the time Hitchcock ends his
classic film, we've strongly identified with Jimmy Stewart and thus we
can share his pain and bewilderment; in other words, we can have a
genuine emotional experience.  BASIC INSTINCT is a cheat, because all we
get to do is watch.
     Sadly, even Jerry Goldsmith doesn't come through for us in his
usual exemplary fashion.  His score attempts to place BASIC INSTINCT
squarely in Hitchcock's world, but try as it does, it never quite fits
with the action on screen.  Perhaps this is because Verhoeven is unable
to generate any sustained suspense; perhaps it is because the audience
is relegated to the role of voyeur rather than partner as the film
unfolds.  In any case, Goldsmith's score tends to pounce on us at
unlikely times and attempt to coerce us into feeling anxious.  Half the
time -- and even as Eszterhas has his characters knocking on doors or
walking around outside houses -- Goldsmith's score keeps swelling up in
the background, itself growing somewhat tiresome and repetitious as it
pounds away at inert scene after inert scene.  The other half of the
time, we're all too busy waiting for Douglas and Stone to take their
clothes off to notice whether Goldsmith is still hammering away with his
quasi-Hitchcockian score or whether he's switched to a test of the
Emergency Broadcast System.
     This said, the Phantom should hasten to add that BASIC INSTINCT is
by no means a terrible film -- it's just not a very good one.  DePalma
could get away with his incessant references to and liberal borrowings
from Hitchcock because his films stood on their own merits, and because
he was able to take plot snippets and ideas with which we were all
familiar and give them his own special gloss (that being straight-razor
murders and Melanie Griffith in her underwear).  Whatever their faults,
DRESSED TO KILL and BODY DOUBLE are stylish, entertaining and fun --
each the very definition of a successful exploitation film.  (Leonard
Maltin disdains BODY DOUBLE and calls it "another sleazy fetish film,"
which only goes to show that he wouldn't know a good exploitation film
if it stabbed him with an ice pick.  Coincidentally, the Phantom has
himself used the phrase when describing a film, but only when his
phrase-O-matic is set to "high praise"; after all, if we don't all want
to go see "another sleazy fetish film," what do we want to see?)
     And BASIC INSTINCT does have its pluses: the two biggest being
Sharon Stone and Sharon Stone without any clothes on.  Both she and
Douglas both do as well as can be expected, given the unlikely plot,
near-illiterate script and given that they're forced to spend much of
their screen time "****ing like minks", to use three charming words we
get to hear on at least a half dozen occasions.  (One of these scenes
later is described by Douglas as "the **** of the century", which gives
you a pretty fair indication of the level of Mr. Eszterhas' script.)
There is also the now-infamous "interrogation scene," which features
Ms. Stone's legs and other parts of her anatomy.  This scene is wildly
over-directed by Verhoeven, whose ever-so-subtle touch has the actors
frantically pantomiming embarrassment as Ms. Stone makes herself more
comfortable; if this were the 1920s and had not the miracle of sound
recording become part of our lives 60 years ago, the interrogation scene
would likely be more believable than it is.  (It *was* affecting,
however, in its own overwrought way.)
     The film's resolution is a disappointment to all, and in fact is so
bad that the Phantom wonders who -- other than Mr. Eszterhas -- could
possibly have liked it or thought it an appropriate way to end a
suspense thriller.  It is only a small consolation that by the time we
reach the film's final scene, we have long since ceased to care what
happens to Douglas and Stone or even who the killer really is.  In
writing BASIC INSTINCT, Eszterhas has mistaken Hitchcock's famous
"MacGuffin" for the film's central theme; instead of concentrating on
the characters and using the murders as a convenient way for them to
become further involved -- emotionally involved -- with each other,
Eszterhas' script spins its wheels as clue after pointless clue is
revealed to an audience that longs not for MURDER ON THE ORIENT EXPRESS,
but REAR WINDOW.
     Speaking of which, Hitchcock's classic films are, as always,
readily available at your local Blockbusters; phans who don't plan on
(ice) picking BASIC INSTINCT for their weekend's entertainment would be
well advised to rent any of the (much better) films from which Eszterhas
and Verhoeven have liberally borrowed.  And if the Phantom's memory
serves, three minutes of Grace Kelly or Kim Novak fully clothed are more
likely to capture our interest and attention than 30 minutes of Sharon
Stone proving that she doesn't wear any underwear.  At the very least,
you won't have to look at Jimmy Stewart's naked rear-end, which is
practically reason enough to rent one or more of these classic films and
avoid BASIC INSTINCT.

Title
Review for Deep Cover (1992)
     (With this review, the Phantom is continuing his effort to review
other than just horror films.  Though the stupefying BASIC INSTINCT
nearly caused him to give up in despair, he soon realized that it was
less than likely that all new exploitation films could be as bad as
Verhoeven's big-budget bomb; thus, he has persevered and with this
review turned his attention to the action genre.  Sorry, no bleached
blonde bisexual ice-pick killers this time, phans.)
     BASIC INSTINCT notwithstanding, there is no inherent reason why
exploitation films have to be bad -- it's just that they so frequently
are.  Yet some of the most enjoyable films ever made are exploitation
films, and given the increasing acceptance of bloodshed, four-letter
words, and nudity in mainstream Hollywood films, there is sometimes
little or no difference between a big-budget, respectable studio release
and a low-budget crowd-pleaser -- except the budget.
     DEEP COVER, the subject of this review, is such a film, for while
it has all the hallmarks of an exploitation film -- from its low budget,
to the marketing it has received, to its target audience -- it's also a
literate, thought-provoking, and entertaining film that undeservedly may
be overlooked because of its subject matter, its budget, or its limited
release.
     As the lights dimmed at the UA Criterion 7 (formerly the UA
Criterion 6 before management decided to pay for much-needed renovations
by splitting one adequate-sized theater into two cinematic bowling
alleys) in the heart of Times Square, the Phantom expected little more
from DEEP COVER than its slightly sleazy trailers and print ads
promised: Larry Fishburne as an undercover cop who gets involved with
various bad guys and kills them.  As an added bonus -- and for a bit of
not-so-new-anymore role reversal -- the film throws in Jeff Goldblum as
a white drug dealer who becomes partners with Fishburne LETHAL
WEAPON-like before he's either shown the error of his ways or the inside
of an ambulance (frequently one in the same thing in standard-issue
exploitation films).  Add to the mix a pumping soundtrack, some
large-caliber weapons, a generous supply of talcum powder masquerading
as cocaine, and as many car chases as the filmmakers can squeeze out of
a severely limited budget, and you have yourself one fairly decent,
low-rent NEW JACK CITY clone.
     Or do you?  For surprise of surprises, DEEP COVER has a little more
to offer its audience than just the standard mix of glamorous cops and
glamorous drug dealers getting into glamorous shootouts, only pausing
long enough to tell the children in the audience that they shouldn't try
any of this at home, and that even though everyone in the film seems to
be enjoying himself, everything they're doing and saying is wrong, bad,
and evil.  Remember, winners don't do drugs and kill people; they just
pay $7.50 to see other people do drugs and kill people.
     But DEEP COVER goes a little deeper than this, and that makes all
the difference.  To start, it has a quite literate script (by Michael
Tolkin and Henry Bean, who wrote the excellent new film THE PLAYER and
INTERNAL AFFAIRS respectively).  Too, it has a director who apparently
learned how to direct by doing something other than watching MTV.  Bill
Duke, who's previous feature A RAGE IN HARLEM was not entirely
successful, but was at least an honest effort, brings a steady hand to
the proceedings, and he nimbly avoids most of the cliches of the action
film genre while still giving DEEP COVER a unique and attractive look.
Most important (for an exploitation film), he keeps the film moving even
when the screen isn't filled with car chases or shootouts.
     Further helping to lift DEEP COVER from the mire of a standard
action flick are Fishburne and Goldblum's performances, which are for
the most part restrained, in character, and effective.  True, seeing
Jeff Goldblum on cocaine is a lot like seeing Jeff Goldblum not on
cocaine, but his hyperactive performance is perfect for the fast-talking
lawyer/drug dealer he plays in the film.  And Fishburne -- obviously
slumming here after his outstanding performances in Spike Lee's SCHOOL
DAZE and John Singleton's BOYZ IN THE HOOD -- succeeds in giving his
character the thoughtful, introspective demeanor upon which the story
hinges.
     DEEP COVER sets out to explore what happens to Russell Stevens, a
troubled but dedicated cop who badly wants to make a difference and is
offered the opportunity to go undercover as part of an operation to nab
high-level drug dealers.  As part of his cover, Stevens (renamed John
Hull for the role) must himself pose as a drug dealer -- exactly the
kind of person he joined the force to fight -- and work his way closer
to the heart of one of the major illicit drug operations on the West
Coast.  Will he become corrupted by the easy money?  Seduced by his
great-looking new suits?  If you can't guess, you haven't seen enough of
these kinds of films.  Yet it is, still, a fascinating and dark journey
that we take with Fishburne's character, and the screenplay rarely comes
up for air once Hull takes to the streets.
     Unfortunately, there are a few not-so-fascinating things about the
film; among them the rather convoluted plot, a hodgepodge of
stereotypical characters and scenes, insightful and well-written moments
of introspection, and preposterous conspiracy theories.  The incessant
narration also does the film more harm than good; though it is
occasionally helpful to hear exactly what Hull is thinking at any given
moment, it would be better if we could ourselves realize what's going
through his mind by actually watching the film -- more or less what we
all came to Times Square that evening to do -- rather than by being told
straight out by the writers of an occasionally lazy screenplay.  The
Phantom's belief that narration is often more like having a loud-mouth
three rows behind you constantly telling you exactly what's plainly
going on before your eyes than it is a legitimate cinematic technique
has not changed due to the generally unnecessary and overbearing
narration in DEEP COVER.
     But putting this aside -- something that is easy enough to do,
given the low expectations that most of us have for an exploitation film
-- DEEP COVER turns out to be more entertaining, thought-provoking and
fun than it has any right to be.  Its limited budget shows -- and shows
frequently -- but the film is generally not hampered by an inability to
open things up a little, be it having more than 12 people on the street
at any one time, to running car chases through other than completely
deserted streets and tunnels.  Its weak and predictable ending is more
than compensated for by a very strong opening, and although the
screenplay calls for three or four more characters than the film itself
can really sustain (including Clarence Williams III as an honest cop who
tries to save Hull from his life of crime), it also works well enough,
often enough, and in enough other ways, that we really don't mind.
     DEEP COVER is in fact more like SERPICO than it is like NEW JACK
CITY (though it's not nearly as good as SERPICO); although it glamorizes
what it should probably be demonizing, it's more than just a all-surface
effort.  DEEP COVER is the kind of film that gives the term "B movie" a
good name, and the Phantom suggests that phans awaiting the imminent
release of LETHAL 3 give DEEP COVER a try and see for themselves why
entertainment and intelligence don't necessarily have to be mutually
exclusive.

Title
Review for Hardware (1990)
     The Phantom has always thought of bad films as diseases.  In order
to survive them, one must either immunize oneself beforehand or find an
antidote afterwards.
     This week, the Phantom plans to do both, as the film to which he
was just subjected was so indescribably bad, so laughably awful, so
unrelentingly stupid, that neither immunization nor antidote alone will
suffice.  Fortunately for his sanity, he rented THE GODFATHER earlier
this week, so he went into HARDWARE knowing that no matter how bad it
was, he would still be able to walk out of the auditorium with fond
memories of an excellent film -- even if it wasn't the film he had just
seen.
     Though he didn't think that such precautions would be necessary
with the subject of this review.  Believing that good previews, good
commercials, and what seemed to be raves from Wes Craven, Clive Barker
and Fangoria magazine (prominently displayed in the full-page New York
Times ad for the film) portended a good new horror film, he didn't think
twice about recommending it to two of his like-minded friends.  After
all, while he would never assume that there was anyone else who would
enjoy watching, say, THE FIRST POWER with him, here was a film that
might even be in the same class as HELLRAISER or perhaps ALIEN.  Surely,
even if it wasn't quite up to that level, it would at the very least be
entertaining, or gory, or something.
     Well, no.  Instead, the Phantom found that even the aura of THE
GODFATHER couldn't save him; instead, he'll have to find an antidote
this evening in order to rid his system of the poisonously bad trash he
had just seen.  One obvious antidote to HARDWARE is ALIEN, one of the
dozen films that HARDWARE either pays homage to or rips off, depending
on how charitable one wants to be.  Another possible antidote would be
THE ROAD WARRIOR, or HELLRAISER, or DEMON SEED, for there are bits and
pieces of all of these films scattered throughout the post-apocalyptic,
cinematic wasteland that is HARDWARE.
     HARDWARE is a recipe film, which is a little different than a
high-concept film.  To make a recipe film, you first line up all your
ingredients, which in this case would be ALIEN, DEMON SEED, THE ROAD
WARRIOR, MAX HEADROOM, and HELLRAISER.  Then you add a half cup of one,
20 minutes of another, a few tablespoons of this and a pinch -- just a
pinch, mind you -- of imagination.  Stir thoroughly, until the
ingredients mix just well enough to avoid litigation; you don't want the
lawyers to see whole chunks of, say, ALIEN, floating about in your stew.
The result?  Something that's saleable and marketable, but which leaves
its diners wondering what it was that got them to try even a spoonful,
let alone consume all 90 minutes of it.
     Since the Phantom is having a sale on similes this week, let's try
one more.  HARDWARE is a camel of a film.  Like THE FIRST POWER, it
becomes obvious after only 10 or 15 minutes that the film was not so
much imagined or created, but constructed and packaged.  The Phantom
made the mistake in his last review of wondering whether horror films
were returning to their roots, whether films like THE EXORCIST III
marked the return of the intelligent horror film and an end to the
mind-numbing kill-by-the-numbers sequel-fests and poorly plotted and
scripted turkeys that have plagued horror phans for years now.  But
HARDWARE is as unlike THE EXORCIST III as it *is* like THE FIRST POWER.
It is a film that proves that for every talented British horror writer
and filmmaker like Clive Barker, there must be at least as many
untalented hacks who are capable only of the poorest sort of plagiarism.
Or worse, are capable only of producing something like HARDWARE.
     Now that he's gotten that out of his system, the Phantom will
attempt to explain HARDWARE's lame-brained plot.  There is no way to
spoil a film like HARDWARE, as that implies that there might be
surprises to be given away, or unique plot twists or special effects
that might be ruined should audiences find out about them before seeing
the film.  Too, the Phantom would like to think that anyone who sees
HARDWARE after reading his review must be a bit of a masochist, so
perhaps such a person would enjoy having the film's few plot twists
revealed so that he or she may be as fully miserable as possible while
watching it.
     As the film began, the Phantom suffered a brief TOTAL RECALL
flashback, for the film seemed to be set on Verhoeven's Mars, sans the
fake looking Martian colony and the shoddy optical printing.  But that
bit of prescience should have alerted the Phantom to the horrors yet to
unfold -- he should have heeded his sixth sense and ducked into DARKMAN
next door.  Instead, he stayed to find out what this new twist on THE
ROAD WARRIOR might be like and found to his dismay that it was no twist
at all -- it was more like a cut-rate wholesale transplantation of about
15 minutes of that fine film.  We see the lone man walking through a
desert; we see the ruins of a post-apocalyptic world around him; we see
the remains of civilization going about their miserable and dirty
business; we even see the curious mixing of the old and the very new
that was strikingly original when we first saw it in BRAZIL and MAX
HEADROOM some years ago, but which by now is little more than another
science fiction cliche.
     But what we don't see is anything even remotely connected with the
rest of the film, with the exception of an old, junked robot that the
lone man finds buried in the desert.  This robot is the star of the
second half of the film, but as it is found only minutes into the first
half, the director spends the remaining 43 minutes in the
post-apocalyptic city and surrounding areas.  A travelogue it is not,
and neither George Miller nor Mel Gibson have anything to fear.
     We meet the protagonist.  We meet his girlfriend.  The action
shifts to the girlfriend's apartment, where she works as an artist who
assembles junk -- mostly scrap metal -- as sculpture.  The protagonist
brings the robot's head to the girlfriend as a Christmas present, and
she duly incorporates it into her art.  But soon it turns out that the
robot was a Mark 13 military robot, a droid whose prime directive is to
kill people and who has an amazingly strong survival instinct.  Uh oh.
The Phantom got good and worried at this point, and began to keep his
eyes peeled for the sudden appearance of Spring-Loaded Cats, blue fog,
pods, and little crab-like things that attach themselves to people's
faces.  Alas, all he found was fog, some of it blue, and some of it
clouding whatever limited intelligence and originality the film had so
far displayed.
     Shortly after revealing the robot's origins in a scene reminiscent
of THE EVIL DEAD, the robot begins to assemble itself (much like Frank
did in the attic in HELLRAISER), incorporating lots of scary-looking
hardware like buzz saws, drills, and anything else that was handy.  And
as this happens, the film just as quickly reassembles *itself*, shifting
none too nimbly from ROAD WARRIOR mode to ALIEN mode.  It was at this
point that the Phantom put his hands to his ears so that he wouldn't
have to listen to the sounds of breaking glass as logic and sensibility
jumped out the window.  He did, however, hear their screams as they
plummeted to certain deaths.
     Now that the robot has assembled itself, well, it must be time to
kill people?  Well, no.  Of course, one would think that a military
robot, programmed to kill, having rebuilt itself out of cables and
aluminum siding and can openers and whatever else happened to be lying
around, and having been left alone in an apartment with a defenseless
girl would do the only logical thing -- kill her.  But of course that
couldn't happen, as both logic and sensibility were by then being rushed
to the hospital where doctors would labor fruitlessly over them for
another 40 minutes.
     Instead we are treated to an extremely bad homage to the 1977
horror classic DEMON SEED.  The robot stalks the girl -- very slowly and
looking very much like five poorly-skilled and underpaid technicians
were operating it -- and threatens her repeatedly with a drill bit that
looks quite a lot like ... well, the Phantom is sure you get the
picture.
     It does kill someone, of course, and eventually other people show
up and try to kill it.  In between, the apartment's lights flash on and
off, circuits short-circuit endlessly, hidden strobe lights are
employed, and the audience is entertained with simulations of the
robot's vision that were taken from the same kitchen cupboard that holds
PREDATOR and WOLFEN.
     Finally, the film winds down and in its last 15 minutes stirs in a
few tablespoons each of the endings to BLADE RUNNER, ALIEN, and THE
WIZARD OF OZ.  Really.  There's also a nice reverse homage to WAIT UNTIL
DARK along the way, but that one brief scene is the only glimmer of
intelligence in a film that is otherwise as intellectually arid as the
post-apocalyptic wasteland in which it is set.
     It has been a long time since the Phantom was so disappointed with
a film, so misled by its advertising, and so saddened by the terrible
waste of not just one or two, but dozens of the good ideas, clever and
suspenseful scenes, and special effects that have until now brightened
and enlivened the horror genre.  There is quite literally no reason to
see this film, even on video.  In his review of THE EXORCIST III, the
Phantom remarked that it was even worth $7.50, the extortionate price of
a movie ticket in New York City.  Well phans, HARDWARE isn't even worth
a 99-cent special at Blockbusters.  It is redeemed only because it makes
nearly every other horror film look good in comparison, and because it
reminds everyone who sees it of the dozens of excellent horror films
from which it labors so hard to steal.

Title
Review for Tales from the Darkside: The Movie (1990)
     The Phantom has always been an avid admirer of Steven King and George
Romero, so when CREEPSHOW was released in 1982, the Phantom was first in line
to see it.  Although it does not rank as one of the best (or even one of the
better) horror films of all time, it did have a certain unique style and charm,
and it combined just the right amounts of humor, camp, gross-outs and scares to
keep its audience entertained throughout its five short "tales of terror."
     CREEPSHOW was also the first horror film in a long while to present short
"ghost stories" rather than one full-length tale.  Since then, however, there
have been several films that have attempted CREEPSHOW's unique style; some,
like TWILIGHT ZONE -- THE MOVIE and CREEPSHOW 2, succeeded in part; others,
like NIGHTMARES and CAT'S EYE, failed utterly and have since been relegated to
positions of honor (right behind the Big Gulp displays) in 7-11s across the
country.
     The Phantom has also been an on again, off again admirer of the television
show "Tales From the Darkside" (the shows never seemed consistently good enough
to watch on a regular basis, and the enlightened station managers of the
shadowy independent television stations on which "Tales" is broadcast tend to
hide the show on sunny weekend afternoons and late on weekday nights between
thirty-minute hair replacement system commercials and six-hour-long "No Money
Down" scams), so it was with high hopes that the Phantom went to see TALES FROM
THE DARKSIDE: THE MOVIE.  (The Phantom apologizes profusely for that last
sentence, and invites his phans to take a moment to catch their breath before
going on to the next.)  After all, the best episodes on "Tales" are quite good
-- at least as good as any of the classic Twilight Zone episodes -- and the
majority are frequently innovative and clever.
     Besides, the Phantom is also a sucker for anything Romero does, and has
been ever since NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD.  Since he and King did such a good
job with CREEPSHOW, it stands to reason that TALES would be a worthy sequel.
     But alas, the ads for TALES tell tales themselves.  The film is promoted
as being "from" Romero and King, but in fact only one of the three tales is
"from" them.  And that one tale ("Cat From Hell") isn't even directed by
Romero; instead he and King co-wrote it.  (The Phantom is not, of course,
disappointed that King didn't direct any or all of the film; ever since MAXIMUM
OVERDRIVE the Phantom has been awakening with cold sweats over the prospect
that King might once again be allowed to step behind a camera and inflict
another of his cinematic visions upon his adoring and naive public.)
     The tip-off should have been the credit given to Sir Arthur Conan Doyle,
who even when alive had little experience writing or directing horror films.
Now that Sir Arthur is no longer with us, his being listed as one of the
"from"s should have sounded warning bells of fraudulent advertising at least,
and tedious and predictable horror "tales" at worst.
     But tedious and predictable do not do TALES justice.  This is a horror
film for people who do not like surprises, or perhaps people who are always 20
minutes behind Angela Lansbury each Sunday evening.  As the film plodded from
one "chilling" tale to the next, the Phantom found himself wondering whether it
were still possible to make a horror film that was neither ridiculous (like our
friends THE FIRST POWER and THE GUARDIAN) nor tedious.  And he nearly fainted
dead away in disbelief when the first tale turned out to be about a mummy that
-- no, the Phantom won't give away the chilling surprise.  Oh, all right, the
mummy ACTUALLY COMES TO LIFE AND KILLS PEOPLE!  EEEK!  The Phantom was so
scared he nearly dropped his popcorn.  Scarier still is the thought that even
Sir Arthur (who unfortunately is given "Inspired by a story by" credit) is not
as old as this threadbare tale.  If only Bud and Lou were still alive....
     One would think that the director, John Harrison (who directed the entire
film), would have learned from the horrifyingly bad "Cigar Store Indian" tale
in CREEPSHOW 2; dead things and/or inanimate objects coming to life went out
with Karloff and Lugosi, and in fact it's been nearly 60 years since someone
made a good horror film that featured a mummy.  Hammer Films knew how to do it
then, but alas, neither Sir Arthur nor John Harrison seem to know how to do it
now.  Sir Arthur, at least, has the excuse of being otherwise occupied
decomposing at the moment, so we can forgive him; but Michael McDowell (who
also worked on BEETLEJUICE) is still among the living and can therefore still
be held responsible for his script.
     Of the two tales that follow, only "Cat From Hell" is interesting, and
then only because of Buster Poindexter's outrageous performance as a feline hit
man.  The final tale, "Lover's Vow," features some very nice creature effects
(done by FX wizard Dick Smith), but as its plot line is more transparent than
the film stock on which it develops, the Phantom will refrain from summarizing
it here for fear that it might bubble and blacken under the bright light of
criticism.
     The film would be a near-total letdown if it were not for the "wrapper"
segments that feature a perfectly cast and perfectly unflappable Deborah Harry
as a slightly deranged housewife planning a dinner party.  Her performance in
TALES is nearly as entertaining as were the comic book segues in CREEPSHOW, and
she gives us all something to stick around for as each tale slowly drowns under
the weight of an impossible load of exposition.
     That exposition is the central problem with TALES FROM THE DARKSIDE (well,
that and the fact that "darkside" has been confounding the Phantom's spell
checker all evening); if ghost stories told around a campfire were told like
this, all the campers would be fast asleep before the teller could even get to
the first cliche.  (By the way, for those phans who may avoid this film even
after it supplants the other 24-hour favorites behind the Big Gulp display, the
Phantom wishes to point out that yes, the mummy tale does indeed contain the
celebrated "closeup of mummy's hand as it emerges from coffin" scene.  Happy
60th birthday, Mr.  Scene!  How we've enjoyed you through the years!)  
     In fact, the Phantom now understands at least one reason why CREEPSHOW was
so much fun: each of its tales was short, sweet, and to the point.  Romero has
always understood that horror films are different from other kinds of films in
that they exist solely to scare their audiences, not to engross them with
complex character relationships and witty repartee (not that TALES could be
said to boast either of these).
     So perhaps Romero could have saved TALES, but perhaps not.  There seems to
have been so little effort put into this film that its title could be more
appropriately TALES FROM THE DIM SIDE; the film, which like the television show
on which it is loosely based, is a Laurel production -- so Romero must have had
more to do with it than he's letting on -- but sadly, TALES FROM THE DARKSIDE
is a film that will garner no one's laurels.
     Fortunately, there is an alternative for those phans who decide not to
subject themselves to the small-screen entertainment of TALES FROM THE DARK
SIDE: a small, odd, but very effective horror film now in limited release
called BRAIN DEAD.  The Phantom saw BRAIN DEAD on a "Times Square double-bill"
with TALES (that is, he saw TALES first then ran across Broadway in a desperate
search for something that even remotely resembled a horror film), and he was
very glad he did.  He will have a full review of it next week (along with a
review of Mark Lester's CLASS OF 1999), but for those phans who have an
opportunity to see it, the Phantom heartly recommends BRAIN DEAD.
Coincidentally, BRAIN DEAD was written by Charles Beaumont, one of the original
writers for "The Twilight Zone," and it heartened the Phantom to see a horror
film that was well-written, intelligent, and contained no mummies.  

Title
Review for Body of Evidence (1993)
     In his last review, the Phantom wrote of the importance of heeding
the warnings of impending cinematic doom that we may find on the way to
the opening credits of yet another quality-challenged horror or
exploitation film.  Occasionally the filmmakers or the studio will give
us tantalizing hints of the extreme violence about to be done to our
high expectations; but oftentimes we must rely on a combination of some
of our less discerning film critics and the studio's publicity
department to provide us with suitably frightening theatrical portents
-- the cinematic equivalents of "Bridge Out" signs that we overlook at
our own peril.
     As is the case with BODY OF EVIDENCE, the subject of this review
and the latest in a peculiarly Hollywood combination of sex, violence
and litigation that reached its apex with Paul Verhoeven's now infamous
BASIC INSTINCT.  Even before it opened, the print ads for Dino De
Laurentiis' latest attempt to recapture the box-office glory of his
not-particularly-good masterpiece, the 1977 remake of KING KONG, gave us
an inkling of what was to come.  "BE WARNED: It's not for the prudish or
faint-hearted" screamed Susan Granger's quote, used by Metro Goldwyn
Mayer's publicity department perhaps in an attempt to mislead us into
thinking that we would be seeing Bram Stoker's BODY OF EVIDENCE instead
of good old Dino's.  Since then, MGM has reconsidered the value of
displaying prominently a reviewer's quote that warns people away from a
film, rather than recommends it to them.  On the brighter side, since no
one has ever heard of Susan Granger (credited as a reviewer for
WICC/American Movie Classics), her dire warnings seem to have had little
effect on the all-important first weekend gross.  "A slick thriller that
embodies elements of WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION, THE STORY OF O, and
BASIC INSTINCT," reads David Ansen's quote, excerpted from his Newsweek
review.  This is better, at least from MGM's point of view, since it
only serves to confuse people rather than warn them away from the film.
But what must it do to those few people who had any respect for Mr.
Ansen's critical sensibilities?  After all, such shameless flaking for
what is universally understood to be an extremely bad film can't be
earning him any brownie points with the editors of his august
publication.  Ansen, after all, has never exactly been King of the
Critics, but still: WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION, THE STORY OF O, and
BASIC INSTINCT!?  After reading that quote (and enduring BODY OF
EVIDENCE), the Phantom spent quite a while trying to determine just what
these four films had in common.  At last it occurred to him: they were
all filmed in color!  But no, not even that: Marlene Dietrich wasn't
making color films in the fifties (though in WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION
she was sexier fully dressed and filmed in black and white than Madonna
will ever be nude and pouring hot candle wax all over Willem Dafoe in
glorious Technicolor).
     We may never know what "elements" Ansen was referring to.  Phans
who have seen all four films are encouraged to send their best guesses
to the Phantom; he, in turn, will reply with his heartfelt sympathies
for having endured Madonna's latest cinematic fiasco (perhaps on Mr.
Ansen's ever-reliable recommendation) and a recommendation of his own:
that they race to their nearest Blockbusters and rent Billy Wilder's
classic adaptation of Agatha Christie's suspenseful, well-written, and
thoroughly enjoyable play.  WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION is every bit as
good as BODY OF EVIDENCE is bad; it is also worth seeing for the second
or third time just as much as BODY OF EVIDENCE is worth avoiding for the
first.
     Having gotten his fellow critics' ill-considered reviews out of the
way, the Phantom will now make some attempt to describe just how bad,
how incompetent, how completely hilarious Madonna's latest film really
is.  Nothing you have seen or read can prepare you for the unceasing
onslaught of just plain lousiness that Madonna, Willem Dafoe, Joe
Mantegna, writer Brad Mirman, and director Uli Edel unleash upon their
audience; truly, it is awe-inspiring to leave a theater thinking to
oneself, "You know, BASIC INSTINCT wasn't that bad after all.  A little
goofy, maybe, and we sure could have done without seeing Michael
Douglas' naked rear-end a half-dozen times, but at least Verhoeven had
some idea what he was doing."  (Phans, cinematic revisionism through
Madonna-tinted glasses is the most dangerous kind, but even the Phantom
found himself engaging in it before the candle wax had finished dripping
all over Dafoe.)
     The story revolves around Madonna's character, Rebecca Carlson, who
is put on trial for the murder of the wealthy older man she had been
rather friendly with right up until the moment he had a fatal heart
attack.  Was Rebecca simply too much for the old man?  Was she herself
the "lethal weapon" that caused his untimely (and rather embarrassing)
death?  As the crackerjack prosecutor Robert Garrett, Joe Mantegna sets
out to prove just this.  Naturally, Rebecca needs an equally crackerjack
defense, and that she gets from Willem Dafoe as Frank Dulaney, a man who
we know is doomed to buzz around the incandescent beauty of his client
like a moth around an outdoor patio light.
     But one immediate problem with the film is that even a dim and
faltering patio light gives off more heat than either Madonna or Dafoe,
both of whom are grievously miscast here.  (Joe Mantegna is never
miscast, but he does manage to sleepwalk though his role as Portland's
least competent prosecutor.  After having seen the film, the Phantom can
hardly blame him, but oh how he must be kicking himself for turning down
the chance to reprise his starring role in GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS for the
opportunity to be the best supporting actor in yet another Madonna
turkey.)  Dafoe, as the equally incompetent Frank Dulaney, does better
with intellectual roles than those that require that he respond with
unbridled enthusiasm when someone unzips his fly in an elevator; he is
simply all wrong for Dulaney, who is first and foremost a character with
very little common sense and not much more intelligence.  (And $7.50
later, the Phantom considered the possibility that he himself might be
perfect for the role; nothing like wasting one's money on a film like
BODY OF EVIDENCE to make one doubt one's own common sense, intelligence,
and at times, sanity.)
     Madonna may have seen something in Rebecca that was just right for
her, but a role in which Madonna does little more than act like Madonna
is not what any of us need.  Her role as Rebecca invites comparisons to
Sharon Stone's similar role in BASIC INSTINCT, but Madonna does not, at
this point, have Sharon Stone's looks; in fact, she doesn't really have
Sharon Stone's talent, though she's probably a better singer, and she's
certainly better at self-promotion.  Madonna plays much better when she
puts herself at the center of a fantasy -- her videos all have her
play-acting in worlds where every element reflects back favorably on
her, and in which she controls the words, the music, and the images we
see -- not when she has to try to play a real person who interacts with
other real people in the real world (or as real as the world ever gets
in a film as loopy as BODY OF EVIDENCE).  In this film, however, she
doesn't even look particularly good: she's given an unflattering hair
style, frumpy-looking clothes, terrible lighting, and bad direction.  As
a result, she seems more like a mannequin come to life than a sex siren
who lures Frank to the rocks of professional ruin and personal danger.
Though even this is a bad comparison, as most mannequins are better
dressed and almost never say anything as inane as "They've taken
something good between two people in love and made it dirty."
     To make matters worse, half the film is set in a courtroom, always
a dangerous thing for a writer to do if he cannot, in fact, write
intelligent dialogue.  The dialogue in BODY OF EVIDENCE is about on the
level of Matlock, and frequently it's much worse.  As the trial gets
under way, we quickly find that the judge (ably played by Lillian
Lehman) appears to be in the same position we are: she's fed up with the
way things are going, she most adamantly does not want to tolerate any
more bad dialogue from either lawyer, and she's going to do everything
in her power to see that her portion of the film ends as quickly as
possible.  Alas, it is only the audience who can hold the filmmakers in
contempt, and even we cannot sentence them to repeated viewings of the
hundreds of more intelligent, better acted, and better directed
courtroom dramas that have been made over the years.  (Including WITNESS
FOR THE PROSECUTION, as Mr.  Ansen may know, a film with sparkling
dialogue by Billy Wilder and crackling courtroom scenes that are reason
enough for Brad Mirman to hide his head in shame.)  Apparently the best
the judge can do is look positively dyspeptic at frequent intervals and
wonder how director Uli Edel could have fallen so far from his very
solid 1989 adaptation of LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN, and how we all could
have fallen so far from Jennifer Jason Leigh's stunning performance in
that film to Madonna's stunted one in this.
  Of course, there are the obligatory sex scenes, this time sans
ice-pick.  But also, alas, sans emotion and sans interest on our part.
Though there is a lot of fumbling around in the film, there are two main
scenes responsible for the film's notoriety: one in which Rebecca ties
up Frank with his own belt and pours hot candle wax on him; and one in
which she makes love to him in a parking garage, on top of a car, fully
clothed, and while Dulaney is lying on top of broken glass.  Dafoe is
way outside his element in each scene, and Madonna approaches them as if
she were following a particularly complicated chapter in the Time-Life
Guide to Offbeat Sexual Practices.  (Order now and we'll send you "How
to Turn Off the Lights By Breaking the Bulb With Your Shoe Instead of
Using the Switch Like People In a More Plausible Film Would" as our free
gift to you.)  The Phantom had hoped that Madonna might accidentally
open the guide to home repairs and show us all how to replace bathroom
tile or install a new dishwasher but, sadly, he was repeatedly
disappointed.  At least she looked like she was enjoying herself; Dafoe
tended to look like someone who got talked onto a rollercoaster against
his better judgment, just as the safety bars come down and the car
begins its ascent.  He knows he's in for something; he knows it won't be
pleasant; and it's only the thought of the wholesale retribution to come
that keeps him in the scene -- after all, tossing your agent out the
window isn't even a felony in California.
     We have all traveled a long and hard road from the heights of
WITNESS FOR THE PROSECUTION to the depths of BODY OF EVIDENCE, from
Marlene Dietrich to Madonna.  It is conceivable that BODY OF EVIDENCE
could be even worse than it is, but only if it weren't so
unintentionally funny so very often; how it got to be in the sorry shape
in which it is presented to us will likely never be known.  For the
Phantom's part, he still finds it hard to believe that so many
reasonably talented people could together produce a film as
mind-numbingly bad as BODY OF EVIDENCE, though Dino De Laurentiis' Midas
touch should always be kept in mind.  In the meantime, Billy Wilder's
classic film awaits you at your local Blockbusters.  No handcuffs; no
hot candle wax; no contempt for the audience -- just top-flight acting,
unparalleled writing, and Marlene Dietrich with all her clothes on.  A
film that looked good then looks even better now that we are able to see
it through our Madonna-tinted glasses.

Title
Review for Exorcist III, The (1990)
     The Phantom went into THE EXORCIST III with a bad taste in his
mouth, and although it may have had more to do with some strange Italian
mineral water he had just drunk, he thinks that part of the reason is
the general state of horror films today.  Through no fault of his own, a
few nights ago he was forced to watch most of last year's indescribably
bad THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA, and as the film plodded through scene
after predictable scene of tedious violence and more close-ups of Robert
Englund's latex-encased face than even his mother would appreciate, let
alone enjoy, the Phantom considered the current state of the horror
film.
     How things had come from the suspense classics and psychological
thrillers of years ago to this monstrosity, this badly plotted affront
to the name "Phantom," this latex nightmare, is a mystery.  Either
audiences have become stupider (for there is no other adequate
description of a film like Englund's PHANTOM OF THE OPERA), or
filmmakers believe that audiences have become stupider, or there is
simply no one left who can direct an intelligent horror film.
     Consider the Phantom's most recent reviews, which span just about a
year's worth of horror films:
     In a year's worth of horror films, how many were good enough that
anyone would want to see them once, let alone again on video in years to
come?  HENRY, and for those phans of the Twilight Zone, BRAIN DEAD.  The
rest range from downright awful, to predictable, to "well, I know it
sucked, but it had great special effects."
     Yet as he compiled this roll call of the mediocre, it struck the
Phantom that the best of the lot (HENRY and BRAIN DEAD) are both
primarily psychological thrillers first and horror films second.
Although some graphic violence is depicted in each, these two films
achieve their effect through good direction, good plotting, good
cinematography, and just plain good story telling.  In years gone by,
even the Roger Corman/Edgar Allen Poe quickies had some measure of
intelligence to them; whether because of the severe restrictions placed
on the display of graphic violence, or the infancy of film effects and
makeup techniques, or because latex hadn't yet been invented, horror
films had to be designed to scare their audiences through subtle
manipulations rather than through overt displays of blood and gore.
     Of course the Phantom realizes that there were exceptions to this
rule -- more than a few low budget gore-fests were produced during the
seventies -- but for the most part horror films made before the
Jasonized eighties had a different look and feel to them, and the
successful ones were successful because they gave us credit for having
imaginations and intelligence.  However good one thinks the HELLRAISER
and EVIL DEAD series are, one would be hard pressed to say that these
films were very thoughtful or even more than superficially clever.
Alas, it seems that even in the best of the most recent horror films,
phans have had to settle for style over substance and clever camera work
over original plots and intelligent dialogue.
     But what does any of this have to do with the subject of this
review, the latest EXORCIST sequel?  Just that while THE EXORCIST III
isn't a classic horror film, it is certainly a cut above the vast
majority of sad excuses for horror films we've seen recently.  Best of
all, it's a worthy successor to the original EXORCIST, and it all but
erases from one's mind its mind-numbing predecessor (though the Phantom
must admit that he makes a special stop for it at his local Blockbusters
whenever he really needs a good laugh).
     The Phantom thinks that this makes for a nice ironic contrast with
William Friedkin's 1973 classic, the original EXORCIST.  Though THE
EXORCIST may have been a lot of things, subtle it was not.  But phans
must keep in mind the time in which the film was released.  1973 was
very much different from 1990 as far as what an audience expected to see
in a horror film; in fact, THE EXORCIST is one of the films that so
changed our expectations that it spawned an entire sub-genre, the "bogus
Catholic theology" genre of horror film (of which this year's THE FIRST
POWER is one very unfortunate example).
     THE EXORCIST worked because it pulled out all the stops, but times
have changed, and the Phantom has seen dozens too many horror films that
make THE EXORCIST look like a Disney production.  Pea soup and gruesome
special effects just don't cut it anymore, and too many recent horror
films that were technically excellent still failed to satisfy because
they regularly sacrificed story, character, and dialogue to the
all-powerful god latex.
     And so the Phantom was astonished to see that THE EXORCIST III
forsakes almost entirely this false god and so succeeds in a way that
few other recent horror films have.
     The film is William Peter Blatty's "official" sequel to the
original EXORCIST (which was based on his novel of the same name), and
it too is based on one of Blatty's novels (in this case, "Legion"), but
this time Blatty himself directs from a script that he himself adapted.
That alone was enough to give the Phantom pause; after all, the last
time a writer had directorial ambitions Clive Barker managed to waste
David Cronenberg's startling performance and produce a very mediocre
NIGHTBREED.  Before that, Steven King imagined that MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE
would satisfy those of his phans who up until that point had not been
happy with the film adaptations of his novels.  (The Phantom thanks
heaven above that Rob Reiner, and not King, is directing the forthcoming
MISERY, since it was while watching MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE the Phantom
discovered what the protagonist of MISERY must have felt like; when
asked if would like to see MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE again, the Phantom always
responds "I'd rather be in hell with my back broken.")
     But Blatty seems to have decided that in EXORCIST II: THE HERETIC
he had a safety net: no matter how bad EXORCIST III turned out, it
couldn't even approach the sheer awfulness of its most recent
predecessor.  And so he set out to make a traditional horror film, one
that recalls THE OMEN or THE HAUNTING more than it does THE EXORCIST,
and one that at times feels more like a play than a film.
     It is a film in which people act -- actually act, not just stand
around and say things like "It's probably the storm, I'm sure it's just
the wind, let me take a look in the basement and make sure" -- and in
which the characters speak in complete sentences.  The dialogue
throughout the film is intelligent, witty and interesting -- one really
wants to listen to what the characters are saying, and the dialogue
itself contains countless clues to the mysteries of the film's plot.
And the film achieves its effects in precisely the way that made the
great horror films of the past great: through the use of psychological
horror rather than through acres of latex and liters of blood.
     In fact, at one point in the film, the Devil, speaking through his
latest instrument of death, says that he has always enjoyed
Shakespeare's works.  Given the structure and tone of much of the film,
it's easy to see why.  THE EXORCIST III is filled with what in different
circumstances might be termed soliloquies.  Strange for a film made in
the past few years, and stranger still for a horror film.  And strangest
of all, although this is one of the Phantom's most hated forms of
exposition (since he feels it is entirely inappropriate in a visual
medium that affords the artist so much freedom), the Phantom found that
he enjoyed Blatty's style -- and his script -- immensely.
     The story is a simple one, and so the Phantom will have to be
careful not to give too much of it away.  The action takes place in the
present day, 15 years after Linda Blair gave her head-turning
performance, and 15 years after the Devil killed Father Karras.  Phans
will remember that the Devil was exorcised that day, and Blatty reveals
that he's been itching for revenge ever since (the Devil, that is,
though one could argue that Blatty's been itching for another success;
the people who have purchased his last novel have not been, well,
legion).
     This is the starting point for THE EXORCIST III.  George C.  Scott
plays a detective who was a good friend of Father Karras', and who now
has the responsibility of solving a string of bizarre, ritualistic
murders that at least initially seem to proceed with no real pattern.
Each murder is more gruesome than the next (though phans of bogus
Catholic theology films will be glad to know that none tops the acme of
these deaths: the priest in THE FINAL CONFLICT (the third OMEN film) who
was strung up, wrapped in plastic, and then set on fire as he swung
suspended over a television studio), and in time Scott comes to realize
that he is dealing with something that is decidedly unnatural.  He is
plagued by dreams -- first of Father Karras' death as he tumbled down
those sinister looking stairs, then by visions of heaven in which the
dead and soon to be dead mingle with angels playing big band music and
with assorted NBA all-stars (no, the Phantom is not making this up, but
it *is* just a dream, you know), and finally he discovers the link
between what happened 15 years ago, a series of murders by someone known
as "the Gemini killer" that had been solved at about that time, and the
murders that are occurring all around him with astonishing regularity.
What that link is the Phantom will never divulge, but he warns phans not
to get their hopes up; Blatty may be able to make the Devil believable,
but John Le Carre he is not.
     If the Phantom has made this film sound like another FIRST POWER,
or perhaps another PRINCE OF DARKNESS, then he's done it a grave
injustice; perhaps it's because so much of what is enjoyable about THE
EXORCIST III has nothing to do with its rather shopworn plot.  Whereas
THE FIRST POWER and PRINCE OF DARKNESS were exceptionally stupid and
dim-witted films (respectively), films that did not even come close to
doing their subjects justice, THE EXORCIST III delivers.  Although
Blatty could have turned this into another special effects extravaganza,
he directs with a remarkably literate and restrained style.  The murders
all take place off camera, and yet because the characters describe them,
they turn out to be even more effective than the most heavy-handed slash
and trash scene.  Instead of seeing decapitations and disembowelments,
we hear about them -- something truly unique in these very illiterate,
yet overly literal, days.  It is psychological horror at its very best:
we are scared not because of what we see, but because of what we hear
and imagine.
     And still more remarkably, the film has a very low SLC Quotient
[from the Phantom's Dictionary of Horror Film Reviewing Terms:
"Spring-Loaded Cat Quotient," so named in honor of the technique Ridley
Scott used to scare his audience in ALIEN].  The film has a spare
feeling, and most scenes have just two or three people in them; in fact,
the film's most effective scenes are staged in a cell in which Scott
listens to the Gemini killer discuss his work.  Not since HENRY:
PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER has a director attempted to get his audience
inside the head of a psychopath, and while John McNaughton was far more
successful in his excellent HENRY, Blatty, utilizing some rather
eccentric and compelling monologues, comes close.
     There are no profound surprises to be found in Blatty's plot, and
for a film that starts out with a rather interesting premise, THE
EXORCIST III ends in a very conventional way.  In fact, the Phantom has
heard rumors that the original version of the film did not end with an
exorcism as the current version does, and that the ending was mandated
by nervous studio executives who didn't feel comfortable releasing a
film called THE EXORCIST III if it didn't contain at least one exorcism.
These same meddlers might then also be responsible for the film's only
scenes of blood and gore, scenes which seem remarkably out of place
given the tone of preceding 90 minutes.  The Phantom has not read
"Legion," so he doesn't know whether or not an exorcism was featured in
Blatty's original conception of the story.  But the film's ending is
both disappointing and jarring -- worse than being simply a bad ending,
it seems entirely inappropriate.
     But that is but a small quibble.  For the most part, Blatty
deserves nothing but praise for attempting to raise the genre from the
black depths into which Jason, Michael and Freddy have cast it.  Simply
put, THE EXORCIST III is a very enjoyable, very compelling, and very
successful horror film.  See it, phans; it's even worth $7.50.

Title
Review for Man's Best Friend (1993)
     As it happens, the very friendly-looking, good-natured dog that is
the star of MAN'S BEST FRIEND -- John Lafia's ill-fated, poorly-made
updating of Stephen King's CUJO -- is apparently supposed to be rather
more evil-minded than the enthusiastic, happy-go-lucky fool he appears
to be throughout most of the film.  And he is, in fact, a Tibetan
mastiff, a bit of information the Phantom was able to glean from the
review in the New York Times -- which can only mean that it was
mentioned in the press kit, since the reviewer assigned to the unsavory
task of writing up this turkey normally spends his time reviewing pop
music and likely knows even less about dogs than he does about horror
films.  As no press kits were made available to the Phantom, he'll
trust Mr. Holden got the breed right, even if the rest of his review
was, as usual, something less than helpful.
     The Phantom figured that Max (short for EMAX 3000, his official
designation as yet another genetically-enhanced product of science run
amok) was part of the "working dog" group, but it was hard to tell
exactly what breed this smiling, happy dog was.  Not St. Bernard,
though that was the Phantom's first guess, perhaps influenced by the
preview for BEETHOVEN'S 2ND, a movie that as it happens looks a lot
like MAN'S BEST FRIEND with fewer prosthetic canine effects and one or
two less maulings.  And he certainly wasn't a Doberman, or a
Rottweiller, or a German Shepherd -- or in fact any breed of dog bred
for at least a modicum of aggression under the right circumstances.  Or
any breed in the Husky family that might, on first sight, raise uneasy
thoughts of our none-too-friendly relationship with wolves and other
wild predators.  No indeed.  This dog was just a big, sloppy, friendly
dog of indeterminate breed who wouldn't scare a three-year-old; and
unless one harbored an unreasonable fear of drool, it's hard to see how
he could inspire even a worried thought or two, let alone real terror.
     Cujo was a big, normally harmless St. Bernard-like mutt, which
might have raised similar problems for King; however, Cujo was rabid,
and a rabid St. Bernard could certainly engage in activities a tad more
worrisome than chronic slipper-chewing.  And while Lewis Teague's
screen adaptation was not entirely successful, it did at least capture
the horror inherent in the situation: a normally domesticated friend of
man who, because he becomes possessed by forces outside of his control,
turns on his master and everyone else he would normally do no more than
drool on.  It's exactly the scenario that made CHILD'S PLAY such an
effective film -- what could be more frightening than seeing a friend
turn on us, especially one that should be entirely in our control?
Lafia, who as a writer-director turned in a very serviceable entry in
the "small doll run amok" sub-genre of horror cinema with CHILD'S PLAY
2 (and whose witty screenplay helped make the original CHILD'S PLAY a
sleeper hit), seems a bit at sea here, not knowing how MAN'S BEST
FRIEND should play -- one moment we're convinced that Max might really
run amok, and the next we're listening to a none-too-convincing parrot
get all the best lines in the screenplay.
     The very thin plot revolves around Ally Sheedy who, as a hot-shot
television news producer, discovers that the friendly mad scientists at
EMAX experiment on animals.  After a daring break-in, Sheedy and her
assistant go to some lengths to present us with a brief episode of
"Vivisection on Parade" -- film which would make any PETA member proud,
and which presumably provides MAN'S BEST FRIEND with its redeeming
social value; then Sheedy discovers Max.  Naturally upon seeing a very
large, caged and tortured animal, the first thing she does is pose with
him; the second thing she does is release him and take him home with
her, making only a quick pit-stop at a local 7-11 to get mugged and
allow Max to perform an off-camera Charles Bronson impersonation by
mauling the mugger (in a startlingly non-graphic off-camera scene) and
returning Sheedy's purse to her.  The fact that the mugger is nearly
dismembered is not revealed until very late in the film, leaving us to
wonder both how the film planned to go about earning its "R" rating and
how Max -- who returns to the parking lot looking just as happy and
well-groomed as he left it -- cleaned himself up so much in the few
seconds he had off camera.  Just the first of far too many continuity
problems in the sloppily-written screenplay; occasionally the Phantom
enjoys keeping track of such blunders, but in the case of MAN'S BEST
FRIEND it quickly became clear that if he kept count he'd need more
than two paws to do so; in fact Lafia's screenplay is on occasion so
bad that it seemed a whole litter's worth of paws might be needed.
     Putting continuity and a distinct lack of horror aside, early on
it became obvious to the Phantom that Sheedy was, herself, part of
what's wrong with MAN'S BEST FRIEND, and that he was not the only
member of the audience hoping for her timely demise (hopefully at Max's
hand -- or rather, his paw).  Her character is written as unlikable and
stupid, and Sheedy certainly does the role credit; yet as incredible as
it may seem, Sheedy's character is the most likeable and intelligent in
the film.  Her yuppie boyfriend certainly goes to great lengths to be
as unappealing as possible, and yet it's not until the film is nearly
over that Max decides to put us out of our misery by engaging in yet
another off-camera mauling.  Tied for third in the "least appealing
character in this film" contest are everyone else.
     This would not necessarily be a bad thing, since after all there's
nothing like watching a really annoying character get chewed to death,
but Lafia is curiously reluctant to show much of anything on camera.
Yes, special effects are expensive, but what's the point of making an
R-rated horror film that's less violent than HOME ALONE?  So as in
JURASSIC PARK, much of the carnage is left to our imaginations; of
course Speilberg wanted JURASSIC PARK to be as much of a horror film as
JAWS and DUEL were and filmed it as such, whereas it looks like Lafia
aimed for horror/comedy and missed.  MAN'S BEST FRIEND, on the
infrequent occasions when it does decide to turn back into a horror
film, plays a lot like ALIEN might had it been set in the middle of a
open, sunny field, rather than on a dark, claustrophobic spaceship.
Since the maulings are all shot from Max's perspective; since we know
where everyone is throughout; and since in any event the carnage is
something less than graphic, the audience doesn't find itself exactly
overwhelmed by feelings of tension or terror.  Which leaves the comic
aspects of MAN'S BEST FRIEND, about which the less said the better.
     And then there's Max himself, who is presented throughout the
first two-thirds of the film as a sort of Lassie on steroids, able to
maul muggers, rid the neighborhood of pesky cats, and perform minor
light truck repairs while bounding around with a suspiciously sunny
disposition.  Even by the end of the film, and wearing a fair amount of
uncomfortable-looking canine prosthetics, Max just doesn't come off as
a worthy successor to DEVIL DOG: THE HOUND FROM HELL (the
mid-seventies, made-for-television production that remains one of the
prototypical "Man's Worst Enemy" horror films).  We wait, it seems in
vain, for Max to get mean, or angry, or even the least perturbed, but
waiting is the order of the day in MAN'S BEST FRIEND -- nothing much
happens when the screenplay isn't focused on a cliched set piece (Max
chases a cat; Max finds true love in the form of a collie named Heidi;
Max pays back the abusive, crazy-looking, junkyard-dwelling loner with
which the idiot Sheedy left him after reading his "Dog needed for
endless, cruel abuse -- large friendly dogs with amiable, sunny
dispositions preferred" want-ad in the newspaper and deciding that this
would be the best way to keep Max out of the hands of the mad
scientists at EMAX).  And when Max finally snaps, he does so only
because he's been so thoroughly provoked that even had he been
cross-bred with Ghandi he could hardly have restrained himself
further.  Although Max is not exactly kept on the shortest of leashes
in this film, he generally does little more than perform a set number
of impressive tricks and wonder whether every washed up, post-BREAKFAST
CLUB actor will eventually be reduced to co-starring with members of
another species.
     Lance Henriksen, as the mad-scientist-who-would-dare-to-play-God,
blunders through much of the film harassing two stereotypical cops and
urging them to find his million-dollar dog; should Max continue to
remain unfound, there's no telling what might happen.  Dire things are
predicted: once the drugs that keep Max looking and acting an awful lot
like a very clever, well-trained and friendly Tibetan mastiff wear off,
he will be transformed into a crazed, unstoppable killing machine,
ridding the film of extraneous characters left and right.  Maulings;
chewings; fatal lickings -- anything could happen.  Carnage-A-Go-Go --
really!  But the Phantom should have known better, much as the two
people who walked out on the film midway through obviously did.  Any
film that talks this much about terrible things to come generally
provides little in the way of terror, and much in the way of being just
plain terrible.
     The Phantom could go on, but let's face it -- this film just
doesn't work.  Sheedy needs to call her agent; Max should call his
trainer; and Lafia should stick to playing with dolls.  Although MAN'S
BEST FRIEND has a few funny moments, it can't hold a candle to
BEETHOVEN; and as far as horror goes, it was fairly obvious to the
Phantom that the screenplay wasn't HOUSE-broken enough to qualify.
Calling this film a dog is too easy; but as we're just days away from
Thanksgiving, calling it a turkey will do.

Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
     "Perhaps it was the Dristan," the Phantom thought to himself as he
left the theater.  Surely the film itself -- a big-budget, prestige film
made by one of our most talented and respected filmmakers -- couldn't
have been as bad as it seemed.  Worse than bad, really, for at times it
seemed downright incompetent, and if Coppola is anything at all, he's a
most able director who has worked successfully in several different
genres, from thriller to war film, crime drama to horror -- a man who in
fact is responsible for several of the best films of our time.
     So yes, it had to be an unforeseen side-effect of the cold
medication the Phantom had taken with his $2 Coke just before the film
started.  Perhaps its chemistry reacted badly with that of the "golden
topping" on the Phantom's $3 popcorn; perhaps the Phantom was still
suffering the after-effects of jet lag as his body struggled to cope
with the one hour time change between the Loews Astor Plaza in midtown
Manhattan and the suburbs of Chicago from which he had just arrived.  It
had to be something.
     Well, it *was* something: it was possibly the least competent
horror film and the biggest waste of time, money, and talent the Phantom
has witnessed in years.  In fact, even putting aside its dubious merits
as a horror film, BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA frequently failed even to be
nothing more than competent, unremarkable filmmaking.  It was, in short,
a terrible, horrific botch.
     That the film is also one of the most successful of the fall season
can only be attributed to the ever more apparent Verhoeven-ization of
America.  We are now, it seems, a nation of people who will watch nearly
anything at all as long as it is big-budget, Hollywood-style
entertainment featuring name-brand actors, buckets of blood, and just
enough naughty goings on to keep the prurient child in all of us up past
his bedtime.  Coppola's DRACULA is without a doubt the most successful
translation of Paul Verhoeven's formula -- perfected in the blockbuster
film BASIC INSTINCT -- to another genre.  
     Sadly, with the possible exception of musical comedy, it is perhaps
the genre for which the BASIC INSTINCT treatment is least appropriate;
for while any mediocre thriller can be enlivened by the odd ice-pick
killing or kinky sex scene, a good horror film must be subtle above all
else.  At first this may seem like a contradiction in terms -- after
all, if a horror film is to horrify us, mustn't it feature chainsaw
murders galore, buckets of blood, walking corpses, or some other equally
shocking special effects?  The answer is no, at least not if the film
has pretensions to be anything other than drive-in fodder.  The best
horror films do feature scenes of horror -- THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS
would have seemed more like MY DINNER WITH ANDRE if Demme had left out
Hannibal Lector's jailbreak -- but those scenes are not what drives
them.  In fact, while the audience may be momentarily shocked by such
scenes -- may even find them unforgettable, as many did the infamous
shower scene in PSYCHO -- the grueling atmosphere of tension and fear
that audiences feel while watching the best horror films is generated by
all that builds up to those scenes, not by the scenes themselves, which
serve as a form of psychological release from the preceding tension.  If
a film is nothing but scene after scene of horror, it's really little
more than pornography: something that can be enjoyed only on the most
voyeuristic of levels.  What disturbed audiences about the classic
horror film HENRY: PORTRAIT OF A SERIAL KILLER was not so much the
scenes in which Henry kills someone -- there are enough of these scenes
in the film, true, but not really more than in any average horror film
-- but the scenes in which very little at all was going on.  In
particular, the scene in which Henry describes the circumstances
surrounding his mother's death is one of the most gripping -- and
horrifying -- in the film, and it touched audiences in just the way the
scenes featuring Dr.  Lector and Clarice Starling did in THE SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS.  No buckets of blood; no writhing naked female vampires; no
ice-pick killings, but great horror nonetheless -- in fact, because of
it.
     What we were promised when Coppola set out to bring yet another
version of Dracula to the screen was a return to Stoker's original text,
long and consistently ignored in screen adaptations of his work.  The
sixty years since the classic (and now somewhat quaint) version
featuring Bela Lugosi's elegant Count have allowed filmmakers to make
more explicit what was only implied in Stoker's tale.  That this is
hardly to anyone's benefit can be seen in Coppola's extended testimonial
to the efficacy of Karo syrup and Hollywood's special effects industry:
although the film is awash in blood, fancy costumes, miniatures, and
matte paintings from the moment the film begins to the moment it ends,
it's only after we leave the theater that we have time to wonder what
all the fuss was about.  For all the vaunted authenticity and loving
attention to detail that $42 million can buy, it would seem that Coppola
overlooked some frequently neglected but important aspects of his craft:
the ability to tell a coherent story and present credible characters and
motivations for those characters to the audience, and then allow the
audience to use its own imagination to fill in the details.  
     The best horror films -- in fact, the best films of any kind --
leave more to the audience's imagination than we may at first realize:
consider the infamous chainsaw scene in De Palma's SCARFACE, which many
people find too graphic to watch, but which few people realize features
nothing more than quick cuts between a chainsaw, the victim, and blood
on a shower curtain.  All the carnage is in their minds, where it
affects them so much more deeply than any amount of explicit on-screen
gore could.  Even though film is primarily a visual medium, explicitness
is nearly always dispensable when good writing and acting are available;
it's only when they're not that we get to see Michael Douglas' naked
rear end.  In the case of DRACULA, we get a two-hour definition of the
word "rococo" -- a word that until now the Phantom has reserved for use
as the ever-dependable answer to 14-across in the New York Times
crossword puzzle, but one which will from this moment on be inextricably
linked in his mind to images of over-decorated sound stages and young
female actresses who are alternately either over- or under-dressed
almost faster than the next bottle of Karo can be pressed into service.
     Whether Stoker's original novel had the problems Coppola's film
adaptation has is beside the point -- after all, a film is not a novel
and many sacrifices must be made in order to compress a sprawling
narrative into a screenplay for a film with a running length of just
under two hours.  The studio's publicity machine played up the
authenticity angle for all it was worth, and as a result many film
critics seem to have been bamboozled into believing that confusing,
poorly drawn characters, bad editing, and enough narrative for another
GODFATHER trilogy was a necessary price to pay so that we could finally,
for the first time in the history of the silver screen, enjoy on film
what Stoker originally was able to convey to us only on paper.  A
triumph, then, of research and period accuracy!  Amazing that Coppola
could achieve so much without the use of such non-authentic, modern
techniques as optical printing and other computer-aided special effects!
A visual feast of epic proportions!
     Well, so was BASIC INSTINCT, and the Phantom heard precious little
from these same critics about the visual feast Verhoeven presented to us
in the form of Sharon Stone.  While the Phantom has always been a phan
of Coppola's work (particularly his early work, including such
masterpieces of realism as THE CONVERSATION and THE GODFATHER), he
cannot for the life of him understand what happened between the time
Coppola read James V.  Hart's screenplay and the time the last bucket of
blood was tossed in the camera's general direction.  
     In fact, it would be easier to discuss what *isn't* wrong with
DRACULA than to review what is.  For all its faults, Coppola's film has
a lush, rich look that is very effective in setting the tone of the
film, dominated though it is by a heavy reliance on interiors, matte
paintings, and miniatures.  And in taking a page from Sam Raimi's book,
Coppola doesn't overlook any special effect or camera trick that would
have been possible before the introduction of computers into mainstream
filmmaking (so there is, thankfully, no T2-style morphing in the film).
Thus he gives us many strange points of view and unexpected movements of
the camera; several sequences in EVIL DEAD-vision (played as a homage to
the very few special effects in the 1922 silent classic NOSFERATU); and
many subtle and playful tricks for the eye, from shadows that don't, to
the Count himself, who doesn't always turn up where our rational senses
demand he should.
     But it's what he doesn't give us that makes the film so
disappointing.  Putting aside the screenplay (which is packed full of
enough exposition for three DRACULA films), Coppola's tendency to jump
us quickly from one scene to the next, then back again, then somewhere
else entirely; the dim lighting; the decision to shoot the entire film
inside a sound stage, giving the production a very claustrophobic feel;
and the miscasting of the film's principals all lead inexorably to the
very confusing and muddled result.  The film as structured is completely
dependent on the eventual emotional connection between Ryder and Oldman,
but for whatever reason this never happens -- and in any event, their
eventual meeting comes much too late in the proceedings to make much
difference at that point.  If the point of this version of the Dracula
legend is to play up the "Love Never Dies" aspect of the story --
certainly a promising new take on a shopworn old tale -- why is the
climactic meeting so delayed?  Coppola's answer seems to be that he
needed time to give us three or four other climaxes first, and while
each vignette plays out satisfactorily, we are hurled from one to the
next so quickly and abruptly that we lose any sense of continuity; by
the time the film has reached its final "climax" we can barely keep up
with the plot, let alone any of the characters who are tossed in for the
film's denouement.  Did we really need Van Helsing *and* Renfield *and*
not one; not two; but three of Lucy's suitors?  Is Jonathan Harker
(Keanu Reeves) important at all?  If not, why does he dominate the first
half of the film?  If so, why is he literally abandoned halfway through?
Coppola doesn't seem to know; worse, he doesn't seem to care.  And by
the end of the film, neither do we.
     It may be that Coppola started down this road with good intentions;
after all, it's hard to believe that such a mess could have been made
intentionally.  Ironically, by sparing no expense in attempting to
create an up-to-date version of the Dracula tale by returning to the
original narrative, Coppola accomplished much less than Roger Corman
might have 30 years ago for over $40 million less.  His adaptations of
Edgar Allen Poe's short stories -- including the excellent THE HOUSE OF
USHER, THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM, and THE MASQUE OF THE RED DEATH -- are
as full of costumes and over-the-top acting as Coppola's big- budget
kitschfest; but where Coppola lost himself in the techniques of horror
filmmaking like a kid in a -- very expensive -- candy store, Corman
always knew what was most important and what safely could be offered up
as a sacrifice to the gods of low-budget filmmaking.  Expensive special
effects were never an option for Corman, but sound screenplays and good
performances were, and he never willingly stinted on those.  As a
result, Corman's Poe adaptations are as beautiful, as watchable, and as
effective today as they were almost three decades ago.  And whereas
these films remain among the very best of his work, Coppola's
kitchen-sink adaptation of Stoker's tale will likely be forgotten six
months after its inevitable video release.
     In fact, it's already seeming a little hazy to the Phantom, though
then again, that could have more to do with the Dristan than the film
itself.  Perhaps the Phantom's best advice to his phans would be to
avoid operating heavy machinery after watching DRACULA, and to
discontinue use and sneak into ALADDIN in the theater next door if
disorientation sets in.  DRACULA is this season's most expensive
prescription for disappointment, and the Phantom can only hope that its
success does not lead to a wave of similarly sloppy and ineffective
"horror" films in the months and years to come.

Title
Review for Trespass (1992)
     Walter Hill has been responsible for much of what's right -- and
much of what's wrong -- with contemporary action films.  He made his
name with the classic late Seventies exploitation film, THE WARRIORS
(the film that first got theater owners worried about more than just
spilled Coke and gum stuck under the seats), then went on to direct the
somewhat more complex and rewarding films THE LONG RIDERS and SOUTHERN
COMFORT, finally gaining mainstream attention and widespread praise for
his taut and perceptive handling of the film that made Eddie Murphy the
biggest box office draw of the eighties: 48 HRS.
     Since those glory days of the late seventies and early eighties,
however, Hill's contribution to the world of the high quality action
film have been rather substantially diluted by an unbroken string of
cinematic dogs, ranging from STREETS OF FIRE, to BREWSTER'S MILLIONS,
JOHNNY HANDSOME, and RED HEAT, and culminating with the toxically bad
ANOTHER 48 HRS., a film that to this day haunts the Phantom's worst
nightmares.  Phans may be forgiven if they find that they cannot even
remember these titles, let alone if they only vaguely remember seeing
them on cable during what otherwise might have been sleepless nights; at
this point, it's only the studio executives and theater owners who
remember them all too well.  (Think this past summer's box office was a
tad disappointing?  Consider the remarkable summer of 1990, just two
years ago, which gave theater owners the choice of showing ANOTHER 48
HRS., ROBOCOP 2, or simply closing down for a few weeks to cut their
losses and save on their electric bills.)
     Yet Hill does have a certain flair for this genre, if only because
of his ability to take a script that's somewhat sub-par and rather rough
around the edges and finish it with a high visual gloss; whatever his
failings as a director -- perhaps nothing worse than signing on with
sure-to-be-doomed projects like ANOTHER 48 HRS.  -- he is able to give
whatever film he is directing the full Hollywood treatment, complete
with a myriad of odd camera angles, lovingly photographed, slow-motion
death scenes, and an obvious love for the genre.  Certainly there have
been other directors who have done worse with far better material.  And
while this isn't exactly lavish praise, neither is it intended to be a
backhanded compliment -- in the Phantom's opinion, all Hill has to do is
get back to his roots and he'll once again be able to make the kind of
pictures that start riots at the multiplex.
     Until then, however, we have TRESPASS, Hill's latest directorial
effort.  And while not a bad film by any means, neither is it the kind
of film that gets people stirred up -- something for which all
action/exploitation films should strive, even if they do so through the
use of shape-shifting killer robots from the future rather than warring
inner-city gangs.  Although TRESPASS is an entirely competent
undertaking, it also seems a little unfocused and fuzzy around the
edges; at times it even seems a tad schizophrenic.  As a result, Hill
has to do all he can just to keep our attention, let alone get us as
involved in the film as we were well over a decade ago when we first met
up with THE WARRIORS.
     The schizophrenia seems a conceptual problem more than one of
execution, for it seems to the Phantom that even back at its
high-concept birth, no one was quite sure how to play this film -- much
of the time it's difficult to tell whether Hill and writers Bob Gale and
Robert Zemeckis intended TRESPASS to be a remake of John Carpenter's
formative "under siege" film ASSAULT ON PRECINCT 13 (itself a homage to
Howard Hawk's classic western RIO BRAVO) or a spin-off of the
quintessential black exploitation film of the nineties, NEW JACK CITY.
As a result, it's a little of both and not enough of either -- it has
neither the intense, gripping suspense of Carpenter's low-budget
classic, nor the no-holds-barred gangster ethic of the film that once
again brought riots back to our neighborhood cinemas.
     The plot is so simple as to make one appreciate the nuances of
BASIC INSTINCT: two Arkansas firemen (Bill Paxton and William Sadler)
come across a treasure map that points the way to a stash of stolen
religious artifacts in an abandoned warehouse in East St.  Louis.
Coincidentally, this very abandoned warehouse was chosen by Ice-T as an
ideal place to kill one of his disloyal henchmen.  What a coincidence!
The Phantom certainly would never have expected such a thing to happen
(except by purest coincidence), so you can imagine how overjoyed he was
to find that he hadn't spent his $7.50 in vain.  But wait!  After this,
more stuff happens!  Now get this -- you'll never believe it: as it
happens (and purely by chance) our two very white firemen bumble into
the middle of the execution and get both Ice-T, Ice Cube, and all their
very black cronies more than a little miffed at them -- especially after
they take Ice-T's brother hostage.  Thus is the stage set for great
drama and tragedy, just as the Bard might have done it several hundred
years ago.
     Once our brave firemen (one good white guy and one bad white guy;
the Phantom will let you find out for yourself how many good black guys
and bad black guys there are) barricade themselves in the warehouse the
film more or less starts to fall apart.  The problem is that neither
Paxton nor Sadler are very interesting; and neither is particularly
charismatic.  Yet here they are, the ostensible focus of the film, and
forced to deal with the kind of situation that causes most actors to
break out in a cold sweat: the terror of knowing that you must play an
underwritten and somewhat bland character while all around you better
and more charismatic actors distract the director and do everything they
possibly can to keep the audience entertained.
     Also not helping the proceedings very much is the film's strange
case of BODYGUARD-itis, in which a situation with very strong and
obvious racial overtones is simply ignored by the filmmakers.  In the
case of the interracial Kevin Costner/Whitney Houston romance this may
be understandable, since drawing attention to it would be somewhat akin
to exploring the differences between Wonder Bread and Miracle Whip; but
in TRESPASS a potential means to get the audience up and throwing things
at the screen is simply ignored, with the result that everyone in the
cast seems curiously restrained most of the time, as if they'd all been
given a couple of doses of Prozac before the cameras started rolling.
(It seems especially odd to the Phantom -- given the subsequent casting
decisions -- that Gale and Zemeckis included absolutely no racial
epithets in the script; the bad guys are, after all, known for their
racially charged music, and if one is going to cast the authors of "Cop
Killer" and "Black Korea" in a film, one should at least go to the
trouble of giving them something familiar and comforting to say every
now and then.  That Paxton and Sadler have no business in this film in
the first place -- that they were obviously cast in order to lure more
white people to the film and keep it from becoming a warmed over NEW
JACK CITY clone that might earn at most half of NEW JACK CITY's box
office -- is a subject that the Phantom will avoid discussing here.  In
any event, the lack of such in a film made in 1992 serves to do little
but make it seem even more far-fetched and unrealistic than it already
is -- and TRESPASS is hardly well-grounded enough to be able to shoulder
the burden of also seeming like some sort of bizarre urban fairy tale in
which the warehouse walls are all that separate the good white guys from
the bad black guys.)
     What happens once Paxton and Sadler find the loot -- and the bad
guys find out about it, too -- is best left to the paltry imaginations
of writers Gale and Zemeckis; suffice it to say that lots of shell
casings bounce off concrete, visually quite stunning fires break out,
and the all-important Hayes code is observed.  There are few surprises
here other than the film's running length, which for some reason is much
closer to the two-hour mark than it needs to be.  DIE HARD this is not.
(And in this season of bloated running times, the Phantom feels bound to
point out that 48 HRS.  was a mere 97 minutes long, proving once again
that when one has little to say, one is usually best off taking only a
little time in which to say it.)
     Though TRESPASS is a competent action film, it is one that is
curiously insubstantial given its premise.  It's a film that needed some
more charisma at its core (think of how much better the film would have
been had either Paxton or Sadler -- which is which the Phantom is not
sure -- been replaced by Ice Cube, allowing for a powerful, head-to-head
confrontation between him and Ice-T instead of the muted and unaffecting
one that ultimately develops between Ice-T and both of the miscast
principals), and a better focus than that for which its high-concept
origins apparently allowed.  Too, it might have helped to have released
TRESPASS *before* either RESERVOIR DOGS or BAD LIEUTENANT, for then
there wouldn't be such ample reminders of what a good director can do
given a well-crafted story, a literate script, and a surfeit of good
acting.  Hill may not be in the same class as Tarantino (whose
low-budget cult classic RESERVOIR DOGS is fast becoming the DELIVERANCE
of the nineties), but he's a talented director who needs better support
than Gale and Zemeckis -- both clearly out of their element here -- and
the second-guessers at the studio have given him.
     The only reason to see TRESPASS is because it's the only action
film out this Christmas; consider, however, the number of very good
independent films currently in release (including the aforementioned
RESERVOIR DOGS and BAD LIEUTENANT, GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS, and THE CRYING
GAME among them) and whether your $7.50 would be better spent on any of
these fine, well-crafted films, rather than on a by-the-numbers action
film of a kind that we've all seen before -- and likely will all see
again before too long.

Title
Review for Cape Fear (1991)
     The Phantom was pleased to see that the classic "psycho stalks
innocent family" potboiler is alive and well in 1991; CAPE FEAR's 1962
plot still creaks like a porch swing in the wind and its dialogue is
still as wooden as the porch itself, but with his very up-to-date
remake, Martin Scorsese has done for the thriller what Brian DePalma did
for gangster films with his remake of SCARFACE: he's made a somewhat
tongue-in-cheek, fairly scary, and very enjoyable film that gives its
audience exactly what it wants and expects.
     Although Scorsese sticks pretty close to the original film (and
even scatters a handful of references to it throughout his version), the
new CAPE FEAR has been updated enough that it no longer feels like
something you might catch on late-night TV when the only alternatives
are program-length commercials and pitches for 900 "chat" lines.  Though
at times CAPE FEAR's plot gets bogged down under the weight of its own
unlikely machinations, it generally zips along from one predictable
scene to the next, moving quickly to an equally predictable climax and
denouement.  None of this is bad, mind you -- CAPE FEAR is hardly food
for thought, shot through though it is with enough references to
philosophers and famous authors to keep the conversations at three
pretentious art houses rolling long into the night.  It wasn't intended
to make people think thirty years ago, and Scorsese certainly hasn't
done anything to change that.  What it *was* intended to do was give
people a frightening situation and sympathetic characters with which to
identify, and a satisfying conclusion a little under two hours later so
that they could all go home a little bit happier than they arrived,
ready to face their own personal demons and dilemmas with renewed
confidence and vigor.
     Doing so is even easier now that Robert DeNiro plays the psycho,
doing things that likely never even crossed Robert Mitchum's mind in the
original.  He at times comes close to the lunatic performance he turned
in for Scorsese's 1976 classic TAXI DRIVER, though ultimately Max Cady
is a much less psychotic and a much more human character than was Travis
Bickle.  Max is a menace from first scene to last, and the fact that
Scorsese has made the family he stalks a little less perfect than
Gregory Peck's family was in the original does nothing to lessen the
empathy we feel for them.  In fact, it does just the opposite; in the
complex world of the 90s, it would be difficult for audiences to believe
that such a perfectly innocent family could possibly exist, and who
knows -- they might even start rooting for Max.
     Rooting for Max, though, is still a problem, as DeNiro is easily
the best thing in the film.  Unlike THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS, wherein
audiences were awed by Hannibal Lector but ultimately rooted for Clarice
Starling, CAPE FEAR presents us with one very interesting villain and
one very uninteresting family.  Try as he might to spice up Sam Bowden's
family, Scorsese can't take what is essentially an unbalanced film and
turn it into something it was never intended to be.  By making Cady such
an impressive character (and by allowing DeNiro to start gnawing at the
scenery more than a few times), Scorsese gives us no other point of
focus, and when the film returns to Nick Nolte and his family, we feel
like counting the minutes until Cady's next appearance.  The film truly
revolves around him, rather than around Sam Bowden and his besieged
family, and that's just one of CAPE FEAR's fundamental problems.
     Another is that Scorsese piles on the directorial flourishes that
he's always used in moderation to enhance his other films.  In
GOODFELLAS and RAGING BULL, the camera work and editing helped pull the
audience into the film, where they discovered that there was more to
each of these films than just what was apparent from a casual viewing.
But in CAPE FEAR, the nervous camera work, flashy editing, and excessive
and obvious tricks of cinematography are all for naught -- once we get
past them we discover that this film has no deeper meaning, no reason to
exist beyond what is apparent to us on the surface.  By the third time
he shows us the Spielberg-esque roiling skies over the troubled town,
it's difficult to think of anything other than POLTERGEIST and half a
dozen bad horror films.  Scorsese also seems obsessed by the meaningless
and distracting trick of turning color into black-and-white negatives;
once would have been visually interesting, though rather portentous, but
as with every other cinematic effect in the film, Scorsese overuses it.
All those negatives did serve to remind the Phantom that he was overdue
for his annual dental checkup, but beyond that it is painfully obvious
that the effects are in the film simply to be in the film.  By the end
of CAPE FEAR, the Phantom had new respect for the work of the Coen
brothers, whose flashy but similarly empty BLOOD SIMPLE is a far less
overwrought and a far more successful film.
     Having said all this, however, the Phantom should hasten to add
that CAPE FEAR was still a lot of fun to watch, especially if one
doesn't go into it expecting Scorsese's typically excellent work.  This
film doesn't hold a candle to GOODFELLAS, and truth be told it's really
one of his lesser efforts.  Still, there's a lot to be said for sitting
back, relaxing, and watching DeNiro become one family's worst nightmare.
And then there's his accent, which in the Phantom's opinion certainly
gives Al Pacino's hilariously bad Cuban accent in SCARFACE a run for its
money as the least plausible accent in modern film history (this is true
only if we discount Kevin Costner's performance in ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF
THIEVES; Costner is without a doubt the Tony Curtis of our time, and
just as Curtis brought his unique Brooklyn accent to every one of his
roles, so too does Costner bring a little bit of California with him
into Sherwood forest where he is the least well-spoken in his band of
merry men).
     That accent -- and whatever it is that DeNiro constantly does with
his mouth -- brought a smile to the Phantom's own mouth more than a few
times; it also served to keep the Phantom from trying to read too much
into the somewhat loopy goings-on in the film.  As long as CAPE FEAR is
taken as pure, predictable entertainment, it works fairly well.  That
was the spirit in which the Phantom saw CAPE FEAR, and taken thusly, the
film is good for a solid two hours of fun.  Scorsese's overwrought (but
well executed) special effects will likely lose a lot on the small
screen, and Elmer Bernstein's adaptation of the wonderful score for the
original CAPE FEAR will similarly suffer when squeezed through the
2-inch speaker in your Sony, so the Phantom recommends seeing CAPE FEAR
while it's still in theaters.
     And now, because the Phantom's review is a little short this time,
here's an example of what "professional" reviewers can sometimes get
away with.  The Phantom's occasionally excessive alliteration typically
can't hold a candle to the delightful examples that Vincent Canby slips
into his film reviews for the New York Times every so often.  Here's
Vincent Canby on CAPE FEAR:
    [...]  Though their "Cape Fear" is no more realistic or socially
    significant than Mr. Thompson's, it moves with the same merciless
    melodramatic momentum as Mr. Scorsese's "Goodfellas."  The film is
    sleight of hand of high order and, at carefully calculated moments,
a
    blunt shocker.
    Unlike the original, this "Cape Fear" doesn't pretend to be a
picture
    of paradise in peril.  It is apparent from the beginning that all is
    not well [...]
     For all his faults, the Phantom has always been a phan of Canby's;
now if only someone would volunteer to pay the Phantom for his own
efforts he'd be able to quit his day job and attend more matinees.  Nice
work if you can get it...

Title
Review for Candyman (1992)
[A brief note: the somewhat crabby tone of the Phantom's latest review
should be attributed more to the fact that it was written during the
most recent Presidential debate than to the quality of the film itself;
in retrospect, the debate apparently skewed the Phantom's ability to
make reasoned -- and above all, brief -- arguments.  CANDYMAN is worth
about 2 1/2 stars out of 4, and depending on how quickly you read, may
in fact take less time to get through than this review.  As compensation
for this, please feel free to smoke, keep crying babies in the room with
you, and leave empty popcorn and soda containers wherever they may fall.
Thank you, and enjoy the show.]
     The Phantom has long held a theory about horror films, but it was
only recently that he got to confirm it.  Although he's not subjected
this theory to rigorous testing, he nonetheless now feels confident
enough to state that to his knowledge the word "thesis" has never
appeared in the screenplay for a successful horror film.  Actually,
let's rephrase that: the word "thesis" has never appeared in the
screenplay for a *good* horror film, as it remains to be seen whether or
not CANDYMAN will be successful in this unpleasant season of sub-par
horror.
     It is with some trepidation that the Phantom has returned to the
reviewing scene; having seen both HELLRAISER III and INNOCENT BLOOD, it
occurred to the Phantom that modern horror has now gotten so far
off-track; so misguided; and so poorly executed that his services were
perhaps no longer necessary -- that at this point the best he can hope
to do is to act as something of a morning traffic report for this fall's
horrible horror films.  Perhaps all he can be expected to do now is
point out the apparently never ending series of cinematic traffic jams
and roadside wrecks to phans who are more than likely already in their
cars and pounding their dashboards in frustration.  Like the morning
rush, bad cinematic horror is with us always; yet somehow we're always
aggrieved and surprised whenever we come face to face with it.
     After all, it's one thing if we're treated to one good horror film
out of every three or four; it's another if we find ourselves buried in
cynical, misguided dreck, powerless to stop its production and release,
and yet helpless in our fervent hopes that *this* time things will be
different -- that *this* time John Landis or the vaunted Clive Barker
won't let us down, even though he has now more often than his ubiquitous
press clippings would have us believe.
     In fact, although Barker has now lent his name and dubious
executive producing talent to a half dozen different horror films, he
has actually directed only one and a half.  The half is of course
HELLRAISER, the film that guaranteed him future directing offers even
though the film itself was more or less taken away from him and given to
Tony Randel to complete.  (Randel also directed Barker's second film,
HELLBOUND: HELLRAISER II and showed the same sure touch there that he
did in the first installment.)  Barker's only complete effort,
NIGHTBREED, had the look of a good horror film; its plot was taken from
one of Barker's better stories, the novella "Cabal"; it even had the
benefit of David Cronenberg's quite disturbing performance as the
psychiatrist Decker, and his alter ego, The Mask.  Yet the film itself
was something of a mess -- something that pleased neither those who read
the novella nor those who didn't, disappointing the former and leaving
the latter in a DUNE-like dark.  Here, as with the visually stunning
HELLRAISER, Barker seemed much better introducing new ideas and creating
visually compelling tableaus than he was at the nuts-and-bolts execution
that any good horror film requires.
     And HELLRAISER III?  It's a movie that was quite obviously made
just to rake in as much money as possible from gullible horror fans;
beyond a few good special effects, there's virtually nothing of interest
in this installment of the HELLRAISER series.  (In fact, the high point
of the film for the Phantom came early on, when he got a free package of
Honey Gold Wheaties to try, just for buying a ticket.  Sadly, the cereal
in the package had a lot more snap crackle and pop than did the serial
on the screen.)  This is all quite an achievement, for Barker and
friends have in just two sequels managed to do what the folks at New
Line Cinema took four to do with the ELM STREET series: run it
completely into the ground.
     All of which brings us to CANDYMAN, yet another film based on a
Clive Barker short story, and one for which Barker served only as
executive producer (Hollywood-ese for "the man who gets paid or the film
don't get made".)  Although far from a successful horror film, CANDYMAN
is at least technically very well made; competently acted and directed;
at times visually compelling; and frequently quite scary.  Yet for the
Phantom, it just didn't seem very *good*.
     Let's explore this for a moment, keeping in mind the Phantom's
theory about the word "thesis", and going back to the short story on
which CANDYMAN was based, "The Forbidden".  Briefly, Barker's original
story was based on the idea that an isolated community that exists
outside the realm of "civilized" society might not only develop legends
about a fearsome boogeyman -- a phantom killer who dispatches his
victims in gruesome ways and is as capricious as he is vicious -- but
that it would actively work to keep the legend alive -- and very real.
Barker's execution of this idea is quite compelling, because he takes
you quickly from outside this closed community into its heart, where you
discover a secret that at first doesn't seem to make any sense.  Why
would a community live with this horror?  Do they even have a choice?
Do they *want* to?  Interesting, and certainly the stuff of which great
short stories are made.
     We've seen hints of this on the screen before: consider, say, the
beginning of John Landis' classic AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON, where
you stumble into a community that's hiding some strange secret,
something that outsiders don't understand.  The community is afraid of
the werewolves all right; yet they don't actively seek them out and hunt
them down.  Instead, they live with the terror of knowing that whoever
may stray onto the moors late at night might well become the next victim
(or perhaps become himself another werewolf).  One of the things that
makes tales of werewolves so compelling is the fact that by definition
werewolves are part of a community, at least for 29 days out of every
month -- it's just during the full moon that they find themselves
preying on their neighbors.  In much the same way, Candyman has been
part of the community on which he preys for so long that to kill him
would be to change the very nature of the community itself.  Isn't it
worth living with a little horror if it means we can remain comfortably
in the realm of the known?  If it means that we can keep alive something
that makes our isolated and shunned community special?  For such a
slippery and tricky topic, Barker managed a tour de force, both
frightening and thought-provoking; it's no accident that tales like "The
Forbidden" made his well-deserved reputation as a master story-teller.
     Of course, like many great short stories, this one is good partly
because it's *short*.  That is, the idea is sufficient to hold us
spellbound for thirty or forty pages, but if it were padded out beyond
that, things would start to break down and the story would start
straying to less compelling or original ideas.  Hence, Landis gave us a
taste of what it means for a werewolf to be part of a community but then
quickly moved on to the main focus of the film.  Barker kept "The
Forbidden" very brief -- you're plunged into the community very quickly;
you discover Candyman's secret alter and why "Sweets for the sweet" is
written all over the place; finally, you meet Candyman and die with the
heroine and the baby she finds left for him as a sacrifice.  End of
story.
     Could something like this translate well to the screen?  The
Phantom thinks that only a genius of the form could have carried it off;
perhaps John Carpenter in his better days, or Frank Henenlotter if
someone could convince him to stay away from that ever-tempting latex.
But none of the people responsible for CANDYMAN -- either singly or
together -- have the talent to do this successfully, which means that
right from the start a lot of compromises have to be made.  Now,
compromises in and of themselves are not necessarily bad, as long as
everyone agrees that they're no longer going to be filming a strict
adaptation of original story.  Carpenter's version of THE THING is a
testament to what a little creative re-writing can do for a film;
CANDYMAN, alas, is not.
     What does all this have to do with having the word "thesis" in a
horror film?  Simply that from the very beginning, the screenplay for
CANDYMAN wanders wide afield of what should be its primary focus and
spends most of two hours going this way and that, never quite sure of
its intentions even until the very end.  (Or perhaps especially at the
very end, which must be one of the most blatant cop-out endings in the
history of the horror film -- worse even in some ways than the
ever-reincarnating Freddy and Jason, since it's difficult to get upset
with films that we hold in so little esteem to begin with.)
     Instead of putting us right in the community and letting us
experience Candyman first hand with the people who are living their
lives with him, the filmmakers focus on a doctoral candidate working on
her thesis: that the people in a housing project on Chicago's South Side
would start to blame a mythical boogeyman for some of the gruesome
murders that occur there with alarming frequency.  (In the short story,
Barker uses a similar device to get the protagonist into the community,
but there she goes to study graffiti as a form of youthful expression
and only stumbles onto the legend by accident.)  But this doesn't really
make any sense, does it?  The people living in urban ghettos live with
unspeakable violence and murder every day, and they know exactly who is
responsible -- for people who must take care leaving their homes not
just during a full moon but at any time of any day, a boogeyman who
kills some poor soul with a meat hook once in a blue moon would be the
very least of their worries.
     Too, the legend is distorted to fit HELLRAISER-like sensibilities:
instead of being an unknowable and capricious god, Candyman becomes a
lot like Pinhead -- look into a mirror and say his name five times and
he'll appear.  But given that all Candyman will do is kill you, why on
earth would anyone do this?  At least Pinhead promised you a lifetime of
pleasure/pain if you solved his puzzle box and thereby called him forth
from the depths of hell (though this idea was all but discarded by the
time HELLRAISER III was cranked out).  Wasn't the idea supposed to be
that Candyman was a horrible monster, perhaps real, perhaps legend, who
killed the poor folks in the ghetto whenever the spirit moved him?
     As if this weren't confusing enough, apparently someone saw and
enjoyed THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS and thought that having a spunky
investigator go after a mysterious serial killer would be just the
ticket, especially if both investigator and serial killer form some sort
of relationship.
     But how on earth does any of this fit with the original story's
driving idea?  As it happens, not very well at all, and the result is a
well-filmed, competently made mish-mash of excessive exposition,
senseless "spring-loaded cat" stunners for an audience growing restless
with the essential rootlessness of the screenplay, and the sense that
the rewriting continued long after the cameras started rolling.
     So instead of using the heroine as a way to keep the focus of the
film squarely on Candyman himself -- a technique used to perfection in
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS -- we get involved in her marital difficulties and
in her quest for a thesis topic; then the film shifts still further away
from Candyman as more and more of the plot concerns itself with her,
even though the Phantom doesn't remember seeing her name above the
shadowy figure in the film's print ads.  Meanwhile, what happened to
those people in the projects?  Candyman is at least ostensibly part of
their community, but that's true only for the first half of the film; by
the time the terribly contrived ending finally rolls around, they've
been reduced to stoic-looking bystanders.
     As if to help keep the film on track, the filmmakers load it with
scene after scene of exposition.  We're even plunked into the middle of
a lecture on "modern oral history", presumably just in case we don't
know what a legend is.  Does anyone remember a lecture on the clinical
definition of "sociopath" in SILENCE OF THE LAMBS?  Were we the poorer
for its lack?  Or was Demme able to *show* us what a sociopath is, to
put us right in a cell with one and let us feel a little of what Clarice
Starling must have been feeling during her interviews with Lector.  This
is, after all, what people go to the movies for -- if we wanted a
narrative, we'd read Barker's short story.  (Not that this is an
either/or situation, but movies are a primarily visual medium --
filmmakers ignore this at their peril.)
     By its end, the filmmakers have turned CANDYMAN nearly into an ELM
STREET sequel, except without the playful sense of fun.  Why does
Candyman *talk* to this poor woman -- and by extension, to us -- so
much?  The result is that we're always once-removed from the horror;
we're always watching him kill someone else.  That's scary, sure, just
like have a cat jump straight at the screen is scary.  (The Phantom
coined the term "spring-loaded cat" after seeing ALIEN and noting one of
Ridley Scott's favorite scare tactics.)  Yet for all the false scares in
ALIEN, it remains a consummate horror film because Scott lets us
experience the horror *first hand*.  The alien comes right at us
throughout the last half the film -- we're not just sitting around
waiting for it to show up, kill someone else, and put a knife in our
hand in an attempt to add yet one more twist to an already
over-complicated plot.
     Get the sense that the Phantom was somewhat disappointed with
CANDYMAN?  Well, yes, but let's qualify that a little.  First, the film
is anything but the usual run-of-the-mill dreck that these days passes
for modern horror.  It's also head and shoulders above both of its
immediate predecessors, INNOCENT BLOOD and HELLRAISER III, each of which
was so misguided and poorly made as to be nearly unwatchable.  Instead,
CANDYMAN is a good, solid horror film that just didn't click as often as
the Phantom wished it had; because it was, in a strictly technical
sense, so good, the Phantom's disappointment that it didn't deliver on
its promise was all the greater.
     In fact, one of its greatest flaws is that it introduces and then
neglects more good ideas than we're likely to see in the next dozen
horror films.  Among them, the way the filmmakers flirted with some of
our most primal fears about mirrors and walls was both exciting and
disturbing, at least as far as it went.  Mirrors have always featured
prominently in tales of horror, but rarely are they featured as plot
elements in horror films (with the notable exception of THE BOOGEYMAN, a
HALLOWEEN clone that was nearly as good as the film to which it paid
homage).  And the notion that the very walls which provide us with a
feeling of invulnerability and safety might harbor terrors of their own
is a very compelling one; alas, it is dispensed with almost as soon as
it's introduced.
     Ah well.  On balance, you won't go too far wrong in seeing
CANDYMAN; but don't expect either a faithful rendition of Barker's
remarkable short story or even a film that operates on a level higher
than the easy scare -- to the Phantom, CANDYMAN seemed a ghost story
without a payoff.  (Need to know if a horror film is overly complicated
or lacks focus?  Here's a good test: try to relate the film's plot --
that is, explain the film -- to someone, campfire optional.  If you find
it the least bit difficult, chances are the screenplay either got worked
on too little or much too much.)  In the Phantom's opinion, we need more
filmmakers willing to at least attempt to create a subjective and
personal horror experience for their audience, rather than bombard them
with shocks, gore and excessive exposition in an attempt to cover over
the flaws in their screenplays.
     (Or perhaps this means that good writing is just as important in
the cinema as it is on the page, that special effects and spring-loaded
cats can't substitute for intelligent, well-considered terror.  If
nothing else, CANDYMAN is an example of a horror film that is far better
directed than it was written.)
     To close, it is the Phantom's fervent hope that this review has
given you something to think about as we approach the season of ghosts
and witches, even if it has left you no better informed or prepared to
make a decision than did those brief glimpses of nationally televised
hell, the Presidential debates.  Where oh where was Pinhead, Candyman,
Freddy and Jason when we really needed them?

Title
Review for Leprechaun (1993)
     Certain bad films -- most often the very worst -- announce
themselves and their intentions to a critic well before the theater
lights dim, much as a "Bridge Out" sign on a dark and stormy night lets
a motorist know that he or she must detour quickly or risk driving into
an abyss.  The Phantom felt just the sort of feeling of dread that such
a motorist might feel as he arrived at Times Square's premiere palace of
cinematic sleaze, the Criterion theater (now completely made over by
United Artists in an attempt to make it seem more of a mainstream
theater than its red-light roots will ever warrant) for a late-
afternoon showing of LEPRECHAUN.  Before entering the theater, he
happened to glance upward at the Criterion's marquee; however much his
spirits may have been buoyed by his ability to sneak out of work a tad
early on Friday, they quickly slipped off the edge of his critical
ravine when he read the film's tag line: "Your luck has just run out."
     Such tag lines rarely lie.  Consider the early Eighties bomb
STAYING ALIVE, poorly directed by Sylvester Stallone, with terrible
music by his brother Frank and equally appalling acting by John
Travolta, still apparently not mindful  of the various "Bridge Out"
signs he had passed thus far on the highway of his career (including
MOMENT BY MOMENT, a film unforgettable in its badness by the very few
people who have seen it).  In this ill-conceived sequel to SATURDAY
NIGHT FEVER, Travolta plays an aspiring dancer who wants to land a part
in a new Broadway show called "Satan's Alley."  This Broadway show is
billed in the film as "a musical trip through Hell," and as the audience
finds out during the film's closing scenes, no description could be more
accurate.  That the film itself is redeemed only by the sheer comic
awfulness of this Broadway show doesn't diminish the uncanny accuracy of
such descriptions: when you hear that you are about to take a musical
trip through Hell, chances are the film you are watching will go
straight there with all due speed, in or out of a hand-basket.
     As did the subject of this review, the so-called horror film
LEPRECHAUN.  The Phantom says "so-called" since it's not entirely clear
what the filmmakers had in mind here; while there are elements of horror
in the film, much of it is played out as a kind of sick comedy ("sick"
here meaning "not well" or "not good," as opposed to "dark" or
"sinister").  What is even less clear is why this film ever saw the
bright lights of theatrical exhibition; such amateurish productions are
generally reserved for the dank basements of direct- to-video release,
where they join countless other D2V productions that usually exhibit
more creativity and thoughtfulness in their cover art than they do in
their screenplays or direction.
     (It is a fine line indeed that separates D2V releases from their
more legitimate theatrical brethren, but oftentimes that line serves as
the point where talent and sufficient funding end and crass commercial-
ization and quick-buck profiteering begin.  The Phantom has thus far
refrained from reviewing D2V releases only because of the sheer number
of better funded theatrical releases that enjoy higher production values
than typical D2Vs; that alone is worth something, since even if the
films themselves aren't of much higher quality, most action and horror
films play a lot better if their soundtracks are cranked up to
ear-splitting levels and their pictures are projected on 27-foot --
rather than 27-inch -- screens.)
     LEPRECHAUN is a horror film in the "revenge of the little people"
mold and follows such successful entries as CHILD'S PLAY and DOLLS.  But
it follows them at quite a distance and at an equally great disadvantage
-- while its predecessors benefited from the brilliant direction of Tom
Holland and Stuart Gordon (respectively) and from clever and
well-written screenplays, any chance that LEPRECHAUN might turn into an
equally compelling film is wasted early on by nearly everyone involved.
From director to writer, from actors to actresses, no one associated
with this production appears to be very talented or even particularly
interested in producing a decent horror film.  The one exception is
Kevin Kiner, whose effective score is the one bright spot in any
otherwise nearly unbearable production.
     The film's plot -- such as it is -- revolves around the title
character; we discover in a prologue that his gold was stolen by Old Man
O'Grady, who foolishly brings it home with him, thinking all the while
that the leprechaun he tricked into giving it up would remain in Ireland
and presumably file for personal bankruptcy protection.  Needless to
say, the little fellow does not follow Judge Wapner's instructions and
take Old Man O'Grady to court; instead, he takes the law into his own
hands and within just a few minutes causes the entire O'Grady family as
much harm as a tiny little fellow in a cute green suit with big buckles
on his shoes could conceivably cause.
     Fast forward now to ten years in the future.  (To be honest, at
this point the Phantom would have preferred to rewind, but alas no
remote control was available for rental at the snack bar, and he found
himself stranded in the theater auditorium for the duration.)  Arrives
at the house an unlikely collection of stock exploitation characters,
including a dopey father; his pretty and even more dopey daughter; and
"three guys that paint": one an imbecile; one a lame-brained hunk; and
one the most obnoxious child actor since ANNIE graced the silver screen.
As the film drags along we find the dopey daughter and the lame-brained
hunk strike up what passes for a cute flirtation in this kind of film,
and she joins the three guys that paint in doing what is perhaps the
saddest, least adequate job of housepainting since Mr.  Blandings built
his dream house.  (As the film progressed, the Phantom got the feeling
that these were three guys who also write horror film screenplays, which
would certainly explain a lot.)
     While the screen is filled to near overflowing with this torrent of
action, the leprechaun pops in every so often and, well, pesters
everyone.  To say that this leprechaun is no Jason or Freddy is to
understate the situation rather dramatically; although the Phantom tries
mightily never to do anything to spoil a film for his phans, he will
note that the film's body count just barely breaks into single digits.
A cinematic "truth in advertising" law would have required a change in
title to "LEPRECHAUN: PORTRAIT OF A NON-SERIAL KILLER."
     In fact, although this Darth Vader of the Keebler elf set is no
serial killer, there *is* a cereal sight gag in the film wherein the
little fellow comes across a box of Lucky Charms (ho ho!)  in one of a
never-ending series of blatant product placements.  The producers deserve
some credit for actually thanking the two dozen or so different
companies for their financial support of the film in return for an equal
number of rather obvious product placements; but why any legitimate
company would want to become involved in this production is a mystery,
though one that the Phantom has been pondering ever since he discovered
that Frito-Lay products Q especially Doritos Q and Jolt cola are the
official snack foods of Duane, Belial, and the other unique individuals
in Frank Henenlotter's wonderful BASKET CASE films.  Another of the
Phantom's favorite product placements involves the use of the
"Reebok-cam" and the closely related "L.A.  Gear-cam" -- two
modifications of the ground-breaking Steadi-Cam that focus unerringly on
people's feet.  Walking, running, getting into cars, getting out of
cars: if someone's wearing a pair of nationally-advertised athletic
shoes, you'll get a long, lingering look at them.
     As the action in the film heats up to a roaring simmer, we find
that the writer has written us all into a corner: since Old Man O'Grady
is the only one who knows how to kill the leprechaun, and since Old Man
O'Grady has long since been sent to the North Dakota Home for
Embarrassingly Stereotyped Irish Characters, our intrepid band of
nitwits, lame-brains, and obnoxious child actors are forced to seek him
out and discover for themselves how to end the film.  (Sadly they,
unlike the audience, cannot just up and walk out.)  So Tory (the dopey
daughter) goes to the Home to find O'Grady and ask him how he would go
about killing a leprechaun, no doubt apologizing first for dragging him
back into a film he'd successfully escaped nearly 80 minutes before.
     But surprise!  Old Man O'Grady isn't at the home after all;
instead, we are treated to a very poor retread of the famous "attic"
scene in PSYCHO, and Tory runs screaming back to the elevator.  (This is
in fact one of the only moderately scary scenes in the film, and by
revealing it here the Phantom hopes he can dissuade his phans from
seeing LEPRECHAUN's 91 other minutes.)
     Then our luck really does run out.  Apparently noticing that our
band of merry morons *still* has no way to kill the pesty dwarf (or at
least get him to stop screaming "I need me gold!"  every five minutes
like some strung-out Popeye gone terribly awry), the writer does
something that still amazes the Phantom as he thinks back on the film's
sorry plot: he has Old Man O'Grady *fall through the elevator's
ceiling*, and tell Tory with his dying breath what she needs to do to
end the film.  For the first time in his reviewing career the Phantom
was left speechless as he stared, slack-jawed in amazement, at the
screen.  Welcome to plot convenience playhouse, ladies and gentlemen!
Please be sure to check your respect for the audience at the door and
step lively to the film's closing scenes!
     Which, in fact, come right on the heels of this elevonic scene of
great convenience and least effort, a sort of Deus Ex Otis that will
remain with the Phantom for a long time to come.  Certainly he will
think twice before yelling "and how likely is that?"  at the screen
while watching an improbable plot development in some future bad film.
"O'Grady In The Elevator" might even make it into the Phantom's lexicon
of film criticism, right after "Jasonized" and just before
"Spring-Loaded Cat."  (In a way, it's kind of a shame that so few people
will ever see this film; the Phantom could never use a term casually
that only a handful of his phans would understand.)
     It goes without saying at this point that LEPRECHAUN is a complete
waste of time and money.  It is a film that in a better world never
would have been made, and we can only hope that the independent
production company responsible will go the way of Vestron and so many
other over-extended and now bankrupt indies who thought it was as easy
to make movies as it is to distribute videos.  LEPRECHAUN is Trimark
Pictures' very first theatrical release; in honor of the occasion, they
spent the majority of the film's low budget on a barrage of television
advertising in order to rake in as much money as possible in two weeks,
pull up theatrical stakes, and get the film released into the even more
lucrative video market in a couple months time.  So let's all do what we
can to see that this cynical strategy fails: avoid LEPRECHAUN like the
plague, now while it's still in theaters and this spring when it hits
your local Blockbusters.  Although it is not (incredibly!) the worst
film the Phantom has ever seen, it comes much too close for comfort.

Title
Review for Night of the Living Dead (1990)
     George A. Romero may have more of a one-track mind than than do
the zombies that star in his most famous films.  Ever since the original
NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, more than 22 years ago, Romero has strayed
very little from his very successful formula.  Over the course of two
sequels, and now a remake, Romero knows what works, and he knows what
sells.  But perhaps it's time that he and Tom Savini (creature FX and
makeup whiz and the director of the remake) move on.
     The Phantom isn't quite sure what motivated Romero and Savini to
work on a remake of their classic horror film; certainly there have been
sequels -- official and unofficial -- and homages galore since the debut
of the original NIGHT.  They themselves effectively updated the tale
with DAWN OF THE DEAD in 1979, and with DAY OF THE DEAD they closed out
the series on an intellectual note (though to be fair, there was at
least as much cannibalism as intellectualism in DAY OF THE DEAD).  In
addition to the two official sequels, there have been countless
variations on the same theme, including the Sam Raimi's excellent EVIL
DEAD series and the horror/comedy RETURN OF THE LIVING DEAD.  And of
course there have been endless Italian zombie films -- most of them bad,
some of them (like Lucio Fulci's ZOMBIE) good, and all of them dubbed.
So why another LIVING DEAD film?  And why a remake of the original,
instead of at least attempting a new twist on an old theme?  The Phantom
isn't sure, though he certainly sympathizes with one possible motivation
-- he, too, has rent to pay.  You don't have to be a studio executive to
realize that there's a guaranteed audience for anything with "Living
Dead" in the title, and that the audience for such a film probably
doubles if the name "Romero" appears on the marquee.  And although it
might be interesting to find a new angle on an age-old theme, there's
nothing inherently wrong with remakes.  In fact, some of the best horror
films of recent times have been remakes (including THE FLY, INASION OF
THE BODY SNATCHERS, and THE THING), while some of the worst have been
sequels (including all of the HALLOWEEN and TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE and
arguably half of the NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET films), all of which tried
and failed to find a new way to recapture the success of their
predecessors.
     Except that the remake of NIGHT isn't so much a remake as a rehash;
it's just a colorless colorization of the original.  While films like
THE FLY and THE THING effectively updated their respective tales,
Romero's remake is sort of like the Ted Turner approach to filmmaking --
take an old classic, muck around with it a little, put it in a shiny new
box, and voila!  New product!  So in a sense, the remake of NIGHT is
really nothing more than a re-release, though with a few new scenes and
without a few old ones.  Other than that, the plot is exactly the same,
the setting is almost exactly the same, the characters are almost
exactly the same (with one notable exception -- Barbara -- to whom the
Phantom will soon turn his attention) and even the zombies are almost
exactly the same.
     What isn't the same, of course, are the expectations of the
audience.  While a film about a small group of people under siege by
hundreds of zombies lusting for human flesh was startling, disquieting,
and shocking in the late sixties, it is -- perhaps sadly -- somewhat old
hat now.  These days, if one wants to explore such shopworn themes, one
must generally go the serious, high-tech, monster gore route.
Cronenberg did it with THE FLY (though it would have been a fine film --
horror or otherwise -- even without all the gore); Carpenter did it with
THE THING.  It was even done with THE BLOB, though with considerably
less success (though the Phantom will always count the scene where one
of the hapless townfolk gets sucked down a kitchen drain as one of his
all-time favorites).
     Yet Romero and Savini are remarkably restrained throughout NIGHT;
in fact, the Phantom believes that the original may even be a little
gorier.  So without gore, what have we left?  Well, there's Tom Savini's
adept direction -- though he is certainly no Cronenberg or Raimi, Savini
proves that he can sustain suspense and set up enough spooky scenes to
make up for the long sequences that more or less fall flat.  But
although the right scenes are suspenseful in the right places, Savini
seems to have a better feel for the obvious gross-out than he does for
more subtle scenes of terror (not surprising, considering how he got his
start in film).  For example, the many scenes of zombie hands breaking
through boarded up windows are still scary, and the scenes' inherent
visual contradictions (the everyday ordinariness of a living room
intruded upon by walking corpses) are as disquieting as ever.  But
Savini doesn't seem to have Romero's flair for the subtle touches that
are all the more effective because they are not show-stopping
gross-outs.  In an early scene, Savini plays the camera on and around an
obese zombie, killed and left in the living room by Barbara when she
first enters the house (a change from the original screenplay).  He even
attempts a Raimi-esque scene with the zombie's severed hand, and that
scene works in a bizarre, tension-relieving way, but what's the point if
the rest of the film is going to be such a slavish copy of the original?
Raimi succeeded with just this kind of over-the-top horror, with
gratuitous gross-outs galore, because the images and tension never
stopped.  But NIGHT shifts uncomfortably back and forth between standard
gross-out horror and the kind of claustrophobic terror that was the
hallmark of the original while Savini doesn't seem to be able to decide
how he wants to play things.
     Romero's script, on the other hand, doesn't help matters.  While
the original NIGHT will never be confused with Hamlet, the amateurish
script fit with the general low-budget mood of the film, and at least it
never made us wince.  But together with the generally awful acting, it's
difficult to get through the remake without either laughing or yawning.
The black protagonist Ben seems more or less a carbon copy of the
original Ben, and Romero does a reasonable job of giving "the voice of
reason" interesting things to pontificate on.  But "the selfish side of
ourselves", Harry Cooper, is simply out of control.  Cooper is stuck
doing and saying patently ridiculous things, and the actor who portrays
him appears to be trying out for a part in a David Mamet play.  The
Phantom fully expected Cooper to start frothing at the mouth and
munching on the furniture -- it is a scenery-chewing performance from
beginning to end.  Ben responds in kind, and many too many scenes play
like outtakes from a particularly inept production of "Raisun in the
Sun".
     Finally, there's Barbara, who represents the biggest departure from
the original film.  Phans may remember that the character was a
traumatized young woman who we first meet as she visits her mother's
grave while her brother relentlessly teases her about the zombies who
"are coming to get you, Bar-bar-a!"  But in the original NIGHT, Barbara
is barely able to cope once she arrives at the house, and she ends up
being little more than a sexist hindrance to Ben and Tom as they try to
reinforce the house and save everyone from the zombies.
     But horror is in its post-ALIENS period now, and hysterical female
characters just don't cut it anymore.  So Romero has updated Barbara and
turned her into a Ripley clone, complete with assault rifle and
undershirt.  It's not clear to the Phantom why the 90's Ripley
character, tricked out in lingerie and combat boots is any less sexist
than the traditional hysterical female character who has starred in
horror films since the 50's.  In some ways, it seems like a real step
backward from the nearly three dimensional female characters who spent
all their time saving their boyfriends and killing Jason (and his
clones) in the 80's.
     In any case, this politically correct touch leaves the script
unbalanced, since now both she and Ben are ready to save everyone else,
losing in the process one of the few ironic touches of the original
film.  If "the voice of reason" isn't going to win -- and then get
killed by the gun-toting yahoos who mistake him for a zombie -- what's
the point?  Romero seems concerned about this as well, and at one point
Barbara is, in fact, forced to say, "We're them.  And they're us."  But
she could only believe this because she loses her glasses near the
beginning of the film; for the audience, the line is just another
laugher.  Instead, the message of the film is nearly Rambo-esque (ALIENS
was, after all, nothing but an updated war film); bizarrely, this runs
directly counter to the pacifist tendencies of the original (though the
Phantom realizes that any film that features cannibalism, walking
corpses, and matricide can't be pacifistic in the strictest sense of the
word).
     The Phantom was also saddened to see that some of the classic
horror scenes from the original are either missing or changed for the
worse.  For example, Savini implies, but never shows us, the zombies
feasting on the recently dead.  And one of the most famous scenes in
horror film history, that of the little girl zombie killing her mother
with a garden spade has been turned into a kind of "in" joke, a "nudge,
nudge, wink, wink" for phans of the original.  Had Romero and Savini
intended this NIGHT to be a spoof (as Raimi intended EVIL DEAD 2 to be a
spoof of his own horror classic), some of the changes might have been
fun -- at least for horror phans who were familiar with the original --
but as it is the changes feel awkward in a film that is otherwise so
slavish a copy of the original.  (There are other "in" jokes throughout
the new NIGHT, including a brief cameo by Romero himself, and in fact
the film really does play better for true horror phans than it does for
the casual viewer).
     Now, lest this review sound too negative, the Phantom should hasten
to point out that while the new NIGHT is nothing special, neither is it
outright unbearable or disappointing.  But that said, there seems little
reason to see it, especially when the original is available (even in a
hideous colorized version!)  for a buck from your local Blockbusters.
Hard core horror phans, biding their time until GRAVEYARD SHIFT, CHILD'S
PLAY II, and MISERY open in a few weeks, might want to take a look, if
only to satisfy their curiousity, or so that they could continue to say
that they've seen everything by Romero, a true horror film legend.
     But everyone else would probably be better off with the more
atmospheric, and certainly more original, original.  Perhaps if the box
office for NIGHT is lower than expected, Romero and Savini will get back
into the sequel-making business and produce new LIVING DEAD tales
(though the Phantom should note that he retains the copyrights on the
titles "Twilight of the Dead", "Evening of the Dead", and "Tea Time of
the Dead"; should Messrs.  Romero and Savini wish to use any of these
titles, they are advised to contact the Phantom's attorney to work out
all the gory details).

Title
Review for Dr. Giggles (1992)
     Those of us who came of age during the horror-saturated late
seventies and early eighties will likely appreciate DR. GIGGLES more
than the average horror phan; although many younger phans may well have
seen such genre-killing classics as FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 2 and HAPPY
BIRTHDAY TO ME, they likely haven't seen any of the original television
and print advertising.  With the television ads for the former enticing
us back to Camp Crystal Lake with a promised body count well into the
twenties (keeping Jason very busy at nearly one killing every four
minutes), and the print ads for HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO ME featuring a handy
reference list of the inventive ways in which nearly a dozen naughty
teens will be dispatched during the course of the film, it's no wonder
that the modern horror film nearly died out by the end of the eighties.
(Actually, the Phantom has always thought that it wasn't the saturation
of the market with cheaply made, disappointing HALLOWEEN clones; the
rising costs of distribution; the monopolization -- or outright
ownership -- of national theater chains by the major studios; or even
the advent of direct-to-video, the greatest equalizer of them all.  No,
it was just that Hollywood ran out of holidays and collectively couldn't
come up with a new peg on which to hang their horror hats.)
     In fact, DR. GIGGLES has in it a little something for just about
everyone, from phans of the aforementioned "classics" to those who
prefer their horror to be leavened by wit and humor slightly more subtle
than Freddy's.  There are bits and pieces of DEAD RINGERS and JACOB'S
LADDER here, as well as a very generous dose of FRIDAY THE 13TH.  In
this way, DR. GIGGLES is really a throwback to those glorious days of
yesteryear (yesteryear being about a decade ago in this case) when
maniacs roamed America's small towns and camp sites.  Though it features
up-to-date production values, good direction and editing, and a solid
performance by Larry Drake as a doctor who makes most unwelcome house
calls, DR. GIGGLES is little more than a rehashed version of HALLOWEEN,
less spooky and less serious, and of course without the ability to
startle an audience with the feeling that even their own well-lit homes
might not be safe from the boogeyman (those fears having been conquered
around the time Freddy got his own television show and horror came out
of the genre closet and into the mainstream for the first time since the
fifties).
     But how refreshing to watch a horror film that has no other agenda
-- one that doesn't toss a half dozen half-baked ideas into the mix in
the hope that phans might be distracted from its poorly conceived
screenplay, portentous art direction, or cheesy computer graphics.
After all, horror should be horror first and foremost; lectures on the
evils of the atomic bomb or the effect of civilization on giant iguanas
who were minding their own business until *we* came along are best left
for the film's closing scenes, allowing the audience to eat its cake and
have it, too.  We are gratefully spared such distractions in DR.
GIGGLES, which is easily the most straight-ahead horror offering in
months; it is, in fact, so single-minded in its purpose that the Phantom
was nearly overcome by a wave of fond nostalgia for the days when he
could pick and choose from dozens of new theatrical horror releases, all
of which had the same plot (maniac kills campers/hikers/babysitters,
then is killed by Jamie Lee Curtis or suitable stand-in) and all of
which were, for the most part, greatly entertaining, filled as they were
with a becalming and reassuring simple-mindedness that said to the
audience: I'm going to let you watch while three witless teenaged
campers are killed every ten minutes and the heck with rational
explanation, character development or plot exposition.  Horror films,
like action films, work best when they rid themselves of distractions
and get down to business as quickly as possible; and after watching the
opening scene in DR. GIGGLES, the Phantom knew he was in for a virtual
non-stop retrograde treat.  By the time the closing credits rolled, the
Phantom was pleased to find that the good doctor did not disappoint.
     Much of the success of DR. GIGGLES is due to the performance of
the actor portraying this slightly unstable medical practitioner; Larry
Drake, a man who here seems to be trying to keep his excellent portrayal
of Benny on the hit television show LA Law at more than arm's length,
brings real acting skills to the roll, and so makes the disturbed doctor
a little more three-dimensional than phans might initially expect.  Oh
sure, there are the usual Freddy one-liners, but there's also something
more, something darker here that we haven't seen in horror films in a
while.  That dark side comes and goes -- and by the end of the film, it
is, alas, pretty much gone -- but it's there all the same, and it goes a
long way toward differentiating DR. GIGGLES from any of the last few
Freddy, Michael, or Jason sequels.  Every so often we see real malice
surface in this film, knocking the manhole cover right off the
homogenized horror that we've come to expect and crawling out into the
screenplay as it gives us a wink and a flash of its razor-sharp teeth.
For all its special-effects- bloated, inept gore, HELLRAISER III never
gave us a glimpse of this particular beast -- that feeling that bad
things may happen and even worse, we might not be able to predict just
what -- but once in a while we do get that feeling from DR. GIGGLES.
Don't let the revised previews fool you, phans: those of you who saw the
original previews -- the ones that featured little more than a heart
monitor, some scary-looking surgical instruments, and Larry Drake's
voice -- know what lies buried beneath the mainstream gloss and
Freddy-inspired wisecracks.  That preview never once failed to cause
nervous laughter and audible sighs of relief when it ended; and while it
played on screen, rapt attention was the rule, even in the most unruly
of audiences.  (By way of contrast, the previews for Coppola's upcoming
DRACULA seem not to make much of an impression on people; though it may
mean nothing, it's possible that DRACULA might well be the very good,
very mainstream, and very unscary film the Phantom fears it will be.)
     The story itself is as simple as it is familiar: take some
teenagers, a spooky old house, a Smallville, U.S.A.  setting; throw in a
carnival (with requisite House of Mirrors), some inept cops and a
shameful, long-buried town secret; sprinkle with spring-loaded cats to
keep the audience on its collective toes, and never keep the good doctor
off screen for more than a few minutes.  The result won't win any
academy awards, though it's more than serviceable enough for a little
under two hours of scary fun.  Added to the mix -- and perhaps the
film's most important element of horror -- is the medical twist on an
old familiar story.  Even before Dr.  Giggles gives us a glimpse of his
DEAD RINGERS-inspired surgical instruments, the film itself is given a
big boost by playing on our very real (though usually quite deeply
buried) fear of doctors and hospitals -- people and places inextricably
linked to feelings of powerlessness and primal fears of pain and death.
MARATHON MAN featured one of the most exquisite scenes of horror in a
mainstream film, as Laurence Olivier tortured Dustin Hoffman with a
dentist's drill; the scene was, for many people, nearly unwatchable.
Yet these same people might not be the least bit squeamish watching
Jason dispatch an unwary teen with an axe; so why should the famous "Is
it safe?"  scene cause so many white knuckles?  The answer is that while
few of us can imagine being an empty-headed teen camper exploring a dark
cabin and getting slaughtered by a man in a hockey mask, we can all too
well put ourselves in Dustin Hoffman's place -- we've all been in that
chair, in just that position, and with just such an instrument in our
mouths.  While the comic-book gore of the FRIDAY THE 13TH series helps
us stay a safe distance from death, that scene in MARATHON MAN invited
us to sit right down with it and stay a while.
     Although DR. GIGGLES never once gets quite that intense, the film
works as well as it does because the doctor represents a very real link
between our safe, rational world and a world where we are very much not
in control.  It's possible that the filmmakers at one point wanted to
take DR. GIGGLES further in that direction but were redirected by focus
groups and the studio executives who are guided by them -- such dark,
disturbing films tend not to do very well at the box office, no matter
how well made and effective they are.  Witness David Cronenberg's
excellent film DEAD RINGERS, which in a just world would have garnered
Jeremy Irons an Oscar, but in actuality gave everyone who saw it the
creeps and won only grudging praise from the mainstream press.  (It, and
much of Cronenberg's other work, remain among the best horror films ever
made.)
     But even in its watered-down form, that little glimpse of
razor-sharp teeth keeps DR. GIGGLES both interesting and intense for
much of its running length; when either lags, we're saved by Larry
Drake's performance, and by his ability to retain a certain measure of
dignity no matter how silly the proceedings get.  And for you ELM STREET
phans, that giggle and some of the oldest jokes in the world -- jokes
that would make Groucho proud -- don't hurt in the least.
     It's neither serious, historically accurate, nor sociologically
correct, but DR. GIGGLES does what few horror films recently have been
able to do: it tells a simple story; it tells it well and clearly; and
it ends with at least a modicum of integrity.  And in these days of
overblown or half-baked horror, that counts for a lot.  Bring on the
roving bands of Smallville maniacs -- never has early eighties horror
looked so good.

Title
Review for Lawnmower Man, The (1992)
     The Phantom should know by now what to expect when Stephen King's
name is on the marquee: perhaps the worst theatrically-released horror
or science fiction of the year.  Although occasionally a talented
filmmaker will successfully adapt a Stephen King short story or novel --
Rob Reiner has done wonders with two of King's stories so far, and Brian
DePalma made a name both for himself and for King with his adaptation of
CARRIE -- we will more often get anything from the forgettable RUNNING
MAN to the terrible GRAVEYARD SHIFT to the absolute nadir of King
adaptations, MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE, directed by the master of horror himself
who apparently spared no effort in proving that a good writer does not a
talented filmmaker make.
     With THE LAWNMOWER MAN, King's name returns once again to the top
of the marquee, and it was with some trepidation that the Phantom
ventured into the Ziegfeld theater in New York (perhaps the largest and
most lavish movie theater on the East Coast) to see what looked as if it
might be a cross between a very vague memory of an old Stephen King
short story and the result of an Amiga run amok.  At the very least, the
Phantom reasoned, the film's extensive computer graphics would be shown
to best advantage on a screen big enough that it should have its own zip
code; the unavoidable downside of having Pierce Brosnan's unshaven face
looming fifty feet high above the Phantom for the bulk of the film's 100
minutes didn't occur to him until it was too late to sneak out and still
get a refund.
     But that unshaven face should have given the Phantom pause, for
although computer graphics are sprinkled liberally throughout the film,
the majority of screen time is occupied by Mr. Brosnan and his
inability to act.  He and his thespian disability share the screen every
so often with his incredibly cheesy-looking laboratory, which appears
for all the world to be nothing more than a parking garage with some
neon lights and two of those gizmos that David Letterman had on his show
some time back -- the ones that let you rotate yourself through 360
degrees in 3 dimensions.  The Phantom kept eager eyes peeled for the
Velcro wall or perhaps a large vat filled with shaving cream; after all,
although the Phantom has made the acquaintance of a computer or two in
his time, he's a novice when it comes to the exciting and
ever-so-interesting world of virtual reality and all the props that
world apparently requires.
     Mr. Brosnan and his stubble, you see, have invented a way to use
virtual reality to make people smarter.  At least the Phantom believes
that was his intention, as no one in the film behaves very intelligently
either in or out of virtual reality.  There is a fairly bright-looking
chimpanzee at the beginning of the film, but he's quickly dispatched,
most likely due to the "Don Johnson-look" clause in Mr. Brosnan's
contract: no one in THE LAWNMOWER MAN is allowed to have more facial
hair than the star of the film.  Later, and for a very brief time, a
complete idiot -- the "lawnmower man" of the title -- does seem to dress
somewhat better than he used to, and he does get to make love to an
incredibly bad actress, but he never seems very much brighter than he
did at the beginning of the film.  In fact, after that chimpanzee, it's
pretty much all down hill in the intelligence department.
     As it happens, THE LAWNMOWER MAN isn't really about virtual reality
or the possibility of using computer technology to help people
understand better the world around them; instead, it's just another
"scientist's good intentions cause catastrophic results when his little
refrigerated bottles of colored liquid fall into the wrong hands" flick,
with some 3-D video games, evil government agents, and megalomania
thrown in both indiscriminately and ineffectively.
     And yet THE LAWNMOWER MAN has done fairly well at the box office,
which can only mean that not everyone shares the Phantom's belief that
it is a fundamentally dishonest and mean-spirited film.  In the
Phantom's mind, this can only be attributed to the "My Little Pony"
effect, except here with computer graphics for the techno-geeks instead
of cloyingly cute pink ponies for 8-year-old girls.  There is a sizable
audience who will see -- and, apparently, enjoy -- anything at all with
computer graphics in it, just as there is a sizable number of
undiscriminating 8-year-old girls who will gladly coerce their parents
into attending MY LITTLE PONY: THE MOTION PICTURE.  Of course, the
salient difference is that those in the audience for the plastic
figurine's adventures are children, whereas those in the audience for
the R-rated LAWNMOWER MAN are supposed to be adults, and so should know
better by now.
     Films produced around computer graphics have had exceedingly poor
track records: of TRON, THE LAST STARFIGHTER, and THE LAWNMOWER MAN, one
would be hard-pressed to pick the one that's well off the "stupid" scale
that we reviewers always keep in mind once the auditorium lights dim.
(Just for reference: CITIZEN KANE is a 0 and HUDSON HAWK rings the
bell.)  In each case, the filmmakers apparently labored under the
mistaken belief that computer graphics would keep us mesmerized long
enough that we wouldn't notice how very silly or unoriginal the rest of
film was.  Yet when used sparingly, or with the grace and wit of the
artists at Pixar, computer graphics can provide a film with truly
breathtaking moments.  If asked what they think is the most memorable
scene in BEAUTY AND THE BEAST, many people mention the show-stopping
ballroom scene -- a scene that could have been animated only through the
use of carefully designed computer graphics.  Likewise, it's neither
Schwarzenegger nor the near-ceaseless violence that captured people's
imagination and caused audible gasps in the audience for TERMINATOR 2;
instead, it was the liquid-metal and optical effects provided courtesy
of extensive and ground-breaking computer graphics.
     But stripped of grace, wit and restraint, films that feature
computer graphics for their own sake are anything from trite, to dull,
to ridiculous.  It is in just this way that THE LAWNMOWER MAN seemed to
the Phantom to have quite a bit in common with "My Little Pony" -- in
both cases, a cynical attempt was made to capture audience dollars by
using poorly and unimaginatively a technique that could be used well and
with care.  And, alas, in both cases that attempt appears to have paid
off handsomely -- something that can do nothing but encourage future
attempts to cash in on some people's undiscriminating need to see
extended toy commercials or numbingly uninspired computer graphics in
the service of an even less inspired film.
     The possibilities of virtual reality have best been covered by
William Gibson's "cyber-punk" novels; perhaps someday someone will turn
his excellent NEUROMANCER or COUNT ZERO into a feature film.  In the
meantime, we have only the efforts of Brett Leonard and Gimel Everett,
who wrote and directed THE LAWNMOWER MAN as if they never had even the
slightest intention of exploring the concept of virtual reality.
Instead, every time the plot takes us inside the artificial world in
which Brosnan and his subject frequently lose themselves, all we get are
3-D video games, a strange and unlikely combination of TRON and FROM
BEYOND, and of course some obligatory cybersex, just to earn that
R-rating.  (FRITZ THE CAT this is not; FELIX THE CAT more closely
approximates the level of this film.)  And as anyone familiar with the
prop-laden world of virtual reality knows, one can only enter said world
if one is whirling about like a human gyroscope and covered from head to
toe in a rubber suit.  The actors do this quite a lot in the film, so
phans may wish to arm themselves with Dramamine beforehand.
     When not spinning about in Mr. Brosnan's contraptions, the
characters become involved in unlikely plot developments concerning "The
Shop" -- the only element of the film that is recognizably "from the
mind of Stephen King" -- and Brosnan's personal life (his wife walks out
of the film early on, and phans would be wise to note her behavior in
case they find themselves at a showing of THE LAWNMOWER MAN against the
Phantom's best recommendations).  We also witness the evolution of the
"lawnmower man" from slow-witted gardener to Megalomaniacal genius (at
one point Brosnan notes that he'd become smarter than Brosnan himself --
something that perhaps seemed more shocking in the script than it did on
the screen, given Brosnan's performance).  Along the way he dispatches
several people, each of whom dies an updated version of an 80s-style
Jasonized death.  Some die in computationally expensive ways, which
surely pleased the techno-geeks in the audience.  One dies after he is
chased out of his house by a lawnmower in a scene which perfectly
captures the film's level of plausibility.  Another staggers around in a
daze after hearing "Now The Lawnmower Man is inside your head --
forever!"; after the end titles rolled, the Phantom knew just how he
must have felt.
     So as not to make this a completely negative review, and to redeem
himself for the review's extreme tardiness, the Phantom will note that
all of this was done long ago -- and done much better -- by Ken Russell
in his extraordinarily loopy (but very enjoyable) 1980 film ALTERED
STATES.  Russell used a sensory deprivation tank and magic mushrooms
instead of rubber suits and gyroscopes, but the idea was the same, and
the film -- while not precisely a paragon of logic -- was at least
entertaining.  (There's also something to be said for watching William
Hurt -- in his screen debut -- wake up naked surrounded by baboons in a
zoo.  Now no matter how pretentious he becomes, we can always remind him
of his rather less-than-Shakespearean beginnings.  Only Jane Fonda has
more to live down....)
     Of course, much of the sensory-assaulting special effects will be
lost on the small screen, but phans will still be much happier watching
this typically over-the-top Russell exercise in alternate realities than
they will watching yet another in a depressingly long list of failed
films about computers.  HAL, where are you now that we really need you?

Title
Review for Jacob's Ladder (1990)
     The Phantom went into JACOB'S LADDER expecting something along the
lines of FLATLINERS; a fairly standard mainstream thriller with some
horror touches -- enough to give moviegoers a few thrills, possibly even
a few gross-outs, but no more than an occasional slightly crazed look or
boiled rabbit.  After all, the director, Adrian Lyne, is a master of the
mainstream, commercial film -- with FLASHDANCE, 9 1/2 WEEKS, and FATAL
ATTRACTION to his credit, Mr. Lyne is nothing if not knowledgeable about
what sells, and he of all people would know that while audiences do like
the occasional scare, the real money is in making films that are, at
heart, conventional and predictable above all else.
     So imagine the Phantom's surprise when he found that JACOB'S LADDER
is as close to a full-tilt serious high-tech monster psychological
thriller as we are likely to get until MISERY opens this Christmas.  As
Lyne took the audience through his rollercoaster-ride of a film, the
Phantom marveled at the camera work, the lighting, the eerie music, and
all of the classic horror touches that abounded throughout the film.
Despite what the studio wishes you to believe, JACOB'S LADDER is not
another GHOST, and it's not another FATAL ATTRACTION.  JACOB'S LADDER is
a classic, traditional horror film the likes of which we haven't seen in
a good long while.
     That said, the Phantom should also point out that JACOB'S LADDER is
not a hard-core horror film like BRAIN DEAD -- an excellent low-budget
film that it resembles in more than a few ways.  When all is said and
done, horror gives way to explanation and resolution, and truth be told,
the film's ending is embarrassingly bad.  But the festival of exposition
doesn't begin until the last ten minutes of the film (to kick it off,
one character literally stands facing the camera and explains the entire
film to an audience which Mr. Lyne and the studio apparently believe
has been standing in line for popcorn for the preceding two hours).  And
by that time the Phantom was not only able to forgive Mr. Lyne for
giving in to convention -- the quaint American cinematic tradition of
supplying a sensible and rational ending to everything -- but also for
directing two of the most awful films of the eighties (the Phantom
wasn't a particular phan of FATAL ATTRACTION, but at least it didn't
provide another nail for the coffin of cinematic intelligence as did his
two prior efforts).
     JACOB'S LADDER begins in Vietnam, where we first meet Jake as he
and his platoon get involved in serious combat.  But shortly Jake
awakens on the subway, bound for the Bergen Street station and home.
Was the Vietnam episode a dream?  Is the dirty, ill-lit subway car a
dream, and is Jake still in fact in Vietnam?  Though this last
possibility can be dismissed by any New Yorker, who would know only too
well that Jake's "G" train was a real-life nightmare from which few
Brooklyn-ites can awaken, much of JACOB'S LADDER proceeds in just this
fashion.  Much of the time we never really know whether Jake is awake or
asleep, or if the demons and strange goings-on he sees are really
happening.  And just when we're sure that Jake is finally back in
"reality," Lyne pulls the rug out from under us once again and we're off
on another loop of the coaster ride.
     For phans who have seen the excellent low-budget sleeper BRAIN
DEAD, this will sound very familiar.  But where BRAIN DEAD achieved many
of its nightmarish effects through the use of graphic gore and a
generous helping of red dye #2, in JACOB'S LADDER Lyne relies on
chipping away at tiny bits of normality -- a very effective and
disturbing technique.  Instead of putting a headless zombie on the
subway, Lyne strews trash all over the floor and lets the lights flicker
just so.  But the trash doesn't look like trash you would expect to see
on the subway, and the lights have a tendency to go out at just the
worst times.  The train itself is deserted but for a woman and a
homeless person sleeping on a bench, but the woman doesn't respond to
Jake when he asks whether or not they've passed Bergen Street, and to be
honest, she doesn't look quite right.  In fact, she looks like she might
have stumbled out of the theater auditorium next door, where she could
plausibly have played an extra in NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD.  And though
Jake is prepared to ignore the homeless person entirely as he leaves the
train, something on the bench moves.  We just get a glimpse of it, and
we don't know what it is -- but what it isn't is *right*.
     There's a lot that's not *right* in Jake's life, and throughout the
film we find Jake clinging desperately to what he believes is reality.
Yet it is a reality that is built on a very shaky foundation -- Jake's
mental health.  The well-written script (by Bruce Joel Rubin, who wrote
the immensely popular GHOST) hints at possibilities: Jake might be
suffering from a mental breakdown.  He might be suffering from the
effects of his tour of duty in Vietnam.  He might be hallucinating,
possibly because of drugs he took -- or drugs that were given to him
without his knowledge -- while in the Army.  And finally, he might be
dead.  It is to both Rubin and Lyne's credit that they make the last
possibility the most plausible, for throughout much of the film it
appears that Jake may be slowly descending into hell, and the demons he
sees appear at least as real as does Jake himself.
     Of course, the Phantom would never give away just what exactly is
happening (there is a definite "something," alas, for as the Phantom
mentioned, unlike BRAIN DEAD, JACOB'S LADDER is at heart a mainstream
film) -- guessing is half the fun.  But suffice it to say that things
are almost never what they appear to be, and that while Lyne has us on
the rollercoaster he rarely misses an opportunity to unnerve us, to
confound us, and every once in a while to just plain scare the popcorn
out from under our seats.  There is more than a little ERASERHEAD in
this film, and Lyne sends shivers down our spines in just the way Lynch
did: by creating a world in which stockings draped over a shower curtain
rod can look sinister; in which people's heads shake back and forth much
too quickly; in which a chiropractor might be an angel and a surgeon a
devil; and in which almost nothing seems quite right.
     Well, not true.  Although in Jake's world everything seems just a
little off, in our world there are more than a few things that are
exactly right.  For one, the music (by Maurice Jarre) is wonderful,
eerie and atmospheric when it needs to be and a delight the rest of the
time.  Lyne uses sound and lighting effects to great advantage, but he
never over indulges so that the audience becomes aware of his camera
tricks.  And his rips in reality -- the touches of horror that he
sprinkles throughout the film -- brought tears of joy to the Phantom's
jaded eyes.  Phans who saw THE EXORCIST III remember that many of its
"special effects" were perfectly ordinary objects used in a disturbing
context.  When George C. Scott hears that his friend was murdered by
having all the blood drained out of his body, we are horrified both
because the script is so rich and the description is so good, and
because we see over a dozen small beakers, all neatly aligned on a tray,
that are filled with blood.  Lyne's effects are like that, and JACOB'S
LADDER succeeds as a horror film where films like LEATHERFACE fail:
while gore is easy, it is rarely scary.  JACOB'S LADDER may not be a
hard-core horror film like HELLRAISER, but in many ways Lyne shows us a
more convincing vision of hell than Barker -- with his team of special
effects technicians -- was able to.
     The performances (especially Tim Robbin's as Jake) are convincing,
the script is generally intelligent, well-written, and without too many
pointless diversions (though there are some), and the film -- like all
of Lyne's films -- looks great.  It is not a horror film from first
frame to last, and phans who sneak out of GRAVEYARD SHIFT and into
JACOB'S LADDER expecting more of the same (though the Phantom would have
difficulty understanding why anyone would *want* more of the same) will
be disappointed.  JACOB'S LADDER needs a little time and space to
develop in its own way and at its own pace, but the Phantom thinks that
phans who see it and are willing to accept its sometimes illogical
twists and turns will be pleasantly surprised.  And phans who enjoyed
BRAIN DEAD will almost assuredly enjoy JACOB'S LADDER, for there but for
the grace of a major studio and $20 million dollars is something very
similar to Charles Beaumont's glorious Twilight Zone-like script.
     Good psychological horror films are so few and far between that the
Phantom urges phans to see JACOB'S LADDER while they wait for the giant
rats to leave and MISERY to arrive.  When Chucky returns this Friday for
a rehash of the very clever and original CHILD'S PLAY, the Phantom will
be in attendance, laughing and throwing popcorn with the rest of the
audience.  But he probably won't be scared or disturbed or even very
intrigued; JACOB'S LADDER was able to do all of these things with
remarkable skill, and so the Phantom recommends it very highly indeed.

Title
Review for Universal Soldier (1992)
     If you watch any television at all, you have by now likely seen
over a dozen commercials for this summer's latest action/exploitation
film, UNIVERSAL SOLDIER.  The commercials look good -- great stunts --
and they sound good -- with T2's soundtrack in the background, no less
-- and they even manage to show us brief glimpses of Dolph Lundgren
doing something other than standing in one place looking like he's
waiting for someone to change his batteries.  But yet something doesn't
seem quite right, does it?  Something -- talent?  inspiration?
originality?  -- seems to be missing, and even the studio's advertising
department seems to know it, given the strange come-on we get in at
least some of the commercials: that UNIVERSAL SOLDIER is from the same
studios that brought us TOTAL RECALL and T2.
     Telling the Phantom that a film is "from the studios that brought
you TOTAL RECALL and TERMINATOR 2" is like telling a gourmet that a
restaurant is "on the same block as The Four Seasons"; it's an
interesting fact, but good neighbors do not a good dining experience
make -- it's what's in the kitchen that counts.
     The latest from Tri-Star and Carolco is intended to be a quickie
ripoff of other, better films, one of which -- TERMINATOR 2 -- was in
fact distributed and backed by this studio and production company last
year.  In this, UNIVERSAL SOLDIER succeeds: it is, indeed, from the
people who once brought us a much better film, and it is, indeed, a
quickie ripoff of at least part of that film.  Ads usually don't lie,
try as they might, though sometimes they do assume that no phan of Dolph
Lundgren or Jean-Claude Van Damme could possibly be smart enough to see
through this transparent and slightly pathetic ruse.  (The Phantom is no
particular phan of either, though he did enjoy BLOODSPORT some years
ago.  And of course, he is by now well versed in decoding the deceptive
advertising surrounding most Hollywood product; he would also like to
note that the Phantom's law of print advertising has once again proven
correct: the print ads for UNIVERSAL SOLDIER do indeed look as hastily
prepared and as ill-conceived as the film itself.)
     Changing metaphors for a moment, if action films were parts of a
city, then T2 would be the Empire State Building; UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, on
the other hand, is more on the scale of the little newsstand located
across the street.  So why the slide from the observation deck of
big-budget American action film perfection to the sub-basement of the
teeming, direct-to-video hordes?  The most likely reason is that Carolco
isn't in off the ledge of near-bankruptcy just yet, and money is still
tight; perhaps it will be talked back in by the studio suicide squad
(still distraught from Orion's recent plunge to the sidewalk of
insolvency some weeks ago), but it's likely to be out on that ledge for
some time, listening to the cries of "Jump!", "Jump!"  and watching
battalions of lawyers scurrying this way and that (looking very much
like ants) thirty floors below.  While we wait to see if Carolco leaves
an over-leveraged dent in the sidewalk and joins Cannon, DEG and Vestron
in that great independent studio in the sky, we can be sure that there
will be no more $100 million Schwarzenegger epics for quite some time --
at least not "from the studios that brought you TOTAL RECALL and
TERMINATOR 2."
     Instead we get UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, complete with the top two
Schwarzenegger wannabes, each with a less intelligible accent and each
with less acting ability, but neither with enough box office clout to
command a Scharwzenegger-sized percentage of the gross.  Add to the mix
a sure-fire plot (or rather, pieces of two different sure-fire plots); a
director whose film is going direct-to-theater for the first time in his
rather short career; pump up the audience's expectations with some
clever advertising and bits and pieces of T2's score lifted from the
cutting room floor; and you've got product that can't possibly miss --
provided you spend nearly as much on advertising as you do on the rest
of the production.  It's going to be 4 weeks and out for UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER, so timing is all.  Get it in the theaters as BATMAN is cresting
and as LETHAL 3 is waning, but before the major studios have time to
gear up for their August releases, and you're assured of at least making
back your production costs before the film hits video and foreign
distribution in six months; the rest is gravy.
     (THE LAST BOY SCOUT used this same strategy last summer, to similar
effect.  We B-movie phans will take our death and destruction whenever
and wherever we can get it, even if it means that we have to watch Bruce
Willis remind us once again of how difficult it is to make a good action
film.)
     Of course, there's nothing wrong with a film being a quickie ripoff
-- after all, some of the best action and horror films of all time have
been nothing more than low-budget first-attempts by talented but unknown
directors.  John Carpenter, George Miller, Joel and Ethan Coen, and John
McNaughton may be well-known and -respected these days, but it wasn't so
long ago that they were all struggling young filmmakers with a passion
for the offbeat.  Their drop-dead first films show how much can be
accomplished without Hollywood backing, distribution, or financing.
     There is, however, something wrong with UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, and it
has nothing to do with financing, though it does have something to do
with Hollywood: UNIVERSAL SOLDIER is terminally dumb.  And when it's not
dumb, it's outright silly, which is even worse.  B-movie phans know that
things can be nonsensical in a horror or action film; things can be
obscure; things can even be dumbfounding.  What they can't be is any
dumber or sillier than they have to be -- or if they are, then the films
have to be so skillfully made that the audience never notices.
     Well, in UNIVERSAL SOLDIER we notice; and that's the problem in a
nutshell (if one can call 1000 words -- and counting -- a nutshell):
we're never able to sufficiently suspend our disbelief and really get
into the film.  As a result, all we can do is notice Van Damme's
incredibly bad acting (or incredibly good acting, assuming that his
intention was to impersonate a bridge support), the non-existent rapport
between him and Lundgren, and the general air of insufficient funds that
surrounds the production.  They do send a semi off a cliff, and they do
blow up a gas station, but other than that there's little to
differentiate UNIVERSAL SOLDIER from any of a number of bad
direct-to-video action flicks.
     And that's a real shame, since the premise seemed so full of
possibilities.  The basic idea behind UNIVERSAL SOLDIER is that the
government has saved the bodies of dead soldiers from the Vietnam war
era and developed a serum which both keeps the bodies in peak condition
and turns the soldiers' minds into complete blanks.  (Given the need to
cast such a film, the choice of Van Damme and Lundgren should be
obvious.)  After being injected with the magic serum, the soldiers can
perform super-human acts, such as swimming at high speed up to a dam
without getting their clothes wet; pushing a car at 30 miles per hour
down a desert road without getting covered with dust; jumping through
supporting walls in a motel without causing the entire structure to
collapse; and repeatedly getting in and out of a ridiculous-looking semi
that looks to have been left over from a TEENAGE MUTANT NINJA TURTLES
episode.  (Though Van Damme and Lundgren are as interchangeable as any
two of the turtles -- we don't even get different color bandannas to
tell them apart -- Shredder was nowhere in sight.  Thoughts of hitting
rock bottom and being in the sewer did cross the Phantom's mind more
than once, however.)
     The problem is that the serum doesn't work well enough, and
occasional thoughts and brief moments of real acting ability appear in
both Lundgren and Van Damme as each relives his final minutes of mortal
combat in a very domestic-looking Vietnamese village.  (Lundgren is the
crazy, evil, bad sergeant who has definite Mai Lai tendencies; Van Damme
is the innocent farm boy who tries to save one of the villagers.)  These
brief moments are stolen shamelessly from the much better film ROBOCOP,
though instead of humanizing the Universal Soldiers they exist only to
provide a pretext for Lundgren to go completely berserk and start
hunting down Van Damme at all costs.  At this point, the filmmakers
jettison most of the science fiction aspect of the film and reduce it to
a typical -- and tedious -- "superhuman good guy vs. superhuman bad
guy" flick.  There is never any sense of the place of this technology in
future society, as there was in ROBOCOP or TOTAL RECALL; instead, it's
used as a gimmick and as a prop, and it is in general dispensed with at
the earliest possible opportunity.
     Before this happens, however, another problem surfaces -- one that
should probably have been considered more carefully before it was tossed
into UNIVERSAL SOLDIER'S script.  It seems that too much activity causes
the soldiers to overheat, and in the case of Van Damme, to suffer from
Michael Douglas Syndrome: the uncontrollable urge to show the audience
your naked rear end.  Fortunately, a quick restorative nap in the
freezer section of the Evil Scientist's Semi of Doom or, alternatively,
burying yourself under bags of ice from free and convenient gas station
and motel ice dispensers helps to cool things off.  Thus, the Universal
Soldiers can never be separated from either the Evil Semi of Doom or a
roadside motel for too long, and thus do the filmmakers inflict the
first of many incidents of extreme dumbness on their hapless audience.
The sight of this big, black Mayflower-looking van of Doom -- the Van
Damme Van -- lumbering along the empty highways in hot pursuit of
Jean-Claude and his reporter girlfriend -- did the Phantom mention the
Turtles a while back?  -- was enough to start the Phantom choking with
laughter.  (Phans of the classic disaster spoof THE BIG BUS will know
exactly why the Phantom was giggling in his popcorn; fortunately for the
filmmakers, most of the film's target audience will be about a decade
too young to remember that paragon of silliness.)
     UNIVERSAL SOLDIER might have been a good cat and mouse film (like
THE HITCHER) had it stayed away from the Evil Scientist shenanigans and
left the Van of Doom in the garage; it could have been a decent ROBOCOP
or MANIAC COP ripoff had it lost Van Damme altogether and concentrated
on the havoc a run-amok Universal Dolph might cause; but alas, UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER incorporates both too little and too much of these ideas into a
badly blended stew of action and science fiction.  ALIEN 3 stumbled
earlier this year in much the same way, and it now stands as one of the
most ill-conceived action/horror sequels of all time.  UNIVERSAL SOLDIER
is not, at least, a sequel to anything, and given the lukewarm audience
reaction as the closing credits rolled, the chances that UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER 2 will be made are -- fortunately -- vanishingly slim.
     Some months ago the Phantom panned BASIC INSTINCT as an overwrought
and extremely silly naked lesbian ice-pick killer flick; however, at
least BASIC INSTINCT was competently made.  Verhoeven may have a
singularly repellent vision, but at least he *has* a vision, and one
that shows clearly in his films.  UNIVERSAL SOLDIER has the look of a
film that sprang not from someone's imagination but rather from a
corporate board room, with more attention given to an accountant's
ledger than to the film's near-illiterate script.  That's the real
problem with UNIVERSAL SOLDIER: more than the general air of
penny-pinching that surrounds the film; more than the complete inability
of either Lundgren or Van Damme to act -- even in the most rudimentary
sense as mindless, brainwashed automatons; more than the loopy Evil Van
of Doom; the film suffers from a real lack of vision -- a distressing
lack of the kind of energy needed to keep any action film moving and to
keep B-movie audiences interested.
     UNIVERSAL SOLDIER makes one forget why one thought that LETHAL 3
had any problems at all; in fact, the Phantom plans to see Mel and
friends one more time this summer, if only to see how it should be done.
Even though it's far from perfect, LETHAL 3 is simply in a different
class than UNIVERSAL SOLDIER, and between it, BATMAN and Clint
Eastwood's very good-looking western coming next month, only die-hard
Van Damme phans will want to go out of their way to see UNIVERSAL
SOLDIER, a film that -- sadly -- doesn't even deserve to be in the same
sentence as the words "die hard".
